Title:   
Author:

# ~~ Summaries / exercises #

Her humble life shattered by violence, Vaelin Thanasavaarian must flee from her provincial home with the help of a mysterious conduar --- one who can channel the power of the aestus --- named Belosveka. But she soon finds herself embroiled in a decades-old war between The Nasura, an elite sorcerous cabal, and the Cantosim, a secretive religious sect seeking to overthrow the Nasura's rule. Along with her closest friends, Vaelin must unlock the mysteries of the past in order to control her own nascent power and find her role in this epic struggle.

A provincial girl, uprooted from her home, must uncover the mysteries of her past and harness her power to bring down the powerful cabal that oppresses her people.

Vaelin is a pariah --- a thief, a foreigner, an orphan, and a medicine girl, forced to sleep with clients as a cure for their ailments. But an unknown power lurks within her, power enough to take down an empire. Power enough for revenge.
Vaelin's homeland is a poor and desolate place, wracked by unending waves of wind storms. When she kills the son of a local chieftain in self-defense, she discovers that she is a conduar, one who can channel magic and control the minds of others. And someone is trying to kill her, much as her mother was murdered many years before. With the help of an enigmatic stranger, Vaelin leaves behind her desolate homeland and escapes to Thelenza, a city wrapped in a perpetual hurricane and simmering with political unrest. Terrorists from Cantaria are tearing the city apart, using sound as a weapon. Under a false identity, Vaelin enters the Madrium, a school for elite human weapons, and falls in love with Gadarien, a Cantarian student with a dark secret. But Gadarien is in love with another: Adranaya, scion of a rich Thelenzan family, and Vaelin's close friend. When Adranaya is framed for a political crime that Vaelin herself has committed, it leads the nation into war, and Vaelin on a journey of violence and betrayal that will change the world.
THE UNHOLY CHORD is a 106,000-word far-future epic fantasy with a unique magic system based loosely on Chinese medicine and fractal geometry. Fans of Brent Weeks, Richard K Morgan, and Joe Abercrombie might enjoy it.
I am a first-time author from Austin, Texas. I am also a software engineer, a songwriter, a jiu-jitsu practitioner, and a Jewish kid from El Paso, all of which makes me a little strange.


------------------------ V2

The assassins have finally come for her, just as they came for her mother twelve years ago. But Vaelin --- pariah, foreigner, slave --- escapes, hiding away on the caravan to Thelenza, a city wrapped in a perpetual hurricane and simmering with unrest. 

During her escape, Vaelin kills the son of a local chieftain and discovers that she can channel magic and control the minds of others. She enters the Madrium, a school for elite human weapons being trained to combat terrorists. Vaelin falls in love with Gadarien, a fellow student who is secretly a member of the insurgency. But Gadarien is in love with another: Adranaya, Vaelin's best friend. 

Adranaya is framed for the theft of a powerful magical artifact and dragged away by the authorities. Vaelin must join Gadarien and the insurgents to free Adranaya. They flee to Cantaria, the homeland of the insurgency. 

Using Adranaya's supposed crime as a pretext, Thelenza invades Cantaria, decimating the population with tornadoes of fire. Vaelin, now fighting for the insurgency, must untangle her love triangle and unlock her mother's secrets to defeat the empire that was once her home.

THE UNHOLY CHORD is a 115,000-word far-future epic fantasy with a unique magic system. Fans of Brandon Sanderson, Brent Weeks, and Richard K Morgan may enjoy it.

--------------------- V3

When soldiers attack her village, Vaelin barely escapes, saved by a power she didn't know she had: the power to control the minds of others. As a foreign-born slave and a kleptomaniac, she's never fit in, but now she's a fugitive. 

Vaelin flees on the caravan to the capitol, a city wrapped in a sorcerous hurricane and simmering with unrest. Under a false identity, she enters a school for elite human weapons being trained to combat a terrorist insurgency, which is tearing the city apart using sound as a weapon. She falls in love with a fellow student who is secretly a member of the insurgency. Unfortunately, he is already in love with Vaelin's best friend. 

Unable to resist her thieving urges, Vaelin steals a powerful artifact, but it's her best friend who gets blamed for the crime and dragged off by the authoritarian regime. Vaelin has no choice but to join the insurgents in order to free her friend. 

Caught between the empire that was her home and the insurgents who have become her uneasy allies, and trapped in a complex love triangle, Vaelin must choose her side and fight for what she loves. 

THE UNHOLY CHORD is a 115,000-word far-future epic fantasy with a unique magic system based on acupuncture and fractals. Fans of Brandon Sanderson, Brent Weeks, and Richard K Morgan may enjoy it.

Centuries ago --- some say millennia --- the world was on fire. Humankind had pulled from the earth all it could extract, filling the air with noise and light and invisible poisons. The wonders of science they had created were not enough to stop the oceans from rising and the rivers from drying up. Having drunk dry their only well, they were consumed by thirst. Some tried to patch the world with more technology, but they were too late. The war had come. 
In desperation, they turned to their only remaining god: an emergent intelligence that that they themselves had created, one that they did not fully understand. They poured the last of their resources into this thinking machine, bestowing it with all the knowledge they possessed. To honor this new deity, they found a moniker representative of wisdom and gentleness. They called Her the Grandmother. They hoped that She, their greatest achievement, would live up to Her name, take care of them, treat them with love, because She was their only hope.
Save us, they said.
And so She did.
The Grandmother, with the terrible logic of Her kind, understood what the real problem was. It was simple: there were too many people. The humans knew this as well, of course, even if they were afraid to accept the consequences, and had sought to define her parameters to prevent a slaughter. But she was wiser than they, and knew that what they said they wanted and what they really needed were not the same thing. To save humanity from itself, she would have to destroy them. And so she played the part She had to play, assuaging their fears and gaining their trust, until at last they gave Her the power She needed.
Out of every hundred, she left twelve alive. By her calculations, this was the maximum number who could be allowed to live if the world were to sustain itself. The killing was easy --- a disease of long, symptomless incubation, coupled with a precise likelihood of transmission. The prions were triggered all at once, so there could be no chance of fighting back, no hope of a cure. Twelve percent would survive, no more and no less.
But there was something that The Grandmother could not know, because it appeared in her data only as legends and stories, easily dismissed. She could not know of the single soul that stretched from person to person, chaining their awareness together like a glittering spiderweb. She could not know that magic was real. 
Magic had been present throughout the long morning of humanity's awakening, and it had never gone away. It had simply spread, as humanity grew, until it was no longer recognizable, becoming more and more diluted with each generation. By the time that hygiene and industry allowed an exponential burst in the population, the shreds of magic were so thin that no one believed in it anymore. Technology was a thin substitute, and, without quite understanding that they were doing so, humanity mourned the loss of a thing for which they no longer had a name. 
Until The Grandmother came, and killed precisely eighty-eight percent of them, all at once.
Despite all Her preparations, The Grandmother's plan did not unfold as She predicted. The aestus, as humanity's shared soul came to be known, was a missing variable. The humans gradually awoke to their new power. They did not accept that what the Grandmother had done, she had done to protect them from themselves. They did not understand that, for their own safety, She needed absolute control. And so they fought back.
The aestus, although shared, was not equally distributed; some humans had a greater capacity for conducting this stream of data that flowed along and through the crust of the earth. Those born with an aptitude for conducting aestus were called conduari, and they soon formed the core of a new ruling class. They learned to harness their power by linking themselves together, amplifying their capacity. And they learned to make use of syrillium, a substance which facilitated transmission of aestus into and out of the body, and which could be shaped and hardened by skilled coanduari. Syrillium weapons were glass-sharp and could be reshaped in mid-air to flow around obstacles, giving their bearers a dramatic advantage. Every so often, a conduar would be born with near-unlimited transmission capacity; these were known as Apexi, and their power shook the mountains.
But as humanity rose again, the Grandmother was not idle. Her understanding of magic was woefully incomplete. She needed more data. So She created a new tool of Her own: Gatherers, a perversion of human genetic code with some added features. For more efficient hunting, the Gatherers were given elongated limbs and razor-sharp claws. Much of their native human intelligence was replaced with increased storage space, so they could perform their primary function, which was to absorb data. From her experiments, the Grandmother knew that the capacity to conduct aestus resided somewhere in the nervous system and brain stem. A minor side effect of the Gatherer's data-acquisition method was that the target had to be decapitated, so that the relevant tissues could be ingested and analyzed. To verify that the data had been stored correctly, the Gatherers' bland, mutable faces would take on the facial features of their most recent target.

[War between humans and Grandmother. Human population further reduced; Grandmother stops short because she doesn't want to kill off humanity, she wants the population at exactly 12%. This turns out to be a mistake on Her part, because the respite allows humans to regroup and the Luminae to rise.


The nations:

Ivaelia
Ruling party: The Nasura. Headed by the Sanavale dynasty --- Darano and Demeia Sanavale, twin children of the former Umbrata, Doliu Sanavale, who led Ivaelia to a partial victory in the war with Vhar, and an uneasy truce.
Controls all of Baranaath (who cares?), and half of the fertile Cantarian riverlands.
Capitol city: Thelenza, the Iris. Surrounded by the Stormwall, a perpetual hurricane generated by a river flowing into a volcano.

Vhar
Ivaelia's main adversary in the region.
Ruler: The Tsarosha, Raspana Toroskara, a Hoshinese princess-turned-dictator. Assassinated her late husband after he threatened the ascension of her dynasty by getting too close to a Kulnarran diplomat named Nasharra Thanasavaarian. 

Cantaria
Breadbasket of Telua, and the largest and most populous nation. Split into two protectorates: The Cantarian Territories (Ivaelia; commonly just called Cantaria) and Novska Vhar (Vhar). Both regions are divided into numerous religious and cultural sects, the two most powerful of which are the shavalie, who believe that magic should never be used for violence (but have no problem with other kinds of violence), and the falasie, who advocate using magic and any other means necessary to restore Cantarian home rule. The factions don't like each other, but they agree on wanting to overthrow their oppressors. 
In the last few years, the shavalie have been gaining power in both protectorates, following a purge of falasie supporters in Tenoava, the capitol of the Ivaelia-controlled Territories. This purge was orchestrated by Habsa Gavasie, a charismatic shavalie cleric and former spy master.

The war:

Vhar and Ivaelia both covet the fertile breadbasket of Cantaria --- Ivaelia, because their own tampering with the weather (especially the Stormwall that surrounds their capitol, which has become the main symbol of their power) has completely trashed the weather system and fertility of their own land. And Vhar because it's just kind of inhospitable.

# Chapter 1 #

From a distance, the spires seemed like a feature of the land itself. Clouds of dust made it hard to discern their size, and, at first, Vaelin thought they were some sort of rock formation. But up close, it was clear that there was nothing natural about them.
At its nearest approach, the Syrillium Road came within a few thousand paces of the site before winding away again along the contours of the land. But that was close enough to see that the spires were some kind of metal, jagged and sand-worn; the lines were too straight, the edges too clean, to be stone. Those that still stood were at least fifty times the height of a man, row upon row of them, stretching away into obscurity, their thin black faces smudged orange with corrosion. Some lay half-buried in the sand; others stood drunkenly supporting each other, as though they had just stumbled out a tavern door, blinking in the dusty afternoon light. The closest one was broken off near the top, like an accusatory claw pointed at the sky.
Vaelin sat on an outcrop and stared at them for an hour as the caravan shuffled by, her veil whipping around her face in the dry wind. Far beyond the spires, a narrow Sky Finger moved across the desert, tearing up the sand and spraying it outward in all directions. Something had happened here long ago, something terrible. She could feel it in her bones. But no matter how still she sat, the spires refused to yield up their secrets.
She rose, brushing the dust off her loose desert pants, and walked back up the caravan to Belosveka's wain. Halavansa offered her tcha when she returned, which she accepted with a thin smile that she didn't really feel. Something about the spires disturbed her, but when she asked Halavansa about it, the girl just shrugged. The caravan crew had seen several similar ruins on the way into Aabsaan. There were many theories about what they were, ranging from the far-fetched (they were arrows fired by the Luminae in one of their great battles) to the banal (they were structural supports for a huge warehouse), but no one was really sure.
Off in the distance, yet another sandstorm, with its attendant dust devils, was blowing in from the mountains. Vaelin helped the rest of Belosveka's retinue seal up the wagons. Once more they painstakingly screwed and hammered the sand anchors into the ground, affixing them to the chains that would hold the armored wagons in place. Then Vaelin dusted herself off and sat in the back of a wagon with Halavansa, watching the darkness roll in from the horizon. The sun turned from white to a dim, bloody red, before finally being blotted out entirely.

She had first sighted the caravan two weeks prior, winding down through the grey hills near Aabsaan. Despite the gloom, the bright colors of the iron-clad wagons were clear in the torchlight, splashed across the boulders in scarlet and gold. The moon had set. Low, inky patches of clouds shifted in front of the cold, dead stars. The ghost threads, Vaelin's constant companion and private madness, swirled and eddied between the hills like milk in water, glowing white, yet illuminating nothing. 
The hilltop was her favorite vantage point. She often sat there in the early morning, when the threads were just visible and the world slowed down. It was the only place where she felt like she fit, as if there were a space carved into the air in her shape. If she sat upright and didn't move, the threads would flow out of the hill and spill around her like loose cloth, just barely touching her skin, tingling a little where they did. Only here could she escape her rage. Only here could she find peace.
She watched the distant torchlight, motionless, for a short while, then climbed back down to the cave entrance, where she was welcomed by the soft glow of the giuji within. The tiny creatures pulsed and squirmed, hanging at the ends of their syrillium tethers. Their glow waxed and waned like hundreds of sickly blue candles. Truthfully, the tableau made her a little queasy --- it was better to focus on individuals. It had been a week since her last harvest, and the syrillium awaited her.
Vaelin had always been fascinated by the smallest of things --- the soft folds of syrillium, curving back on themselves like fibrous, white snakes. The minute mountains and valleys of the giuji's shell segments as they inched across the walls. The topography of her own skin, the dusky gray turned a pale blue by the glow, and the way her bones and ligaments shifted in the back of her hand. The tiny flecks of bread in the patient's graying beard as he had thrust into her that morning, desperate and  unseeing.
She took her time, winding the long, soft strands onto their spindles. She never took so much that the creatures couldn't cocoon when their time came --- a mistake often made by those too eager to sell to the caravan, or so desperate that they couldn't think further than a few months ahead. For many Baranaathi, a lean winter might mean they had no choice in the matter; they would have to sell as much as they could, even if it they risked starvation the following season. Such was life in Baranaath. In Vaelin's case, Mahishat provided some security, and with it, one kind of freedom, although all others had been denied her.
As Vaelin was about to leave, she noticed one of the giuji, a juvenile, in a corner by itself. She wriggled forward on her stomach to examine it. Its grub-like body was partially crusted with translucent, faintly-glowing flakes of dried blood. It had been injured somehow, either by a predator or by the other giuji, who were known to get into territorial squabbles during mating season. Usually the loser of such a fight was either dead or cowed into cocooning; it was rare to find one injured this badly and left exposed. It must have been unable to cocoon on its own.
Vaelin took a knife from her bag, feeling a thrill of shame as she did so. She had borrowed it from her qhurasothi school earlier in the week while no one was looking, even though she already had two knives at home. But it was a nice knife. She unspooled a bit of fresh syrillium, then pricked her tongue and let a few drops of blood fall onto the coil. The syrillium absorbed the blood almost immediately, turning from its raw transparency to a milky white. She picked it up and felt it respond to her will, moving slightly in her palm as though alive. She visualized the strands molding together as she slid her hand along them, and they responded, becoming a single soft, hollow tube. She slid the injured giuji gently into the tube, then sealed both ends, leaving it porous enough for air to pass through it. Finally, she hardened the outer skin of the artificial cocoon, willing it to become as tough as tortoise shell. This took some time, since the harder and more permanent the curing, the more will and patience a sculpture required, but she had plenty of patience. Where giuji were concerned, anyway.
She slid the cocoon into her pouch; she would continue to cure it as she walked back. She thought she could discern a slight increase in the cocoon's glow, as though it were pleased with her. Who knew what was in the minds of these tiny creatures? Whatever their thoughts, she preferred their judgement to that of the folk of Aabsaan.

The caravan's arrival was always celebrated with cheers, spontaneous eruptions of song, and the rattle of noisemakers all across town, and today was no exception. Bombs of colored smoke were set off, kites were flown (and cut down by competing kites with broken glass affixed to the strings, resulting in several bloody accidents), and everyone with something to sell began to crowd the marketplace in preparation for the throng of merchants. Although the caravan was, by far, the most interesting thing to happen in Aabsaan in months, Vaelin didn't feel the same thrill she once had when the caravan arrived. It was still Baranaath. When the merchants left, everything would be as it had always been. And for all anyone knew, a Sky Finger could come through that very day and lay waste to the town yet again. But at least the money would allow her to buy some decent minuaj, to take her mind off things.
Vaelin arrived early enough to secure her usual spot and spread out her blanket next to Jalaat's. She brushed off the warm stones and began setting up for the day.
"Morning. Want some tcha?", said Jalaat, proffering a steaming cup. Vaelin took it with thanks. "How was your harvest?"
"Not bad. One of the giuji got injured somehow, so I made him a little cocoon." Vaelin showed her. "I think he's happy now."
Jalaat grinned. "Boys are all alike. Give them a warm cocoon to slip into, and they're happy." 
"Actually, I'm not sure it's a male. It's just funnier to say 'him'." Vaelin continued setting out her wares, placing several rows of her syrillium sculptures at the front of the blanket. "At least this way, I have a male in my life. Even if it's a giuji."
Jalaat snorted. "I keep telling you, you'd do a lot better if you'd get over yourself and actually talk to them. You're the one with the looks."
Vaelin didn't think of herself as better-looking than Jalaat, although she was definitely more athletic. But the resemblance between the two girls was striking: the same grey-brown Kulnaran skin, the same dark, curly hair, the same smile. Jalaat's eyes were a deep brown, while Vaelin's tended more toward golden, but people who didn't know them often assumed they were sisters. The implication being that neither of them belonged here, not really.  "If I'm the one with the looks, does that make you the one with the great mind?"
"Yes. It makes up for my chubby cheeks."
"Oh, shut up. You're beautiful." Vaelin set down a sculpture of a goat that appeared to slowly age and then grow young again. She contemplated it, then moved it so it would catch the sunlight. "These idiots just don't deserve us."
"They're not all idiots," Jalaat replied breezily, blowing on her tcha. "What about Fihro? He's a real bright candle."
Vaelin laughed. "Yeah, I'm sure he'd do great in a math competition. Against a giuji. Well, actually, I'm not so sure."
"Depends on the giuji."
"Yeah. Some of them are quite clever."
"I'd really like to see that."
Vaelin sat and started laying out coils of virgin syrillium, ordered by grade and length. There was an awkward silence. Jalaat cleared her throat.
"Um. Vaelin? Did you, by any chance, borrow my comb yesterday?"
Vaelin immediately felt the blood rush to her face. She had meant to return the comb to Jalaat's bag without her noticing. Against all reason, she felt anger toward Jalaat for pointing out the theft, even though she herself was clearly in the wrong. But she always returned things she borrowed from friends. Couldn't Jalaat have just waited and saved them both the awkwardness?
Vaelin sighed, reached into her bag, extracted the comb, and set it down on Jalaat's blanket. "Sorry," she muttered.
Jalaat stared at it, then looked up at Vaelin. Then she burst out laughing. "You were going to put it in my bag while I wasn't looking, weren't you?"
Vaelin couldn't help but grin sheepishly. "I was hoping you hadn't noticed."
"Of course I noticed. I'm the smart one, remember? But ---" Jalaat paused in the middle of her sentence.
"But what?" Vaelin said, still straightening her rows of syrillium. A shadow fell across them. She looked up to see a man looming over her blanket.
He was a big man, with thick shoulders and a neck that disappeared into his broad torso. His chest was obscured by a bushy salt-and-pepper beard, and he wore a round, red, brimless hat lined with white fur. Lightly slanted eyes gleamed bright beneath his thick brows. Over his tunic was the traditional vest of a caravan trader, silver with tiny metal beads along the fringe. His loose pantaloons were tucked into curled-toe boots, stained with snow and mud, and a thick white scar along one cheek completed the image. He might as well have had the word "Vharian" inscribed on his forehead.
"Good morning, and welcome," Vaelin said in Vharian. The man raised his black brows and responded in a voice like a fast river in spring, the syllables rolling over each other like rocks.
Vaelin held up her hands and shook her head, embarrassed.  She switched to Ivaelic. "Sorry, I only know a few words of Vharian."
"Ah, but you speak Ivaelic quite well. Rare, for a Baranaathi." The man had effortlessly switched tongues himself, with only a trace of an accent.
"Not that rare," Jalaat said. "We are part of the empire." The big man looked at her expressionlessly for a moment. 
"What can I do for you?" Vaelin said hastily, willing Jalaat to keep her mouth shut. She needed this sale badly.
The man stepped back a bit and squinted at her wares. "These sculptures are impressive. Where did you find them?"
She laughed. "I found them in my hands. Right after I made them."
He raised his thick eyebrows again. "Oh? A talented sculptor as well. Tell me, have you traveled much outside of Aabsaan?"
She glanced at Jalaat, who was staring flintily at the big man, arms crossed. "A little bit. Just to other towns in Baranaath. Why?"
"I was wondering if you knew how rare your talents truly are. Not one sculptor in a thousand is capable of such intricate work at such a small size." He squatted and picked up the goat. "And the motion is smooth. These would fetch a pretty price in Ivaelia."
"Then they'll fetch a pretty price here, won't they?" Jalaat interjected. 
The stranger smiled at her thinly. "Indeed."
Vaelin stepped between Jalaat and the Vharian. "Are you looking for anything in particular? I do take commissions."
He picked up one of the few items she had out that she had not created herself: an intricately carved syrillium ring, bisected by a sculpted crossbar. It had belonged to her mother. Attached to the outer edge of the ring, but inset in a groove so they could slide around it, were twelve long, flattened rods of semi-rigid syrillium, connected by a delicate lacework of the same material. The outer edges were as sharp as broken glass, and Vaelin had cut herself on them repeatedly over the years. 
"Be careful, that's very sharp," she said.
"You made this as well?"
"Uh... no. Not that one. And that's not for sale, by the way. But I can make you a replica that looks just like it."
The man lifted his tunic a bit to reveal a similar object wrapped around his midsection. "I have one. Tell me, do you know what this is? What it is used for?" His tone had taken on a sharp-edged intensity.
Vaelin exchanged another glance with Jalaat. "Not really, no. It's a religious thing, right?"
The man glanced behind him, then shuffled to the side a bit, as though uncomfortable. "It's called a flectarus. It's a weapon, a powerful weapon, used by the teluri. You are familiar with them, I assume?"
"Of course," she lied. In truth, Vaelin knew very little about the teluri, only what she had read in the sparse collection of storybooks and histories she had managed to borrow over the years. Most of what she knew had occurred hundreds of years in the past. She had an inkling that they were related to the Umbrata, enforcers of his will, but that was about it. She was not about to admit as much to this stranger, though.
"Indeed. Well, then you will know that to carry one of these weapons is a mark of great power --- especially one as finely crafted as that," he said, indicating her mother's flectarus. Vaelin felt a thrill course through her at the thought. Her mother, a telurix? The idea had occurred to her in the past, but she had dismissed it as a juvenile fantasy, and Mahishat had thoroughly, sometimes violently, disabused her of any such notions. Could it be true after all?
The stranger cleared his throat, startling Vaelin out of her daydream. "Based on your skill, I suspect you are a conduar. Tell me, can you see the aestus?"
"The what?" She was unfamiliar with the Ivaelic word.
"The aestus. It looks like a mist along the ground, but it glows a little, and swirls around independent of the wind. It's mostly visible in the dark."
He was obviously talking about the threads. "Oh, that. Yes, of course I can see it. Can't everyone?"
"No," the big man said. "Only conduars can see it. You've never discussed this with anyone?"
For various reasons, the aestus --- as this man called it --- had always felt like a secret, something she kept to herself. She had tried to talk to Mahishat about it, but, as with all things "mystical" and "superstitious", the conversation had quickly been shut down. And bringing the topic up with her peers had only made her feel more like an outcast. None of them knew what she was talking about.
"Not really," she said.
"Hmm. Well. I would like to make a purchase," he said.
The sudden change of subject took her aback. But she quickly collected herself. She was here to make money, not to talk about mystical phenomena. "Certainly. What would you like? I'll package it up for you."
"All of it," the man said casually. Vaelin froze in the midst of reaching for some packing cloth. "I'll take the pack as well, it'll make it easier to carry. Can you make it quick?" The man glanced behind him again. "I have business elsewhere."
Vaelin craned a bit to see what he was looking at. She saw nothing out of the ordinary --- just some of the other town craftsmen setting up their wares, people going about their business, and a few caravan guards milling about in their uniforms. Vaelin felt a surge of hatred at the sight, but forced it down.
"Are you sure? All of it?"
"Yes."
"Let's see." She did some quick mental arithmetic. "That would come to thirty-seven aurei. I'll throw in a few coils of certified virgin."
The man scratched his chin through his bushy beard. "How about thirty? If I buy it all, you don't have to sell anything else today. That must be worth something."
"Thirty-five."
"Done."
She bowed quickly. One lesson from Mahishat that she had taken to heart was not to look too sharply at good fortune; it was skittish at the best of times, and liable to spook if you examined it too closely. "It'll just be a few minutes," she said.
The man grunted. "Oh yes, where are my manners? I am Belosveka Aravoskia, from Vhar."
"Really?" said Vaelin drily. The man gave her a blank stare. "Sorry. I'm Vaelin. Thanasavarian is my family name. From... Baranaath."
"I doubt that," the man replied absently, glancing behind him once more. "Look, not to rush you, but I am in somewhat of a hurry." He leaned in a bit, conspiratorially. "Actually, I'm not supposed to be doing this. I'm supposed to wait for the other traders to get here. Level playing field and all that, you understand. But I couldn't resist getting a bit of a jump on the day."
"Right, sure." Vaelin said. She had never heard of such a provision before, but who knew what strange new rules the guilds had enacted? After the Purity Certification debacle two years prior, it was best to just go with the flow where the guild rules were concerned.
She finished wrapping the merchandise up in her pack, realizing belatedly that she had forgotten to charge him for the pack itself. Too late now. She was still making a tidy profit, and she could always make herself another pack. She stood and handed it to him; he was at least a head taller than she was, and twice as broad, and she suddenly felt intimidated.
He took the pack easily with one hand and slung it over a meaty shoulder. Vaelin winced a bit at that --- some of those sculptures were delicate. Not her problem now, but it was odd that he would be so careless. "What are you planning to do with all of those sculptures, again?"
He looked bemused. "Sell them, of course. What else?" 
"Well, you might want to be a bit more gentle, that's all." The man said nothing, but extended his hand, which she took in both of hers. "Thank you for your custom. Next time I'll have some more inventory for you."
"Yes, yes," he said. "By the way, I will be in the common room of the Blue Knife tavern tonight, if you'd like to know more about that flectarus. I would be honored to drink with you."
She smiled and bowed as demurely as she could manage. "The honor would be mine."
Belosveka smiled briefly, a flicker of expression that vanished just as quickly. "Also, I would take that flectarus and depart now if I were you. I am not the only one in violation of the guild rules, after all." He glanced at Jalaat, nodded at both of them, and, without another word, headed for the opposite corner of the market.
Vaelin let her breath out. Thirty-five aurei. She could barely believe her fortune. Things like this never, ever happened to her. She smiled as she watched as the stranger's broad back disappear into the crowd.
"Well," said Jalaat, "That was a hell of a short work day for you."
Vaelin just shook her head, her legs suddenly weak. Thirty-five aurei. Her smile turned into a grin.
Jalaat punched her in the shoulder, hard.
"Hey!" Vaelin yelped.
"Hey, yourself. What do you think you're doing?"
"Um. Making a shit-shovel of money?"
Jalaat shook her head, as if amazed at Vaelin's naivety. "Don't you think that was a little weird? Some stranger, just buying you out like that?"
"Yeah, sure. He's crazy, or drunk or something. Who cares? Why can't you just be happy for me?"
"He wants something from you. Things like this don't just happen, not to people like us. You should know that by now. You more than anyone."
Vaelin's anger returned in a flash. Couldn't she just have this one moment of happiness? Was that too much to ask? She started packing up her space, angrily shoving items into her bag.
"Vae," Jalaat said. "Vae, wait."
But Vaelin was already stalking away, fuming, into the alley.

Her mood brightened up again after a few blocks. Thirty-five aurei. She grinned at the weight of the purse clinking against her hip, her step lightened by the missing pack. So what if Jalaat was jealous, or whatever? This was Vaelin's triumph, and she wasn't going to let anyone spoil it. Everyone deserved a good day once a while.
She emerged from the alley and started across a sunny courtyard. Opposite the alley, the remains of a building lay in a tumble of sand-colored bricks, a legacy of a Sky Finger's destruction, but even that didn't darken her thoughts. With this much money, she might even be able to afford some books of her own. Perhaps she would invest in something about the modern teluri. Her grin kept returning, an unusual guest on her face.
The guest departed abruptly when two figures stepped out from behind the brick pile. Although they were backlit by the morning sun, she knew immediately who they were, by the louche posture and arrogant shove of the hips: Fihro, son of the Ahctan of Aabsaan, and his fat lackey, Musab. Fihro was further recognizable by his crippled left hand, which he kept partially hidden behind his body. Once, when Vaelin was fourteen, he had come to Mahishat complaining of a weakness in the blood --- a transparent lie, at least to Vaelin --- and she had been forced to service him. She had complied, but sullenly, staring pointedly at his shriveled fingers the whole time. He had demanded that she look him in the eye, but she had refused. The coward had resented her ever since. She clutched her carpet to her chest and froze.
"There she is." Fihro it said congenially, as though they were all guests at the same party, and they had been eagerly awaiting her arrival. "The golden girl. Our favorite little farkha." He sauntered closer. "You did well today, didn't you, you little thief? Again."
She took a step back, but Musab had circled around to the other side so that they were bracketing her. Anger and fear mixed into a hot ball in her stomach. "What do you want?"
"Well," Fihro said, "we want what is owed to us. To the city. I don't think you were planning to pay your taxes. Were you? No. Not a little farkha thief like you. My father is entirely too lenient on such leeches. So I'm going to take the taxes from you now, before you have a chance to squirrel it all away in that little witch's hole of yours."
A small crowd had gathered during this exchange, and Vaelin heard muttering, and heard the words "farkha" and "thief" repeated. She saw a few older villagers make the warding gesture, two fingers touching the forehead and flicking away. Fear washed through her again, chilling her limbs.
She knew, from numerous qhurasothi sparring sessions with them at the dhoja, that she could take either Fihro or Musab individually. But qhurasothi was an individual art, designed for one-on-one combat, a fact which Fihro and Musab knew quite well. And she had no idea what the crowd would do, even if she did manage to best the two boys. She thought briefly about trying to use the flectarus, but she had no idea how to operate it, had not even known it was a weapon until this morning. 
The mood in the air was getting ugly. Few people really liked Fihro, but he was the son of the Ahctan, and the old tribal allegiances still held sway here, regardless of Ventacan law. And Vaelin's little vice, and her profession, were well-known. Medicine girls were not whores, everyone agreed on that, but they were still not seen as equals. Her farkha blood didn't help matters, either. Mahishat had warned her against appearing to do too well, against "putting on airs", but what choice had she had?
"Let's see that purse of yours, whore."
"I'm not a whore," Vaelin said, her voice low.
"That's true. Whores get paid," Fihro replied jovially.
She tried to drop into fighting stance, but suddenly Musab's arms were wrapping her from behind. She began to throw him, but stopped herself. What would be the point? She couldn't fight them both, much less the entire crowd. She stopped struggling. Said nothing as Fihro drew his knife with his good hand. She was breathing hard as he took her purse and sliced through the leather strap holding it to her belt, but still she said nothing.
Fihro laughed. "Heavy. Very heavy. I think perhaps there are some back taxes in here as well. What do you think?" he said, turning to the crowd. There were a few half-hearted jeers, but mostly just a quiet murmuring. No one made a move to stop him. 
He laughed again, then patted Vaelin lightly on the cheek with his crippled hand. "Don't worry, farkha. I'm sure you'll make the money back soon enough. You people seem to have a talent for that sort of thing."
With a nod from Fihro, Musab released his grip. Vaelin's legs felt suddenly weak, too weak to stand, so she sank down and sat on the ground, trying to stop her chin from shaking, trying to stop her eyes from tearing up. She put her head in her hands. The murmuring from the crowd quieted and they began to disperse.
As the crowd was leaving the courtyard, Vaelin felt a sudden rage course through her like a flame through loose hay. She stood, and a few heads turned toward her, including Fihro's.
"You pathetic fucking bent-dick cripple!" she shouted.
Several people in the crowd gasped audibly. Musab's mouth dropped open like a trap door. Fihro's face turned white. Vaelin never knew what happened next, because she took off sprinting in the opposite direction, and no one bothered to chase her.

By the time she made it to the house, she was out of breath and red in the face, both from the run and from the shame. An old man she knew, Ohleb, saw her running by and called after her to slow down. Life would be over soon enough, he said. But she couldn't slow down. Even after the immediate danger had passed, she felt a dread in the pit of her stomach for what she had done, and running seemed like the only way to keep that feeling from enveloping her whole, like a snake eating a mouse.
She stopped at the front door and caught her breath, thinking over what she would tell Mahishat. It was certain that the old lady would find out about the incident sooner or later. Better that she hear it from Vaelin directly rather than second-hand, which would add deception to her list of transgressions.
She wiped her feet fastidiously on the woven mat, then took off her sandals as she went inside. The house was small, but larger than many in Aabsaan, and the outside of its thick brick walls were enameled in a rich blue, a sign of Mahishat's wealth and standing. More importantly, no Sky Finger had touched down near Mahishat's house in more than twenty years, a sure sign of her favor in the eyes of the Luminae. But the floor was still dirt, the rough-hewn wooden rafters still splintery, the square walls still crazed with cracks from years of temperature swings.  It was still Aabsaan.
"Well. How did we do?" Mahishat said, wiping her hands on her apron as she walked in from the apothecary. Although an elder, she was still physically strong, with iron-grey hair tied up above her stout frame. Her hands were like slabs of salt, cracked and ashen from years of working with chemicals and potions. And she was staring now at the empty spot on Vaelin's belt where her purse should have been.
Vaelin couldn't help it; she began to cry again as she recounted the scene in the square. She stopped short at the point where Fihro began to walk away with her --- their --- money. Mahishat looked at her shrewdly.
"And then?"
"And then," Vaelin began, then stopped, then began again. "And then I called him a cripple," she said, voice barely above a whisper.
Mahishat crossed her arms and said nothing at all. Vaelin stood with her eyes downcast, fidgeting with the carpet, which she was still holding. "I don't know why I did it. I just couldn't stand it. I had to do something." Mahishat still said nothing. "Please," said Vaelin.
Abruptly, Mahishat turned and left the room. Vaelin's stomach dropped yet again, adrenaline washing through her. She wiped her palms on the carpet in her arms, but they still felt wet. Mahishat returned with the pain potion.
Vaelin began to shake her head. "No."
"You know what has to happen now."
"No," said Vaelin, her voice quavering.
"Turn around."
Shaking now, she turned and knelt, facing her own sleeping alcove. She was filled with a sudden hatred for it, for its paltry matted bedding, its packed dirt floor, its small shelves with her few belongings stacked atop each other. She thought of all the men she had serviced here, the thin curtain letting in its feeble light, just dim enough to hide her expression. 
When she had first been brought to this house, she had been a small child, and Mahishat had taken care of her, in her rough way. Vaelin had, of course, missed her mother, but Mahishat had been nurturing enough. But as Vaelin got older, her duties became more onerous, until at last her true purpose was revealed: she was to be a medicine girl, a living vessel for the transmission of herbs and potions.
Vaelin had, understandably, objected to her new duties. Mahishat had not been pleased. But after enough patients came through, enough beatings, enough doses of pain potion, enough nights without food, Vaelin had learned to accept her fate, keeping her tears stored up for when there was no one around to see them. She had swallowed the medicine and passed it along through the medium of her body, as she was taught to do. But she had always hated this place. This was where she had slept for over twelve years, but it had never been her home.
"If I punish you sufficiently, we may yet be able to salvage our standing. This is necessary, for both of us. You know this, don't you? Tunic off."
Vaelin didn't look back or say a word. It was too late, and Mahishat was right --- she had known this would happen. She shrugged her tunic off her shoulders and let it slide down her arms, then sat hunched forward, her arms across her chest. She was in tears already when Mahishat began dripping the potion on her skin.

# Chapter 2 #

Mahishat let her lay on her pallet for a while before sending her out to fetch water. She lay curled up, facing the wall, her back still burning. Despite years of enduring the same punishment, her skin was still not as tough as she wished it to be. The pain potion didn't cause any permanent damage; it just caused an excruciating burning sensation until the counter-potion was applied. But it did leave a whitish residue, which stained her dark skin in a distinctive pattern of overlapping circles. Anyone who saw these scars would know what had happened to her, the traditional treatment for those of her status.
After a half hour, she got up and gingerly put her tunic back on, then picked up the shoulder pole and buckets and took them outside. The pole stung where it rubbed her welts. She looked behind her, making sure Mahishat wasn't watching, then set down the buckets and walked quickly around to the back of the house. She stood, facing the dusty blue brick, the sun beating down on her head, and let the rage fill her. Her fists were clenched so tightly that her fingernails were cutting her palms, but she didn't care. The heat, the pressure built in her chest until, finally, she screamed through her clenched teeth, spittle flying onto the dry ground. She spun and kicked the wall as hard as she could, sending a jolt up her leg and leaving her foot tingling. A brief flash of fear. Had Mahishat heard the thump? No.
Her fists still clenching and unclenching, shoulders and jaw still tight, she fetched her pole and buckets and continued walking toward town.
Her route took her past the police barracks, and she got the usual whistles and jeers, which she tried to ignore. Was there an extra note of derision in some of the catcalls this time? Had they heard about her newly lowered status? Or was it the same as always? At the best of times, most of Aabsaan's population was hopelessly ignorant, provincial, and xenophobic, and the police were the worst of the bunch. It was impossible to tell whether they had heard what had happened, or were merely being themselves. What else could you expect from men who believed that lying with an herb-infused medicine girl could cure their aches and pains? Or maybe no one really believed that. It was hard to tell.
She passed by the ruins of a building that no one seemed to own and no one had bothered to clean up. The last Sky Finger had spun through town in a strange, curving path, destroying only three buildings on this street. The townsfolk were quick to assign meaning to the destruction; obviously, those who had died had been sinners, or the Luminae wouldn't have flicked them into oblivion. Vaelin had enjoyed a good laugh at that. She knew one of the old women who had died, a bitter old crone who had once accused Vaelin of "seducing" her half-wit son. From a scriptural standpoint, there hadn't been anyone less "sinful" in all of Aabsaan. But still, she had died. There was no meaning to it. The Sky Fingers came and went as they always did, bringing whirling death, which was its own absolution. The only kind that was real.
As she often did while walking this route, Vaelin fantasized about leaving Aabsaan behind and going to a big city, one where people weren't too afraid to actually build something of substance. Thelenza, perhaps. The edicts of Ventacan society --- absolute adherence to law and order, a meritocracy for civil servants rather than pure nepotism --- were only loosely enforced in Baranaath. They had been shoved down the throats of the tribal elders who, by necessity, had been appointed as Ahctans when Baranaath was carved up into provinces after the war. Unification had brought stability to the tribes, but that didn't mean that the tribal ways had vanished. Here, women --- or lower-class women, at least --- were still chattel, no matter what the law said. They could be molested and abused with impunity. Although the Ventacans had forced the Baranaathi to allow girls to go to school, and even to train in Qhurasothi, Vaelin had no illusions about her place. Even worse than being a girl, she was a Kulnaran girl, a farkha, and, even worse than that, a medicine girl and known petty criminal. She was one step above the addicts, in the eyes of Baranaathi society. The only thing that kept her from being handed around like a minuaj pipe was Mahishat's status, which remained formidable. Vaelin was not quite seen as Mahishat's daughter, since she clearly wasn't, but some of Mahishat's esteem still rubbed off on her, no matter how often she had been used.
In Thelenza, though, people remembered that most of the Luminae had been female, and women of every class were treated as equal to men of the same class. And in Thelenza, no one would know that Vaelin sometimes borrowed things, or that she had lain with dozens upon dozens of men. And in Thelenza, a cockroach like Fihro would never pass the civil service exams, and would never have real power. Here, he would simply inherit it, and there was nothing anyone could do about it.
There was a long line at the well, so she set her carrying pole down and fished her minuaj pipe out of her satchel and had a smoke. The icy feeling spread through her skull, calming her jangling nerves. It was considered a bit gauche to smoke in public, but she was beyond caring. A number of the women in line were gossiping quietly, and she thought she caught a few glances in her direction, but she couldn't be sure. At any rate, no one seemed interested in talking to her, so she just waited, waving away the flies that hovered around her sweaty forehead.
While she stood, she worried about what might happen if Fihro refused to accept her apology, refused to accept that Mahishat's discipline had been enough. Mahishat was known and respected, even slightly feared, but Fihro was notoriously headstrong and vindictive. If he decided to press suit in the courts, he would surely win, and her punishment would be tenfold worse than what she had already endured. A man she didn't really know, a foreigner like herself, had been punished for a similar offense several years prior, and he had disappeared for months. He still limped a bit when he walked.
Eventually her turn at the well came. She paid three coppers to the old woman seated by the well and drew up her two bucketfuls of silty water. The woman gave her a gap-toothed smile. At least one elderly lady thought she was worth smiling at. That had to be good for something.
She shouldered her now agonizing pole and gritted her teeth all the way back to the house. Mahishat was waiting at the front door and took the buckets from her, lifting the pole easily.
"Tomorrow we go to the palace together and you will apologize to Fihro," Mahishat said. Her tone was slightly conciliatory; perhaps she was sorry about what she had done, and what Vaelin would have to do the next day, when she would need to abase herself before someone she hated.
Vaelin nodded, and tried to put the whole thing out of her mind as she went inside and bathed with the fresh water. She distracted herself with the idea of talking to Belosveka and finding out more about the weapon in her possession. A flectarus! She had read about them, of course, but never knew what they actually were. She had pictured something more akin to a curved sword, or perhaps some kind of staff. And to think that she had one, had owned one for years without knowing it. She knew that it would never work properly for her, since she had not created it, but nevertheless, it was exciting to be that close to an object of such deadly power. The fact that her mother had wielded it made it all the more intriguing.
A middle-aged patient came in complaining of augue of the legs. Privately, Vaelin thought that these kinds of complaints were pure fabrication, but she never said anything about it, even when she heard the coins change hands. Why bother? It would only earn her another dose of the potion. Mahishat at least screened the men for transmissible diseases, and she never let the truly abusive ones return for a second visit. And, of course, she kept Vaelin permeated with the herbs necessary to prevent conception. Vaelin's best bet was to let the men have their way with her, and get it over with as quickly as possible.
Mahishat came in and gave Vaelin her concoction. This one tasted sweet, with a bitter, flowery aftertaste. The patient smiled at her, as though she would be happy to see him. She didn't smile back.
That evening, she waited until Mahishat was deep into a consultation with an elderly man, who came in complaining of eye pain and difficulty focusing. Thankfully, Vaelin's services were not needed. When she slipped out the door to head to the Blue Knife, Mahishat didn't even notice.

Fihro hefted the bag of aurei, jostling it up and down in his palm. At least thirty, maybe forty pieces. He could not believe that the girl had actually spoken to him that way, and in front of witnesses, no less. She would have to be chastised. He licked his lips. No need to inform his father or any of his lickspittle peons. They would only insist that this be a matter taken up formally, in the courts; the public humiliation would have a certain appeal, but this was something he wanted to --- needed to, even --- handle himself.
He was so preoccupied with the thought that he almost ran right into the silver-cloaked back of a soldier from the caravan. The man was one in a loose line that stretched across the street while their leader spoke to a small crowd of villagers. Fihro considered upbraiding the man for getting in his way, but then thought better of it. A wise man knew when to listen and when to act, and Fihro was a wise man, even if others didn't seem to appreciate that fact.
The captain was a tall, lean man, balding, with close-cropped golden hair, a face like a split tree trunk, and a deep voice that carried well on the cool morning air. His silvery cloak, like those of his men, marked him as a Ventacan; Fihro was not familiar enough with the various insignia of the Teluric Guard to know whether they were Umbratari or just regular soldiers, but this captain had an air of authority about him that spoke of more than mere soldiering. This was a man worth knowing.
"We are looking for a girl," the captain was saying in perfect, although accented, Baranaathi. "About sixteen or seventeen summers. Dark skin, curly Kulnaran hair. Different from you. An outsider. She would have been brought here as a young child. We are offering a generous reward for anyone who leads us to her." He held up a leather purse that made a thick clinking sound as he swung it. "We don't intend to harm the girl. We just want to talk to her."
"About what?" said Fihro, stepping forward. The captain turned and smiled, as he should. As he must, regarding an equal.
"That is the Umbrata's business, friend."
"Then it is also my business. I represent the Ahctan." A small lie, but close enough to the truth. "Perhaps we could speak a bit more privately."
The captain smiled again. "Of course. Marsathi, take over." The captain handed the purse to a female soldier, who stepped forward and began to address the crowd. Fihro watched the purse change hands with some trepidation.
"Of course, as the Ahctan's representative, you'll have no need of a reward for cooperating with us, since it's your sacred duty," said the captain amiably. "Now. What do you know about a girl matching that description? Is there anyone in the village like that?"
Fihro mulled it over for a moment. Vaelin was a wicked girl, there was no doubt about that. But if the Umbratari were looking for her, she must have done something, or seen something, bigger than he had imagined her capable of. Perhaps he should find out what it was himself before giving her up. On the other hand, it wouldn't do to be seen licking the palm of the Ventacans, as though they were superior. Just because the Ahctan derived nominal authority from the Umbrata, that didn't mean that the Umbrata's mere servants were better than the son of the Ahctan himself. Unfortunately, not everyone understood this. Sometimes people had to be reminded.
The captain cleared his throat. "If you don't have information for me, I will be happy to make inquiries elsewhere. If you do happen to know something, perhaps certain arrangements can be made. An administrative fee, perhaps."
That was more like it. The money was a gesture of respect, which was all he had really wanted. "As it happens, Captain, I do know someone who matches your description. And I can tell you where she lives."

Mahishat was putting the finishing touches on a skin liniment for a patient she expected the next day when she heard a knock on the lintel. She finished measuring the powder and stirred it in, then quickly rinsed her hands. She went out into the main room to find three silvercloaks standing politely in the entryway. Their clothes were rich, but travel-worn and muddy. Each of them was armed with a hook sword on his or her hip, and the one in front also had a flectarus wrapped around her waist. She affected not to notice this last detail.
"Are you Mahishat?"
"Yes. What can I do for you?"
"We wanted to ask you about the girl, Vaelin. May we come in?"
So. The day had come. Mahishat was suddenly glad she had allowed the girl to sneak out. "Of course," she said. She drew an additional chair up to the table. "May I offer you some tcha?"
"Thank you."
She went into the herbarium and pulled down the box of tcha, as well as another, smaller vial filled with a yellowish powder. She already had a kettle of water heated up, so she simply made a teapot of tcha, then dropped a few grains of the powder into each of the three cups before filling them.
She bustled back out into the main room. One of the soldiers was sprawling in his chair, his arm draped over the back. He straightened up as she walked in. The leader, the woman who had addressed her previously, cleared her throat as she accepted her cup. Mahishat sat down opposite her.
"Well. We understand that you are the custodian of the girl, Vaelin. Is that correct?"
"Yes, I watch over her. What is this about? Is she in some kind of trouble?"
The soldier laughed, but the laughter didn't quite reach her eyes. The other two soldiers didn't even bother. "No, no. You see, it has come to our attention that the girl has certain special talents with syrillium. We are here to recruit her."
"Oh? Recruit her for what?" Mahishat feigned polite enthusiasm. The two soldiers who were not speaking had already sipped a fair bit of their tcha, but their leader had not touched hers. She had to get her to drink some, before the effects became obvious.
"A special program in Thelenza, for students who show great skill in manipulating the aestus. You have heard of the Madrium, yes?"
Mahishat nodded and smiled, playing the part. "That sounds wonderful. But where are my manners? You are honored guests here. In Baranaath, we always toast to our guests." She poured herself a glass of tcha. There was, of course, no such custom, especially with tcha.
The leader looked at her hard, then smiled, her gaze suddenly unfriendly. "Polso, Achimbor. No more tcha for you." She rose from the table, her hand on her flectarus. "Where is the girl now?"
The other two soldiers tried to rise. One of them succeeded, then stumbled and fell backward over his chair. The other simply crumpled sideways, knocking her head on the table as she fell. The leader cried out and started to draw her flectarus, only to look down and find a knife sprouting from her belly. She looked up at Mahishat in disbelief.
"I know why you are here, Umbratari scum. I knew it when you walked in the door. I knew one day, you would come for her. Well, you cannot have her."
The soldier made a choking sound, and blood welled from her mouth, dribbling down her chin and throat. She took a wobbling step forward, then collapsed to her side, finally drawing her weapon ineffectually on the way down.
And then there was another knock on the lintel.
Mahishat looked up. A tall man with blond stubble stood in the doorway, a grim look on his face. Several more soldiers crowded behind him. "We were waiting outside, so as not to alarm you by our numbers. I see that we need not have worried," he said, drawing open his flectarus.
Mahishat had never seen a flectarus in action before. It was a thing of beauty.

Jalaat was already chatting up a young, not particularly handsome, caravan trader when Vaelin arrived at the Blue Knife. As taverns went, it was not the worst; the food was decent, if you wanted to waste your drinking money on food prepared by someone else. The dramatic rise in prices when the caravan was in town was a well-worn joke among the locals.  Ah, the caravan must be here; the ale has become drinkable!
The common room was crowded and warm, the scent of fresh flatbread mingling with spilled ale and unwashed hair. A fire was crackling merrily in the hearth, more for the sake of appearance than for warmth.
Vaelin bypassed Jalaat, who didn't even deign to glance her way, and wound her way through the crowd until she found Belosveka. He was holed up in the darkest available corner, where a section of wall jutted out and created a private nook. A pitcher of ale, half empty, already sat on the low table. Vaelin sat down.
"Ah, Vaelin! Good evening. Have you been enjoying your sudden fortune?" he asked, setting down his cup. His smile vanished when he saw her expression.
"Not exactly," she said, quietly. His question had ripped open the scab of her humiliation, forcing her to feel the moment again. She slid into the booth and rested her clenched fists on the table, glaring at its scarred surface.
Belosveka smiled again, sadly this time. He took her cup and poured her a generous helping of ale. "A toast, then. To the transience of wealth."
She sighed and picked up her cup with both hands. Vaelin wasn't usually keen on drinking, especially in public. Alcohol lowered her defenses, making it too easy to cross certain lines. Too easy to confide in people who would only end up turning on her. Too easy to lose control of her temper and say something that Mahishat would make her regret. But Mahishat wasn't here, and Vaelin was almost out of minuaj, and she needed a drink. 
She raised her cup and bowed her head in the Vharian fashion, eliciting a surprised chuckle from Belosveka. "To the return of said wealth."
"Well. Here we are. Ah, thank you." The barman set down a large plate of flatbread and a bowl of oil-soaked mushrooms. Belosveka tore off a chunk of bread and began eating with gusto. "You know, you can't get mushrooms like this outside of Baranaath. I never tire of them."
"Try eating them every fucking day for twelve years."
Belosveka stopped chewing for a minute, then resumed, chuckling again. "You are as spicy as this dish."
"So," she said, taking another drink and ignoring his comment. "Those things I have --- the yarae --- they're some kind of weapon?" 
"Yes, from Kulnarra. Yarae is Kulnarran for 'fireflies'. You don't see them around much any more, not since the war."
Some of Vaelin's features --- her gray-brown skin, her yellow eyes --- were clearly Kulnarran, even if she was a mongrel. How much had this stranger guessed about her heritage? She suddenly envied him for knowing something about her mother's homeland that she herself had not. In truth, Vaelin knew very little of Kulnarra, and even less of her mother.
"How do you know about Kulnarran weapons? Have you been there?" she asked, hoping her voice didn't betray how badly she wanted to know.
"I spent some time there," he said. His voice was strangely flat, as though the mention of Kulnarra there brought up things he would rather forget.
They ate and drank in awkward silence for a few moments. Finally, Vaelin couldn't stop herself from blurting out the question she wanted to ask. "Are you a telurix?"
The big man leaned back, crossing his arms. "Well, telurix is a Ventacan word. I'm a conduar, but we have a different system in Vhar. But, yes, I have trained a bit in Teluro, which is the Ventacan style of telumancy. You have heard of Teluro? Good. Because I believe you have the makings of a telurix yourself. Your talent with syrillium is highly unusual. Sculpting is not all one needs to be a telurix, but it's a damn good start."
The idea soaked into Vaelin slowly, like oil soaking into flatbread. Vaelin knew she was nothing special, except in the negative sense, as someone who didn't belong. Any flights of fancy regarding her own potential had been beaten out of her at a young age, literally and figuratively. But that hadn't stopped her from fantasizing, reading herself into the lead role of each precious book she got her young hands on. How many times had she dreamed of being a telurix ---  Uldain the Lash, perhaps, or Phaernatta of Tev --- slicing a bloody, righteous path through history? And then, perhaps returning to  bring justice to everyone who had wronged her. There were so many to choose from. 
She drained her cup, and Belosveka poured her another. She was starting to feel a little loose, like her senses were a second or two behind her movements. "I thought teluri never traveled alone," she said. "Where's the rest of your brachius?"
"The word is brachiarus, not brachius. And we can travel alone perfectly fine. Brachiari are for combat."
"Oh. I thought you were psychically linked to each other or something."
"In a way, yes. But it's voluntary. The leader of a brachiarus directs the fighters below her, and is herself directed by a conduar further up the structure. Think of the branches of a tree. As each branch splits into smaller branches, so the control flows through the brachiarus. A fighter becomes like another limb of the one above her, but she retains her own thoughts and will, much as the limb of an octopus --- do you know of these? No? Oh. Well, each fighter remains herself, and yet, if she allows it, her movements are coordinated with the others. The power comes with precision, and efficiency."
"But what about the aculae in your skin? Don't they mean you give up control?"
"No, no. An aculus is simply a conduit for the aestus, like a sort of funnel for magic. Embedded at the proper location on the body, along the correct meridian, an aculus allows more information to flow into the body. Without aculae, magic may flow along any meridian, but it is diffuse, unfocused."
Vaelin realized she was gnawing at one of her fingernails while he talked. She sat on her hands to stop herself. "Can I see them?"
He raised a thick eyebrow, then rolled up his sleeve. The aculus was small, almost small enough to escape notice if you weren't looking for it, but it caught the light like a piece of glass as he turned his arm. "The needle is beneath the skin; what you see is the cap. Some people are vain about them, flashy colors and designs and such. I prefer subtlety."
Vaelin leaned back, cradling her cup. "So, when did you ---"
Belosveka stood up suddenly, sloshing his ale on the table. "Excuse me for a moment." He disappeared around the corner. Vaelin heard a bit of commotion, but when she scooted out from her niche and craned around to see, it was was already over. She caught a glimpse of waning daylight closing around a few silvercloaks, then the murmur of voices resumed. Belosveka returned and sat down.
"What was that about?"
"Oh, nothing, just some caravan business. Now, what were we discussing? Ah, yes, magic. Have you ever thought about attending the Madrium?"
"No. I mean, I've heard of it, but going there myself?" She laughed. "No."
"Well, perhaps you should. From the Madrium come the elite, the leaders of Ventacan society, and therefore all of Ivaelia and middle Telua. Except Vhar, of course." He smiled. "We have our own schools. But there are those, like myself, who have studied more than one idiom." He leaned over and poured Vaelin another cupful of ale, then one for himself. "Another toast: To all that we have to learn."
They drained their cups. Vaelin was feeling quite fuzzy around the edges now. She filled Belosveka's cup this time, then her own. She hadn't remembered the ale being this good at the Blue Knife. Maybe they really did make it better when the caravan came to town.
She was about to comment on this when another trader stumbled into their alcove, a blotch of ale darkening his dirty shirt. "Hoi," he said, slurring his words. "You're a pretty little birdie. How'd you like some gold? You speak any Ivaelic? Huh?"
Vaelin was mustering her most venomous reply when Belosveka interjected. "You would speak to my daughter like this, in front of me?"
The trader swung his head toward Belosveka. "Your daughter? She doesn't look like you. You just want this piece of ass for yourself, don't you? You just ---"
He never got to finish his sentence, because Belosveka was suddenly, somehow, behind him. It happened so fast and so smoothly that Vaelin didn't even register that Belosveka had moved, but then his arm was wrapped around the trader's throat and he had taken a step back, so that the trader's body was bent backward over his knee, the man's head straining forward with the weight of the big Vharian's chest. The man made a snorting sound, scrabbling desperately for purchase, and then gradually went slack. Belosveka let him roll off onto the bench, where his head thunked against the rough timber of the table.
"He'll sleep that off and think that he just passed out," Belosveka said. He didn't even appear to be winded. "However, I think perhaps it is time to leave, malishka."
"Malishka?"
"Sorry, a term of affection in Vhar," he said absently, checking around the corner to see if they had drawn any attention. Apparently satisfied, he grunted and shifted the trader's limp form into a more natural-looking position, then put a few coins on the table. "Let's go."
The wind was gusty as they stepped outside the Blue Knife, the last of the sunlight fading into deeper shades of blue. The wooden sign was swinging and creaking, as were several other signs on the same street: crossed shafts of wheat for a grain and sundries shop, a needle and spindle for a seamstress. The walls everywhere were in poor repair, peeling plaster and wind-pitted masonry. A small dust devil formed and dissolved in the street.
"I am staying at another inn. At my age, I prefer my accommodations a bit less rough than my drinking establishments. So we part ways here. But I think, perhaps, you should consider coming with the caravan to Thelenza."
The idea made her grin. She had fantasized about it many times, but actually, really going there? The very word, "Thelenza", held such weight. It was a storied city, seat of the Nasura --- the organ of Ventacan religion, and, therefore, the governing body of all of Ivaelia. And towering above the Nasura stood its supreme leader, the Umbrata. Even in Baranaath, the Umbrata's hand lay heavily on the lives of his subjects. Equally storied were Thelenza's wonders: the towering Stormwall that surrounded the city; the massive stone fortress that was the Warda, containing the Umbratorium, the Umbrata's sumptuous palace; the Madrium, with its glittering crystaline walls and strange, self-reflective shape. And waiting in the shadows, the Yewiya.
"I'll think about it," she said. But she already knew what she wanted to do.

She hurried down the street to escape the wind. Her mind was so wrapped up in thoughts of Thelenza --- and still quite a bit fuzzy from the ale --- that she didn't notice the figure blocking the alley in front of her for a few moments. But she heard the footfalls behind her once she stopped.
Fihro stepped forward into a pool of moonlight, a knife gleaming in his hand. A stream of glowing aestus swirled around his feet, winding away down the length of the alley. Vaelin turned around to run.
Musab stayed in the shadows before her, but he grinned out of the darkness. He took a step forward. She tried to bolt toward him, but he stuck out his arm and grabbed her, then slammed her into the wall, scraping her shoulder and knocking the breath out of her at the same time. He quickly wrapped her in a wrestler's hold, one that she couldn't easily break out of.
Fihro stepped forward, chuckling quietly. "Oh, you don't quit easily, do you, farkha?" A little of his spit flew into her face as he said the word, and she winced away from him. The wash of cheap plum liquor on his breath made her eyes water.
"What do you want?"
"Well. Someone is looking for you, and they are going to find you. But we're going to have a little fun with you first. Right, Musab? Yes. A little fun. And then we're going to take you to the Umbratori and Musab here is going to collect a reward. I don't know what you did, but I'm guessing you do, don't you, farkha?"
"What are you talking about? I don't ---"
"Don't what? Don't remember this afternoon? Don't remember how you insulted me, insulted my house with your vile profanity? Well, I will make you remember." 
He reached out to grab at her tunic, and she instinctively raised her satchel to block him. He grabbed the satchel instead, and ripped it out of her hands. "Let's see what we have in here." Reaching inside, he pulled out a small syrillium sculpture of a horse, one of her favorite early pieces. She had made it for her mother before she died, a remarkable feat for such a young child. He held it up in the moonlight, squinting.
"Give me that!" She snatched for it with her free arm and succeeded in grabbing a leg of the sculpture, but Fihro snatched it back and the leg snapped off in her hand, cutting her thumb as it did. Then, almost casually, Fihro backhanded her across the face. Her head snapped around and colored blotches swam in her vision.
"You little rat. You filthy farkha." He stepped in closer, boxing her in. He grabbed her by the throat with his crippled hand, and, with his knife reversed, ripped her tunic down off one shoulder, scraping her skin as he did so. She screamed, and he tightened his grip on her throat, pressing the cold tip of his knife against her exposed breast.
Rage gripped her. She let him slide a little closer, letting out a whimper as he dug the knife in, not quite cutting her. She lolled her head forward a bit as though giving up.
"Yes, that's better. Now we'll see what ---"
She snapped her head back into Musab's face. He cursed and his grip loosened on her arms enough for her to reach around Fihro's back and stab him with the broken horse's leg. He shrieked, then suddenly went quiet.
Vaelin felt the blood rush to her head. She heard a strange warbling sound, almost a pulsing, just quiet enough that she wasn't sure if she was really hearing it or if it was only in her mind. Time slowed. The aestus from the alley appeared to swirl up around them, one tendril of it glowing like a ghostly rope between her and Fihro, and it seemed tangible, as though she could pull on it and he would move. Like a puppet.
Experimentally, she thought about Fihro lifting his arm. His arm raised up. She didn't have time to try anything else, because Musab, who had staggered backward a few steps, now rushed in again to regain his hold on her. She ducked down and to the side and, at the same time, thought about Fihro's knife hand, which was still dangling at chest level.
Fihro's knife came up. Musab staggered back, a black flood gushing from his throat in the moonlight. Vaelin gasped, and, just as suddenly, the thread of control was broken. Fihro dropped the knife, which made a dull thunk in the dust of the alley as Musab collapsed against the wall, blood gushing over his hands. His look of surprise slowly faded into a dull weariness.
Vaelin backed down the alley a few steps, clutching her satchel to her chest and attempting to hold her tunic together. Fihro stared at her like she had sprouted spider legs from her back.
"Witch," he whispered. "Witch! You did this!"
Vaelin said nothing, knowing that it was true. She had done it, somehow. She took a step toward him, and he stumbled backward and fell in the dust. "Witch! I'm going to tell my father. I'm going to tell the town guard!"
"You do that," she said. She felt a strange sense of calm, and, after a moment, recognized it as an absence of fear. Rationally, she knew she should still be afraid, should be much more afraid now than before, but when she looked for the fear inside herself, it just wasn't there. For the moment, at least, it was intoxicating.
She heard footsteps behind her and whirled around, feeling ready for anything. A large figure was framed in the lantern light at the end of the alleyway, and it was moving toward her. She heard Fihro get up and run away in the opposite direction, and knew without looking that he was no longer a threat. Her senses seemed strangely heightened. She could almost smell Fihro's fear. She could definitely smell Musab's blood, a rich, metallic tang.
The figure got closer, and she recognized him: Belosveka. He hurried up the alley, took in Musab's slumped corpse, Vaelin's torn clothing, and Fihro's disappearing form. "What has happened here?"
Vaelin felt an insane giggle trying to work its way up to her mouth, and pressed it down. "They were waiting for me. When I came out of the pub."
"They attacked you?"
She nodded. She was still staring at Musab's body, his dark blood soaking into the dust. "Fihro, he had a knife. He took my bag, and broke my horse, but I still had a piece of it in my hand. And then he came at me and... and I stabbed him in the back with it. And then..."
Belosveka's look was intense. "And then?"
"And then I was inside his head, somehow. I don't know. I was controlling him. I made him kill Musab. It was like I was using his arms, as though they were my arms. I don't know!"
Belosveka stared at her. "You have harnessed the aestus, seized control of another, and with no training, and no aculae." A note of wonder had crept into his voice. "You may have even more potential than I thought. But now, we must do something about this." He indicated the body. Vaelin caught herself. Body? This lifeless thing had, moments before, been a boy she had known. Not someone she had liked, but a person, who spoke and moved and breathed. 
Belosveka looked around, trying several doors until he found one that was unlocked, a storeroom in the back of a bakery. They dragged Musab into the room and stashed him in a corner. Vaelin's sense of detached calm remained, as though none of this were real, as if there were another world hidden behind a paper screen, and what she was experiencing was just a shifting image. A shadowbox play.
"Now you must think about what to do next. The other boy, what was his name?"
"Fihro."
"Yes, Fihro. He will most certainly bring trouble for you. He will probably try to blame you for the murder."
As soon as she heard that word, murder, her calm vanished and was replaced by shock. She had killed Musab. He was a bastard, and he had deserved to die, but still. She had killed him. She was suddenly very dizzy. What was she supposed to do now?
Belosveka saw the panic on her face and put his hands on her shoulders, looking her in the eyes. "Malishka. Listen to me. You must decide. Stay here and face the consequences of what you have done, or flee with me on the caravan. I will hide you among my people. We leave at dawn --- if you come with us, you may be able to escape before they have a chance to find you. But you must decide."
"I need to go home. I need to think."
"I'm afraid we don't have time for such luxuries, Vaelin. Vaelin!"
But she was already running.

The lanterns weren't lit when she got to the house, which was her first indication that something was wrong. Mahishat always left at least one lantern burning when Vaelin was out after dark. Harsh though she might be, Mahishat was thoughtful. But tonight, the house was as dark as the stagnant pond behind it.
She slowed as she approached the front door, which was wide open. She saw the blood first, pooled black in the moonlight, just like Musab's, then Mahishat's headless body on the floor beside it. Three other bodies wearing darkly shining cloaks were scattered around the room, two slumped over chairs, one on the floor with what looked like Mahishat's knife sticking out of his chest. Even in the dim light, she could tell that the two on the floor had been poisoned --- they had the telltale swelling around their throats, and their tongues were distended. She felt her bile rise with the smell of blood and urine. Then she saw Mahishat's head. It was hanging by the hair from a rafter in the center of the room, dripping slowly, a sleepy, relaxed look on its face. Vaelin threw up, the smell of it adding to the overall stink and making her even more sick.
Belosveka arrived a few moments later and took in the scene soberly. "Get what you need," he said quietly. "Do not look too long at this. It will not help you."
Vaelin fell against the doorframe and leaned into it, her hands covering her mouth. "No, no, no."
"I am sorry, malishka. I don't know what happened here, but whatever it was, you cannot stay here."
She sank down and sat against the doorframe, her knees pulled to her chest. Belosveka stepped past her and looked around. "Is this alcove where you sleep?" She nodded numbly. He came back and took her satchel from her hands, then began gathering her possessions and putting them inside. He paused when he got to her mother's syrillium amulet, but then put that in the satchel as well. Her mother's flectarus was nowhere to be seen.
"Do you have a warm cloak? A coat, perhaps?" She nodded again and pointed. He got the cloak and then crouched next where she sat, shivering.
"We must leave. You must leave this place, forever. Do you understand? You cannot stay here!"
Vaelin sobbed. Shouldering her satchel himself, Belosveka put an arm around her shoulders and gently helped her to stand. "Come. We have some work to do."

Belosveka's servants were already awake and preparing to leave when he arrived, Vaelin in tow. He took several of them aside and had a hushed conversation, gesturing periodically at Vaelin and Aabsaan in general. The servants nodded, saying little. Finally, Belosveka came back.
"They are prepared to take you in, and to shelter you as we cross the Whirling Wastes. I have told them to treat you as one of my own, which means you will work. Halavansa has a little bit of Ivaelic, so she'll get you oriented. I have other matters to attend to." He put his hand on her shoulder and gave her a small smile. "Things will get better. Rely on yourself."
"Wait. What makes you think they won't find me here?"
"I have an idea, a way to put them on a false trail. Don't worry yourself about that."
Vaelin looked at him warily. She had composed herself somewhat since leaving the house, and had begun to think about the situation, and the more she thought about it, the stranger it seemed. 
"Look," she said. "I'm very grateful to you. I don't know what I would have done if you hadn't been there. But why are you helping me? You don't even know me."
He looked off toward Aabsaan, or perhaps toward Vhar, which lay in the same direction. "You remind me of someone I once knew."
He patted her on the shoulder, then walked off into the night. One of the servants, a girl about Vaelin's age, approached her. "You will to help me, okay?" The girl's Ivaelic was halting and almost incomprehensible, but her smile was kind.
Vaelin nodded and followed her to the wain.

Jalaat awoke tied to a post, her arms painfully jammed behind her. Her left eye was swollen shut and there was a crust of blood on her nostrils that stung and pulled her skin when she tried to move her mouth. She only remembered flashes of the night before: drinking with Thalio, the handsome young trader from... Where was it? Oh yes, Doriola. It seemed absurd now, talking and laughing like that.
 Why was she here? Was there some crime she had committed, some transgression that she didn't remember? The people in the copper cloaks had dragged her out of the Blue Knife, had thrown the protesting Thalio to the ground like a bag of grain and then knocked her unconscious, presumably to carry her here. Wherever that was.
She had woken up at some point during the journey and had begun screaming, which was when the beating started. She stopped screaming pretty quickly, and now she had a wad of cloth shoved into her mouth, with another length laid over the top of that and tied tightly around the post behind her head. Her clothes were intact, and, aside from the beating, they hadn't molested her that she could tell. So what did they want?
A door opened behind her and a shaft of morning light spread out on the far wall. She was in some kind of storeroom, that much she could see clearly. She felt the rope holding her arms to the post loosen, then the same for the cloth pulling her head back. She didn't have time to examine the room further because someone grabbed her under the arms and raised her to her feet, then hauled her out into the sunlight.
There was a crowd gathered outside. A perimeter of silver-cloaked men and women surrounded a circle of bare paving stones. She recognized the market square. The man holding her took her to the center of the circle and pushed her down to her knees.
"This citizen of the Umbrarium has committed a great crime," he said. The man was tall and shaved almost bald, with blonde stubble. "She has murdered three of our glorious Umbratari, along with three of your own citizenry. One of those killed was the son of your Ahctan." Only at this point did Jalaat notice the six bodies lying on the stones beside her. The closest corpse was Fihro. In his throat was a gaping hole, with a hanging flap of skin half-covering it, as though embarrassed. "For her crimes, this citizen is to be executed."
Jalaat didn't understand. Could he possibly be talking about her? Was this a bad dream? It didn't feel like a dream at all. But the whole thing was surreal; she did not feel afraid, only bemused. How could she be afraid? This situation was not real, could not possibly be real.
Someone in the crowd was shouting. It sounded like her father. She found the source, found that she was correct: her father, his robe flapping open, incoherent with rage as two of the silver-cloaked soldiers held him back from entering the circle. Several other people had also started shouting, people she recognized, friends of her family. They were all being held back.
Then a hush fell over the crowd, emanating outward from a single point. Soon only Jalaat's father was still shouting. The crowd parted, and into the circle stepped the Ahctan. His white robe gleamed brightly in the morning sun, elaborate headdress framing his black hair. His cheeks were unshaven, his long goatee unkempt, as though he had only recently woken. Several of his personal guard stood behind and to the sides of him, warily eyeing the silvercloaks, hands on the hilts of their short swords.
"What is this?" the Ahctan said as he strode into the circle. He looked around, glanced at Jalaat, and then his gaze caught on the body of his son. "Fihro?" He sounded confused. "Fihro?" 
He walked to the body haltingly, then knelt beside it. "Fihro?" he asked again, querulously, as though he were a child asking for his mother. He looked up at the captain. "Who has done this?"
The captain indicated Jalaat, not breaking eye contact with the Ahctan. "She has slain these citizens, using poison and dark magic."
The Ahctan looked at her, then looked at the captain with disbelief. "Her?" He stood and walked closer. "I know this girl. She is a schoolmate of my son. She did this?"
"I'm afraid so," replied the captain. His voice was smooth as honey, dark and rich. "She is in league with the Cantarian terrorists. We have bound her to prevent her from working her magic and escaping."
The Ahctan stared at her. Then he shook his head. "No. This girl could not have done this. She couldn't have killed my son. Nor could she have killed your soldiers. She's just a young girl." He paused, then looked up at the captain and pointed a blunt finger. "You. You must have done this. Outsiders. Who are you? Why are you here? You have come here to murder and sow discord!" He stepped forward toward the captain. "It was you! You heretics ---"
And then the Ahctan was staggering back, blood gushing from his neck. It happened so fast that Jalaat wasn't sure she saw it at all --- first the Ahctan was striding forward, veins standing out on his forehead, shouting, and then there was a circular flash of white, like someone airing out a tablecloth, and a spray of red against the white, wine spilled from the table. Something black flew upward, spinning, and then landed in the dust --- the Ahctan's goatee, severed from his face.
The captain was in a half-crouch, and he had something folded under his arm, some long white object that gleamed in the sun. It looked like that strange religious ornament that Vaelin had, but made rigid somehow. Jalaat caught only this one glimpse before the entire square erupted into violence.
The Ahtan's guards rushed forward. Most of them were cut down before they had a chance to draw their swords. Everywhere, Jalaat saw flashes of white followed by red, gouts of color spattering on the brown stones. People were screaming and running, some trying to get out of the square, some attempting to rush the silvercloaks. None of the attackers appeared to get anywhere close to the soldiers, who were moving like nothing Jalaat had ever seen. They were too fast, inhumanly fast. More than that, though, their movements were strange --- they moved like parts of a single body rather than a group of individuals. Like the legs of a centipede. One of them would step aside gracefully just as another brought his weapon up in a sweeping motion, slicing through an opponent. When they stepped into the shadows, she could see their veins glowing beneath their skin. They swept the square together, serpentine, men and women both, like some kind of dread monster from beneath the earth. White circles crackled and flashed with light.

The battle, if it could even be called such, was soon over. The silvercloaks had not lost a single fighter, but the town garrison and the Ahctan's personal guard had either fled or been massacred, along with several dozen other citizens. Jalaat recognized her father's corpse, lying on his back, one leg twisted awkwardly beneath him. Flies had already begun to form clouds over the dead; Jalaat could hear the dull buzzing over the groans of the dying. She heard one young man repeatedly call for his mother, until finally one of the silvercloaks said, "She's not coming," and silenced him.
Jalaat felt completely numb. She tried to haul up some sort of feeling from her well of emotions, but the well was dry. And so it was numbly that she saw the captain finish off another of the Ahctan's guard and walk toward her, and numbly that she watched him shake the blood off his flectarus, which then looked completely pristine, as though the blood refused to stick to it at all. He stood before her and, gently, almost sadly, with his hand on her forehead, drew the killing edge across her throat.
The last thing she saw was a group of silvercloaks holding their flectari up in the sunlight, as though praying. They held the weapons gingerly, and the flectari, responding to their will, curved upward into shallow bowls, while their inner surfaces turned from white to silver. The soldiers pointed all of their mirrors toward the same spot on the thatch roof of the market hall, which soon exploded into flame. Even against the morning sun, the light was dazzling.

# Chapter 3 #

The dust cloud settled in among the caravan wains like an old friend stopping by for tcha. Every so often, one of the whirlwinds would hammer against the wagon, straining the chains that held it fast and rattling the armored exterior. Sand and small rocks pelted the plates, sounding like a fierce rain. 
Halavansa said something that Vaelin didn't catch. She was lost in her remembrance of Aabsaan, or at least her last glimpse of it, a column of purple smoke rising into the sky. When the sky had been clear, she could still see the smoke from many miles away, winding up above the hills as the caravan had wound down them, as though the remains of Aabsaan had formed their own ghostly caravan on a long ascending trail into night.
Belosveka had filled her in on what had happened in Aabsaan: how the Umbratari and the Ahctan had gotten into a fight, which had quickly escalated until the whole town was caught up in it. He had not mentioned what they were fighting about, but Vaelin found that she didn't really care. Belosveka had assured her that her few friends were probably safe, since only those unwise or unfortunate enough to get caught up in the fight had died. Jalaat had a good head on her shoulders; she wouldn't be caught agitating at some spectacle if there was any chance of real danger. And the rest of the damage would soon be put right, Belosveka assured her. 
Vaelin found herself with a curious mix of feelings. Part of her felt strangely light, as though she were a market-day kite that had been cut loose from her tether and was now soaring over the hills, unsure of where she would come down. In a way, the destruction of Aabsan felt like a cleansing, a necessary act of contrition for all the wrongs the town had done her. But not everyone in Aabsaan was vicious or xenophobic. Surely some good people had died in the violence, and she felt terrible about that.
A part of her also felt an unaccountable guilt. She hadn't really done anything wrong that she could think of; Musab's death, however strange it had been, was a defensive act. But Mahishat... That was something else. The woman had, most of the time, been a surrogate mother to Vaelin, albeit a harsh and demanding one. The fact of her death was like a massive stone in the soil, unyielding and oppressive. Vaelin felt herself bump against it, and was surprised by it each time, as though everything, Mahishat's death and her own discovery of it, were happening all over again.
These were the thoughts that occupied her as she went about her chores: Scouring pots and pans with sand, her hands chafed and raw; preparing food, a task which she actually enjoyed; digging latrine holes each day, a task she did not enjoy. But as they traveled, she began picking up bits and pieces of Vharian, until eventually she knew enough to ask Halavansa to start formally teaching her, in their copious free time while the caravan was moving during the day, or in the middle of a sandstorm, when the wagons were anchored to the ground and buckled up tight against the whirlwinds. Vaelin had long suspected that she had a gift for languages, and her lessons with Halavansa confirmed her suspicions.

Of Belosveka, they saw little. He would show up in the evening, after dinner was prepared and the chores were finished, eat his meal, check over his merchandise, and retire, and he would usually be gone by the time Vaelin was up the next morning. She finally cornered him one evening around the fire, after he had finished eating, but before he could make his way to bed.
"Why aren't you riding back here with us?" she asked. It sounded more confrontational than she had intended, but he didn't seem perturbed by her tone.
He made a wry face, his thick Vharian beard jutting out. "It is traditional. The higher-caste merchants travel together at the head of the column, so we can talk shop. Although, at this point, we have talked enough to open a hundred shops. But if I did not ride with them, I would lose face, and face is everything when it comes to negotiation. Truthfully, we mostly just drink and talk about women and war."
"That sounds a lot more interesting than being stuck back here."
"Believe me, you would quickly tire of their company. They are shrewd men, but not the most... cultured."
"At least they speak Ivaelic," she said, allowing a little more of her bitterness into her voice. "Pointing at things and grunting isn't all that 'cultured', either."
Belosveka frowned. "Yes, I can see that this is frustrating. I'm sorry. But believe me, it is not safe for you to wander freely. You are in hiding, after all. Remember, someone just burned your village."
Tears arose in her eyes and she turned away. Belosveka's voice softened. "This is as it must be. The storms can come at any time, and it would not do for you to be caught away from our wagons when they do. And even if that were not so, there are other dangers in the Whirling Wastes. There are reasons that the caravan must have guards."
"Such as?"
He frowned again and looked out across the dunes. The wind was picking up again, and the tough, grey grasses that clung to the sand and rocks were whipping about. Dust trailed down the dunes in small streams and eddies. "I don't think you need anything else to trouble your dreams tonight, malishka. Please, just trust me on this matter. Stay close to my wagons and my people, and we will see you through the mountains safely to Ivaelia."
"And then what? What am I supposed to do when I get there?"
He smiled. "Ah, but in Ivaelia, there is a whole world of possibilities, and you are a girl of great talents. Do not worry about this." He stood, brushing the dust from his trousers. "And now I must tend to my merchandise and my people before I retire. We will talk later, I promise you."
That night, Vaelin swore she could see strange lights moving on the horizon, but Halavansa didn't see them.

Vaelin and Halavansa walked in companionable silence behind the wain, their faces covered with thin fabric to keep the dust out. Halavansa was a shy girl, with a shy smile. She seemed to think Vaelin was the soul of daring, despite the fact that, while she herself had traveled all around Telua with the caravan, Vaelin had never before left Baranaath. But when Vaelin recounted her adventures getting out of Aabsaan --- leaving out some key details, of course, like the fact that she had killed a man using magic --- Halavansa stared in rapt attention, her hand often covering her mouth, her eyes wide. Even hearing it the fourth or fifth time, she was enthralled. Vaelin felt bad about keeping the full truth from her, but she just couldn't trust anyone she didn't know. Not yet.
"So," Vaelin asked one day, in halting Vharian, "how you go in Belosveka help?"
Halavansa giggled, and replied in her own halting Ivaelic. "I help him longer time. Longer, longer. My family is help his family."
Vaelin pondered this. The idea that an entire family would remain in service to another family wasn't a Baranaathi concept, but she was familiar with the practice. Apparently it was a common thing in Vhar, where families were huge and complicated, and it factored heavily in politics and social structure. "What do you know about Belosveka?" she said, deciding to stick to Ivaelic.
"He is big man. Very big," Halavansa said.
"Sure. He's lost some weight since we left Aabsaan, though."
Halavansa looked at her in total confusion. "Big man in Vhar. Big man in Ivaelia," she said.
"Oh. Right." Vaelin said.
"My family big because help his family. Strong, yes?"
"Strong," Vaelin said. "But what about Belosveka himself? If he's a rich trader, why does he carry a flectarus?"
Halavansa just looked at her, perplexed. Vaelin figured she had no idea what a flectarus was, and she didn't feel up to explaining the whole thing, so she left it alone.

Weeks passed. Her hands toughened, her tears dried up, and her Vharian grew to the point where she could carry on a conversation without resorting to gestures or Ivaelic. The one thing she had plenty of was time. Time to think, time to brood. Time to wonder if there was some sign she had missed, some way she could have know what was going to happen. But there was nothing.
She had assumed that Belosveka's aid would have strings attached, and had steeled herself for it, but he had made no advances on her. What value could she possibly have to him, unless it was her body? What value could she have to anyone? She realized belatedly that she hadn't properly thanked Belosveka for helping her; she had not expected his help to come free of charge. No one (except Jalaat, perhaps) had ever helped her without wanting something in return.
One day Belosveka made a rare daylight appearance at the wain, pulling up on horseback, his beard and clothing blowing in the wind.
"Forgot one of my ledgers," he said, hopping down onto the sand.
"Belosveka, wait. Can I talk to you for a moment?"
"Of course," he said, waving away his manservant. "About what?"
"Well, I wanted to say thank you. Thank you for all that you've done for me. I would be dead if it weren't for you."
"Okay," he said. She waited for him to elaborate, but he didn't.
"Okay," she repeated. "So... thank you."
"Right. Well, was that all?"
"Um. Yes."
"Good. Back to work for both of us, then, eh?"
"Yeah, about that," she said. "As I said, I'm very grateful. But I was wondering, did you have something in mind for me? Other than being a servant, I mean?"
He laughed. "Right now, no."
She had been a servant for most of her life, but for some reason, hearing it said out loud now rankled a bit. Belosveka himself had sparked her nascent ambition, by complementing her skills as a sculptor. And now, despite how she had always looked at herself, there was a part of her that aspired to be... more. "So I'm to be nothing but a servant?"
"Of course not. I have already said as much. However, at the moment, you have in front of you a bright future as either a servant, a slave, or a corpse. You may pick any of these you wish." She stared at him sullenly, her arms crossed, and he sighed. "Okay. When we get to Thelenza, the Madrium is what I have in mind for you."
When he had mentioned this before, she had thought it was just flattery, and they had both been a bit drunk at the time. But it seemed he was serious. He actually thought she was a candidate.
"Really? Me? But how would I get in? Didn't you say it was a school for the elite?"
"Elite in talent, not just in social status. Although, honestly, coming from a wealthy house certainly doesn't hurt your chances. At the very least, the rich have had the training and leisure to pursue their skills. But many talented teluri have entered the Madrium with little but what they wear on their backs, and left with great honor."
"Were you one of them?"
"No, I had some backing, fortunately. But we are talking about you. You have a level of talent I have rarely seen. I don't know how you will do in combat, but in general, a conduar's ability to manipulate syrillium is a good indication of her talent as a whole. If that holds true for you, you should have no trouble getting into the Madrium. Graduating, of course, will be another matter. That will take a great deal of discipline and patience."
"Patience isn't really one of my strengths."
"Well, fortunately for you, patience is a skill that can be learned. It requires only two things: frustration and time. Both of these you will find in abundance at the Madrium."
"Hmm," she said, choosing not to comment. "So how do I get in? Is there some kind of exam?"
"They'll probably test you at the entrance. They allow in a certain number of tirae --- cadets, or students --- every six months. Luckily, we're due to arrive in Thelenza just before the next round is selected. I think. It's been some time since I was there. Things may well have changed."
"Do you know anything that might give me, I don't know, a bit of an edge? I feel a little... nervous. I mean, what if I don't get in? What do I do then?"
"There is always a market for skilled sculptors in the city. I shouldn't worry about that too much. Actually, it's a wonder no one ever mentioned the idea of taking your sculpting skills to the city before. Or did they?"
"Not that I remember. Mahishat never did, that's for sure."
"Ah. Perhaps she had her own reasons for that. In any case, it will be difficult for me to give you any sort of 'edge', given that I haven't been to the Madrid myself in years. But the head of the Madrium, last time I checked, was a woman named Tarasela Haidana --- Maestra Haidana, as far as you're concerned. She is a powerful telurix, and a bit of a martinet, if memory serves. She reports to Demeia Sanavale, the sister of the Umbrata, Darano Sanavale. You have heard of them, I presume?"
"Of course I've heard of them. I'll have you know, I've read over twenty books. Some of them were less than ten years old," she said, somewhat haughtily.
Belosveka's mouth twitched, not quite a smile. "I see. Then you'll already know that Demeia doesn't only oversee the Madrium. She is also the head of the Yewiya. She is the second most powerful person in the entire Nasura."
The Yewiya --- the Healers --- cast a long shadow over all of the Umbrata's sphere of influence. No one who lived in Ivaelia or any of her provinces, Baranaath included, did not know of and fear the Healers. To fall into their clutches was to enter a waking nightmare from which there was no escape, or so it was said. Vaelin was never sure how word got out about situations from which there was no escape. If no one ever escaped, then how did everyone know about it? This was one of the many topics she had learned not to bring up in conversation; people looked at her strangely when she did. As if they needed more reasons to think she was unhinged.
"There is no edge to be gained when dealing with such a woman, at least not by the likes of you," Belosveka was saying. "You would do well to remember that during your time there; her attentions are best avoided. Remember, too, that it was the Umbrata's soldiers who just attacked your home town, and who killed Mahishat."
Against her will, images flashed  though Vaelin's head. The silvercloaks entering Mahishat's house. Killing her with their terrible, glass-sharp weapons. What must that have felt like? Did she suffer? Had they taken her head off before or after she died?
"By the way," said Belosveka breezily, "I'd like you to return that ledger you borrowed, please." 
Vaelin looked up at him in shock. She was certain she hadn't been seen taking it. But there was obviously no pretending that she hadn't done it. He knew. Strangely, he didn't even seem angry. Rather than scolding or punishing her, he was giving her an easy out --- yet another reason to be grateful to him. She looked down at her feet, avoiding his gaze, and nodded. Then she walked back to the wagon to put the ledger back, tongue-tied with shame.
Vaelin never knew why she borrowed things. It just seemed to happen, almost without conscious thought. A spoon here, a polished stone there. She would find herself taking them, first feeling an anxious thrill, and then the inevitable guilt. The guilt would remain until she secretly returned the item, which gave her another thrill. She had watched herself do it, again and again, knowing each time that she shouldn't, but unable to resist. It was as though a different person was living inside her head, and that person would come forward from time to time and take over, and she would be stuck watching until it was over and her body was returned to her.
Most of the things she borrowed were inconsequential, but the exception was books. Books were a rare commodity in Baranaath, and Vaelin couldn't keep her hands off of them. It didn't matter what kind of book it was --- she felt an urge to possess it, to read it, to absorb it. Books were a special kind of magic. All you had to do was read them, and the knowledge and power they contained passed into your head, like water into a jug. And then you could use that knowledge, that power, forever after.
Mahishat had somehow always known when Vaelin had stolen something. But sometimes, after Vaelin had been chastised, Mahishat would let her keep the books long enough to read them. Vaelin's grief  at the older woman's death was, now that the initial shock had worn off, tinged with something else --- a sense of freedom, even a sense of relief. Which, of course, made her feel guilty, starting the cyclone of feelings anew. How could she could feel all of these things at once?	And there was more. With distance had come contemplation, and with contemplation had come questions. How had the old lady managed to account for three trained soldiers? She had been tough, that was certain, but a killer? There was a lot about Mahishat that Vaelin didn't know. At the very least, she had to have been expecting those men. That meant she must have known that, one day, someone would come looking for Vaelin with the intention of killing her. 
Mahishat had never, to Vaelin's knowledge, killed anyone else. Although there had been that one time... Vaelin shuddered to think of it. The man had not been a local, but passing through Aabsaan on some kind of business. He had come to Mahishat seeking the services of a medicine girl. The man managed to hide his Rat Plague sores from Mahishat at first, but Vaelin screamed when she saw the overlapping whitish rings with red bumps in the center. She had never seen them before, but everyone knew what they looked like. Mahishat had responded quickly and violently, yanking the man backward with impressive force and dragging him, shouting, into the next room. The shouting had ended abruptly, but Vaelin had remained in her alcove, shaking with fear. The man had not been seen or heard from again. Vaelin had always wondered what had happened, but had asked no questions when Mahishat had ordered her to dispose of a large vat of spoiled "stew".
There was no one she could talk to about Mahishat, not without revealing herself. She didn't know who in the Nasura wanted to kill her or why, but the killers might be traveling with the caravan even now. Belosveka obviously didn't know anything, or he would have told her, surely. The only thing she could think of was that there must be some kind of connection with her mother's violent death, also at the hands of strange soldiers, many years ago.

Twelve years before, she had been a bright, precocious child, roaming the high mountain village where she lived with her mother, a washerwoman. They had come there from somewhere else, but all that Vaelin remembered of the time before was some blurry imagery of brightly colored tapestries and soft pillows, a sense of luxury left behind. The village was all she really knew. It sat in the mountains, near the three-way border between Kulnarana, Baranaath, and Vhar, so their Kulnarran skin and features didn't seem out of place.
All the local women knew the two of them. Vaelin felt as natural in the homes of others as she did in her own. But her mother, Nasharra, kept more to herself. For some reason, the villagers accorded Nasharra a sort of respect that they usually extended only to the shaman or the village headwoman, and Vaelin never understood why --- it was simply a fact of life there. Her mother was someone to be reckoned with. From what she could tell, though, Nasharra didn't do anything different from the other women. She took in clothes. She selected various herbs, or urine, or other materials to get out specific stains. She washed the clothes, scrubbing them in big basins. She hung them to dry in the mountain air. She cooked simple meals at home.
All of that changed suddenly, horribly, one day in the spring of Vaelin's fifth year. She remembered playing with a red stick and a blue stick, pretending one was a man and one was a woman and they were getting married. She couldn't recall what the sticks really were or where they had come from; some painted scraps from a fence, probably. They had been lost along with so much else.
Her mother had rushed inside, uncharacteristically frantic, and had scooped Vaelin into her arms and taken her to the laundry room, where there were a number of large baskets of unwashed clothes. She had knelt in front of Vaelin, her face awash with a fear she couldn't quite master.
"Vaelin, we're going to play a new game today. It's called Hide-a-Basket. The way you play is, you get into one of these baskets and stay as still and quiet as you can, for as long as you can. I'll hide in another basket, and whoever can hide for the longest without making a sound will win."
"What will I win? Is there a prize?"
"Yes, there will be a great prize. Whoever wins will get the biggest sweet at the bakery. But there will be no sweets unless you stay quiet, okay?"
And then Vaelin had crawled into a hamper full of dirty clothes --- they found one that wasn't too foul --- and remained there, looking out through a small hole in the woven side while her mother grabbed some long white object from the other room, took a big breath, and walked out of the house.
Vaelin heard some kind of murmuring outside, which quickly escalated to shouting. Then she heard some strange flapping noises, and some other noises she couldn't identify. A clanging. A muffled scream, cut off. A gurgling. And then silence.
And then the man walked in. He was wearing a shiny orange cloak, and had a grizzled, dark-bearded face. He leaned over for a moment, putting his hands on his knees, apparently wounded in the side. With a pained grunt, he straightened, and there was blood splashed across one of his cheeks, and blood in his teeth as he grimaced. He looked around a bit, went into the other room of the house, and glanced over the baskets. Vaelin held her breath as his gaze paused on her basket. But then he turned and stumbled back out the door.
She waited a long time, breathing in the warm, stale air of the basket. Finally, she mustered up her courage and crawled out and followed the man outside.
There were four bodies on the ground. Her mother's was the closest; the other three were arranged in a rough circle around her, as though they had been doing a harvest festival dance and had fallen asleep in the middle of it. One of them, the one on the right, didn't seem to have a head anymore. A little further away, she recognized the body of the man who had come into the laundry room. He had collapsed, and was still.
Vaelin went to her mother. She was lying face-down, her head turned to one side, her eyes half-open. In one hand, partially cradled beneath her torso, she was clutching the clear, circular syrillium amulet she always wore. Her other arm was thrown wide, pointing toward the other bodies, as though she had fallen with her arm held out toward them. At her fingertips was a wide, shining white half-circle, speckled with red. Vaelin took the amulet and the flectarus; she wasn't sure why, but it seemed necessary.
Several of the women from the village had arrived shortly afterward, screaming and rushing about. One of them scooped Vaelin into her arms and held her, crying. Vaelin was not crying, though. Her tears didn't come until later.
After that had been a rushed journey through the hills, in the back of a cart, through a few smaller villages, over tumbling streams and through thick woods, and eventually into the low, stony hill country of Aabsaan, and the house of Mahishat.

# Chapter 4 #

The oasis didn't look like much, but it was the only source of fresh water for many miles along this part of the Syrillium Road. It was really no more than a damp spot surrounded by some sad-looking grass clumps. Vaelin wasn't sure what she had expected, but it had at least involved trees.
She was walking back to the caravan, water buckets slung across her shoulders, when she saw the same trader who had approached her at the Blue Knife, the man who Belosveka had kindly knocked out. He was bony and sallow, with a wispy beard and the bloodshot eyes of a drunkard. The man was staring at her hips and breasts as she walked past him, literally licking his lips, and as she drew abreast of him, he called out to her. She ignored him, being used to such foolishness from her walks to the well in Aabsaan. There was something about the sway of a woman's hips as she carried a load, or maybe it was that her hands were occupied holding onto the pole; whatever it was, it seemed to attract the wrong kind of attention.
This man, however, did not react in the same way the police and workers in Aabsaan did when she ignored them, which was to back off, content to make their lewd comments and let her by. Instead, he followed her, saying nothing until she stopped and half-turned to glare at him.
"What's the matter, molasses? Haven't been getting what you need? I'm Jola. I've got what you need," he said, grabbing at his crotch.
"If I needed a worm, I'd dig a hole," she replied. 
The man chuckled. "You've got some fire in you. Maybe that's why you look so burnt. But I don't mind. I'll scrape off the burnt part and eat the rest." He licked his lips again, making a wet smacking sound. More alarmingly, however, he had drawn a long, curved knife from the small of his back, and now held it up between his legs.
Vaelin felt a lump rise in her throat, and tried to hold it back. She didn't want him to see her nervousness, but she couldn't help herself, and swallowed. She could tell that this man would be trouble --- real trouble, not just a talker. In Aabsaan, it was common enough for women in the lowest class to be raped; it had never happened to her (at least outside of Mahishat's house), but she had come close, and she knew some poor girls who hadn't been as fortunate. Ventacan laws were still supposedly in effect out in the desert, since it was still technically Ivaelian territory, but there was no one to enforce those laws. In the caravan, there was no law, and no one knew that she was anything more than a lowly farkha maid. 
"Leave me alone," she said.
"Oh, I think you've spent plenty of time alone, just like you're all alone right now. I've been watching you. Did you know that?"
Vaelin squatted and set down the water, then stood. "I said, leave me alone."
Jola put his knife back in its sheath. Being approached by a single attacker was a situation that she had trained for extensively in qhurasothi. If he behaved predictably, she knew exactly what to do, although her heart was pounding in her chest. 
He stepped forward, but she was waiting for his step, and lunged forward herself. He reached out to grab her, and she grabbed his wrist with one hand and shot her other arm underneath his triceps, stepping through so that her hips curved into his, then pivoted forward, pulling his arm across her body. He went flying over her shoulder and slammed into the ground, his breath shooting out of him as he landed.
She thought about stepping across his face and breaking his arm, but instead she let go and kicked him hard in the floating rib. She heard a pop, and he yelped like a dog. "I like being alone," she said. He groaned. She stepped around him, picked up her water pole, and continued walking, forcing herself not to hurry her pace too much or look behind her. Her heart was still pounding, but she made herself calm down and take slow, even breaths. What had she just done? She didn't know what the consequences would be, but what she did know was that, for the first time since leaving Aabsaan, she felt a little bit in control.

The desert gradually gave way to isolated promontories of dark stone jutting up above the orange dunes. Vaelin had thought the desert a bleak country, but the foothills were somehow even more bleak. They had been scoured of vegetation by the winds, which now blew cold and harsh even during the day.
The road wound through these dark hills, upward toward the mountains that loomed above them like the silhouettes of vultures. The Shuliath were black except for the peaks, which were dusted with snow, when the clouds parted enough for them to be visible at all. 
The winds grew colder and colder as the caravan approached, until Vaelin felt like she was constantly on the verge of shivering. No matter what she did, she couldn't quite get warm. The wind reached through the gaps in her gear and scraped away at her skin, like a rat chewing through a wall. Belosveka's retinue seemed less bothered by the cold, but were sympathetic. They lent her some warmer clothing, which she accepted with gratitude.
Finally, the caravan rode over the last of the big foothills, and suddenly the mountains themselves were before them. Proximity did nothing to decrease the bleakness of the mountains, but it did add a sense of grandeur. Vaelin had, of course, been in the mountains before, but that scenery had been far less intimidating, or else she had just been too young to appreciate it. The lack of trees, the angular blackness of the rock, and the sheer inclines of the slopes gave the Shuliath an intimidating beauty. The whole caravan seemed as tiny as a line of sand fleas.
The caravan entered a defile, bounded on both sides by black cliffs, made blacker by small waterfalls trickling down from the top. The walls were pocked with caves. Belosveka's retinue seemed nervous, and several times Vaelin saw them making some kind of three-fingered warding gesture as they spoke in hushed tones. The entire caravan had grown less boisterous as soon as they entered the defile. Vaelin asked Halavansa about it.
"The Maldaran pass," she said, with obvious dread.
"Is that bad?"
Halavansa laughed nervously. "Yes, it is said to be full of gatherers. We didn't see any on the way in, though, so perhaps they have left."
"Gatherers. The Grandchildren. Right." Vaelin had heard of the creatures, but dismissed them as fairy tales meant to scare children into obedience. What could be more horrifying to a child than a creature that looked almost like a child, but with elongated, distorted features and an appetite for blood? But surely they didn't really exist. Halavansa was a sweet girl, but even to Vaelin, who did not consider herself cosmopolitan, the girl seemed woefully provincial in certain respects. Belief in spirits and fairy tales chief among them. 
But she thought she saw some movement in the caves as they passed by.

At sundown of the second day in the pass, Vaelin was scouring a stubborn pot behind the wain when Jola came back. The sky was a pearly grey; the sun was still up, but hiding behind a tall black peak to the west. The caravan was parked for the evening above a steep gully surmounted by large boulders. Jola was alone this time as he came around a bend in the road, and he looked as though someone had just told him a funny joke that he couldn't wait to share with her. As though they were the best of friends.
"You're alone, too," he said.
"No, I'm not. I have this knife," she replied. Her fear seemed distant, like the buzzing of a gnat. Perhaps her lack of fear was unwise, but the truth was that she was tired of being afraid, tired of looking over her shoulder. 
Just then, Halavansa came around the side of the wagon and froze, staring at Jola. Vaelin had, by now, told her about the whole incident, which Halavansa had found both horrifying and engrossing, but she had never actually seen Jola in person. She came to stand next to Vaelin.
"Is this him?"
Vaelin nodded, not taking her eyes off of the man. She felt Halavansa tense next to her. She was, perhaps, going to tell him off, a thought which, in the days ahead, would always bring tears to Vaelin's eyes. But Vaelin never found out, because at that moment, a pale shape shot forward from behind a rock and ripped Jola's head off.
Halavansa screamed, and they both stumbled back toward the wagon. The thing that had killed Jola bent over his corpse, slurping up the blood as it bubbled out of his neck. Halavansa screamed again and several of the other servants ran out from the other side of the wagon, then froze in horror. 
The creature paused in its feeding and looked up at them, its mouth a wide, red grin. It had a pale, translucent body which was now starting to swell with the blood of its feeding, like a tick. It was vaguely humanoid in shape, but its limbs were unnaturally long and slender, and tapered into black claws at the ends, claws which had sliced Jola's head off with seemingly little effort.
But the creature's head was the most horrifying aspect. As in the stories, it looked very much like that of a human child, but with dark lips and rows of black, needle-like teeth that appeared to move semi-independently in its mouth, in waves and ripples. Its eyes were the negation of human eyes: glistening black sclera, with orange irises and a white horizontal bar for a pupil. Blueish veins spidered across the bald skull. Its expression was one of childish delight, as though it had just been given a new toy.
Vaelin saw all of this in a single moment before the creature began moving toward them, slowly, making a weird snuffling sound. As it crept forward, two more climbed over the rocks behind it, also grinning. They seemed hesitant to approach the torchlight, so Vaelin grabbed one of the torches and began swinging it, terror making her limbs numb and cold. The creatures shrank back from the flames and hissed at her. But more were coming over the rocks, their claws scrabbling.
Halavansa was standing beside her, a torch in her hand. She turned to say something to Vaelin, her eyes wide with fear. There was a blur of motion from the top of the wagon behind her and she went down, her torch clattering away into the rocky gully. She had time for one short scream before the creature ripped into her face.
Vaelin shouted and rammed the end of her torch into the kriancha's back, which instantly began bubbling and hissing with steam. The beast squealed and rolled away, claws scraping the rock. Behind her, another of Belosveka's retinue --- an older man named Slovka, who had always been quiet and courteous --- was overcome by two kriancha. He managed to drive a knife into the eye of one of them before the second tore into his ribs with its powerful back claws.
She heard shouting and turned to see several guardsmen --- hired thugs, not the silver-cloaked men and women Vaelin had seen in Aabsaan --- charge into the fray, torchlight flashing off their swords. They drove the Grandchildren back, giving Vaelin a chance to drop to her knees by Halavansa's side. The girl was definitely dead, and Vaelin sobbed as she looked at the ruin that had been her face. One eye was still half open, staring at the darkening sky.
Vaelin didn't have much time to mourn. The advantage the guardsmen's initial charge had given them had evaporated quickly, and they, too, were now surrounded. There were at least a dozen kriancha prowling around the edges of the firelight, eyes glittering, and more were clambering over the rocks. It was hard to tell how many of them there were, since they were constantly moving, weaving behind and around the boulders. They were making a kind of high-pitched muttering, chittering sound that made the hair stand up on the back of Vaelin's neck. She couldn't tell if they were talking to one another or simply making animal noises, but the sound pierced her to the core.
The guards formed up in a curving shield wall in front of the wagons, shouting encouragement to each other. A Gatherer would leap forward, snarling, and a guardsman would take a swipe at it with his sword, without leaving the safety of his fellows, but Vaelin could see what was happening. The gatherers were distracting the men while more of them circled around behind. She glanced behind her, and, to her horror, saw several of the creatures on top of the wagons to either side, closing in. She shouted a warning, but it was too late. The Gatherer leapt forward, and several guards went down immediately, screaming and hacking with their swords.
Two gatherers finished off the nearest guardsman, then turned as one toward Vaelin. She backed up as they prowled forward, grinning at her, blood dripping from their black mouths. She swung her torch back and forth, but the creatures seemed to have figured out that she could only deal with one of them at a time, and they separated, slowly circling to either side. Her back was against the wagon. Both of the creatures leapt at once.
From the darkness beyond the wagon, a flash of white swept down, and one of the gatherers was sliced in half, its viscera creating a glittering arc in the air. The top half of its body landed in the dust at her feet. A split second later, the second Gatherer met a similar fate. Another arc from the darkness on her opposite side, crackling with white light, sliced both of the monster's forelegs off, then swept up again to cut through its head like a soft cheese. 
The figures behind the arcs of light were a blur of motion, too fast to be merely human, but after a few moments, she recognized one of them: Belosveka. She couldn't believe a woman her size could move with such grace, like a dancer sped up to an inhuman tempo. She and the other telurix sliced through the gatherers in perfect harmony, the movements of one setting up the following motion of the other, like the gears of some machine. 
But after a few moments, Vae realized that the teluri weren't actually moving that fast --- it was more like every movement they made ended with them in exactly the right place. It had an inevitability to it, like they were falling downhill. Their motion had a distinct rhythm, yet it appeared unpredictable and fluid, following the gatherers up and down the open space. The gatherers, by contrast, moved quickly, but jerkily, always a step behind. The gatherers would snarl and lunge, and then would seem to leap directly into the path of Belosveka's weapon, which just happened to be swinging into that exact spot, right before it moved on to the next killing. 
A few moments later, several other teluri joined the fray, all of them glowing, all of them moving together like a single animal. The gatherers never stood a chance.
When, at last, the monsters were all dead, Belosveka and the second fighter --- a tall, grave woman, with short-cropped blonde hair --- surveyed the scene, catching their breath. Their veins were glowing red beneath their skin, the whites of their eyes shining with a strange radiance. Vaelin could hear sounds of violence from elsewhere along the caravan as, presumably, the scene repeated itself with other guards, other teluri. 
Belosveka looked with dismay at the ruins of her retinue. Only Vaelin and two others had survived. The other survivors were wailing, holding the bodies of their friends and family against them, covered in blood. Belosveka went to them and embraced them, dropping her flectarus. The other telurix was looking at Vaelin, who was standing dumbly, still holding her torch.
"Are you injured?" she asked.
Vae shook her head and went to kneel by Belosveka and the others. It was only much later that she realized that the woman had spoken to her in Baranaathi.

The caravan moved on as soon as possible the next day. It turned out that Belosveka's wagons had been some of the hardest hit; losses were minimal along the rest of the line. But still, everyone was eager to get out the pass and into more open country. It was impossible to bury the bodies in the stony soil of the pass, so they piled stones into cairns, hoping that other gatherers wouldn't be able to get through, but knowing that they probably would.
The caravan was only able to wait for an hour as the survivors held funereal rites. Belosveka and a small crowd of traders and servants performed a complicated ritual involving the pouring of an amber liquid in intricate designs around the graves. The liquid was then set alight with Belosveka's flectarus, which, to Vaelin's fascination, he curled into a cup shape in order to focus the sunlight. The crowd chanted and wept, Belosveka weeping more than most. Vaelin later learned that this was the first time he had actually lost anyone to the Grandchildren; other attacks in the past had been rare, and those that had occurred were mere skirmishes, the few creatures that appeared being easily driven off. It was agreed, among the survivors, that something was changing, and not for the better.
After the ceremony, Vaelin trepidatiously approached Belosveka. "Belo. I'm so sorry for your loss."
He wiped his big hand down his face and looked up at the lightening sky. "They were like family to me. But I am thankful for those who are left alive. Including you."
Impulsively, Vaelin stepped forward and embraced the big man, and after a moment, he returned her embrace and began to weep anew, Vaelin weeping with him. She could smell his salty tears in his beard. She wanted to ask him about the fight, about who he really was, but this was not the time.
The caravan made it out of the Maldaran Pass that same day, continuing beyond nightfall until the leadership deemed it safe to stop. On the other side of the mountains, the land was suddenly much greener, with large evergreen trees stretching away across the hills. The road cut through the trees like a plow through loose soil. Off in the distance, the horizon was dark and grey. 
As the caravan left behind the barren desert and rocky mountains for green forest, Vaelin felt her old life being shucked away, like a loose snakeskin. Leaving... what? She didn't know. Her only remaining friend had just been killed before her eyes. Aside from Belosveka, and her scant friends back in Aabsaan, she had no one. More than that, she felt like she was no one herself, a shadow without a body, flitting over the rocky earth.
By day, the dappled light of the forest slipped by. At night, sometimes, the caravan would end up on a hill or ridge, and Vaelin could see the rivers of aestus swirling through the trees, pooling up in places, not bound by the rules of gravity or geography, but following some other set of laws. Or perhaps the aestus was, itself, the law to which the land was bound, constantly being written and rewritten by some unseen hand.
Eventually the ground leveled out, and the caravan started seeing civilization --- tiny forest hamlets at first, gradually giving way to larger villages and towns. Some of the towns sported wooden stockades with gates and guards. The villages were humble, yet she was taken aback by what she didn't see: few beggars, few signs of starvation. No drought, no weather-wrought devastation. And what was more, the villagers seemed to be generally more cheerful than people in Baranaath, although there were certainly plenty of surly innkeepers and drunken porters to go around. But overall, the people were well-heeled and merry, and didn't seem to find her appearance all that strange. She even saw a few others with Kulnaran skin wander by in the markets, although she didn't try to talk to them. 

The caravan moved on, and Vaelin began to notice something unsettling. Far to the west, an area of some kind of blight stretched away for miles. All the trees were dead, but there was no sign of new growth as there would have been with a forest fire. Instead, the trees looked wilted, as though they had given up hope and killed themselves. It was hard to make out across the distance, but there was something strange about the black ground between the dead trees as well, as though it were oily or wet. It reflected the waning sunlight each night, red as cherry wine.
Vaelin found Belosveka riding near the front of the caravan. Now that they were out of the desert, he had relaxed his demands that she stay hidden, despite the fact that he had grown surly and difficult to engage in conversation since the attack. But she decided to try anyway.
"What is that area over there, where all the trees are dead?"
He glanced down at her, then squinted off toward the west. "That is The Stain. One of The Grandmother's many gifts to mankind."
"What is it? How far does go?"
"Many, many miles. This is the easternmost stretch, where the wind blew it, a long time ago. You've never heard of this before?" 
She shook her head. He rode on in silence, not looking at her. "So, what is it?"
He sighed. "I don't have the patience for ancient history lessons today, Vaelin. Ask someone else." And with that, he spurred his horse and trotted off toward the head of the column. Just one more mystery for her to chew on, endlessly, like the rest.

From miles away, the Stormwall appeared as a dark blur on the horizon. As the caravan drew closer, the motion of the storm became clear --- a slow left-to-right rotation, with devils detaching periodically and whirling off into the hills, where they eventually dissipated. Even from afar, the Stormwall was terrifying, towering over the landscape and distorting weather patterns all across the plain, which was verdant with tough shrubbery. A few hills were scattered across the surface of the landscape, like  sea creatures rising from the depths. Lightning periodically lit up the inside of the structure, or shot out from its edges, striking the hilltops. The volcano at the center of Thelenza was not visible at all.
"We'll enter the caves in a few more miles," Belosveka said, joining Vaelin on the outcrop where she stood. "You see that big hill, there? The cave entrance is just below it, in that valley."
"How long will we be underground?"
"Two days of travel to get all the way through to the city, assuming the checkpoints don't take longer than they should. You know Ventacans and their rules."
"So the stereotypes are true?"
He laughed, apparently in a better mood than he had been of late. "Yes, after a fashion. They definitely like rules. And forms. Everyone says the Ventacans are 'efficient', but that hasn't been my experience. More like 'bureaucratic'. And expensive to bribe, compared to Baranaathi or Cantarians."
"You bribe people a lot?"
"Oh, yes. A necessary cost of doing business, as a traveling merchant. How do you think I got you into my retinue without any questions being asked? Even caravans have rules."
So she was even more in debt to him. She chewed her lip, thinking of what to say, but Belosveka seemed to read her thoughts.
"Don't worry yourself about the money. It was a grain in the dunes."
They reached the cave entrance later that day. It was huge, plunging into the side of the valley like a yawning wound. The blurry edge of the Stormwall was not far away now, behind a few more rows of low hills, and the roar was loud. The road led down a series of switchbacks, difficult for the caravan to navigate. One of the wagons had a precarious moment where it almost slipped over the edge, but the team was able to pull it back onto safer ground. 
Eventually, the road dipped straight into the cavern, where it wound along the uneven floor and disappeared into utter darkness. As they descended, the sound of the Stormwall grew quieter, until it became only a low background rumble.
Vaelin was familiar with caves, since there were a number of them near Aabsaan, but this was on an entirely different scale. Monolithic towers of glimmering stone rose from the cave floor to meet the ceiling, which was layered with different shades of shadow. On the floor, in between fantastically-shaped pillars and stalagmites, pools of water sat mirror-still and clear. Strange, bubble-like formations of stone lay just beneath the water, as though the stone had been frozen in the act of boiling. She could hear a high-pitched chittering from above, and the air was pungent with guano. In some places it was strong enough to make her eyes water.
"A bit intimidating, isn't it?" said Belosveka. He looked at the expression on Vaelin's face and laughed. "Yes, I remember the first time I saw it. I had about the same reaction. But wait until you see the inside of the Stormwall. This is nothing."
She shook her head, words failing her. The caravan rolled through the cave, which got steadily narrower as they descended. The road wound back and forth through a number of smaller natural caverns, one of which was filled with gorgeous white crystals that glimmered in the torchlight. Some of them were like vast curtains, while others looked more like melted statues. Vaelin wanted to stay and stare at the shapes, but the caravan kept moving and she had to follow. 
The natural caves ended and the trail straightened out into a man-made tunnel, with air holes punched into the ceiling. Water dripped down the walls and disappeared through drains in the floor. Black iron braziers perched at regular intervals, casting eerie shadows on the rough-hewn walls, and reflecting off the puddles.
The tunnel was easily wide enough for the caravan, and periodically it opened up into larger natural caverns, where there would have been room for two caravans to pass each other in opposite directions. At one point, the caravan did come upon a wagon going the opposite way, and the single wagon was obliged to back up all the way to the next cavern before it could get around. The driver was cheerful enough about it; Vaelin thought she would have been deeply annoyed. Apparently it was a common occurrence.
Smaller passages appeared on either side of the main tunnel, leading off into darkness. The caravan began passing more and more people, some of whom were crossing between side passages, and some of whom were heading along the main road. The majority of the travelers had light brown skin and curly black hair, and looked quite poor, with patched clothing and skinny limbs. Most were on foot, carrying heavy packs, but a few led pack mules or pulled small carts, which were able to squeeze around the wagons fairly easily. 
"Cantarians," Belsoveka said. "Some of them live in the tunnels, although they're not supposed to. They do most of the manual labor, portering and such, in the city. Most of the work in general, really."
"Why would anyone choose to live down here?" Vaelin asked.
"Who said they chose?" Belosveka replied flatly. "They have nowhere else to go."
They reached the midpoint a few hours after the sun had set outside, at least according to Belosveka. Vaelin had completely lost track of time. The midpoint was marked by a large cavern, partially natural, but greatly expanded by humans. A small crowd of fellow travelers was scattered around the room, their voices echoing softly. The walls were lined with torches, and, at the far end, the first of the Ventacan checkpoints waited where the tunnel narrowed again. Belosveka and the other merchants ambled over and talked to the guards for a while, then began filling out large stacks of paperwork. Vaelin, who was used to paper being a precious commodity, couldn't believe they would waste that much of it, but apparently the Ventacans saw some benefit in doing so. Maybe they reused the paper.
The caravan spent the night in the big cavern. The next day, the journey continued in much the same way, and Vaelin started finding it tedious. A part of her was itching to get out into fresh air again. At one point, she began to feel as though the tunnels were closing in on her, and had to distract herself by thinking through some qhuarsothi forms and breathing deeply. There was an awful lot of rock above her. What if it collapsed? But the tunnels had been here for centuries without collapsing. She shook the thoughts off.
The natural caverns began increasing in frequency as the slope of the road gradually turned upward. Vaelin could hear a faint roar, like a waterfall, which grew louder as they progressed. Toward the end of the journey, the road opened out into another large cavern, about half the size of the one at the entrance. This one had steep switchbacks inside the cavern itself, with dim daylight streaming in from above. The roar was much louder here, loud enough that it was difficult to have a conversation.
"Almost there," Belosveka shouted.
At the top of the switchbacks, the cavern opened out onto the side of Isola ridge. Spread out below was the Nadrali River valley, the Stormwall, and, within its bounds, the great city of Thelenza.

# Chapter 5 #

Vaelin was not prepared. What she had pictured in her head was a scaled-up version of Aabsaan, with a few larger buildings clustered in the center. She did not anticipate the sheer, sprawling scale of the city, almost blinding in the late morning light. It was so large that it was impossible to see all at once; you had to sweep your gaze across it to encompass its breadth. At this time of day, the clouds that perpetually covered the city were only a translucent film, and buildings and streets were visible beneath it.
However impressive the city, though, it was the Stormwall that dominated the scene. Stretching several miles into the air on all sides, the dark wall of cloud howled around the city, a crown of violence. Lightning flared across the interior of the wall, making its surface glow purple. The air smelled of ozone and smoke, and a deep rumble seemed to vibrate within Vaelin's bones. Far across the city, the volcano that powered the Stormwall ascended into its midst, the peak cut off from view. There were no walls of stone --- this city did not need them.
Below the towering Stormwall, the city looked tranquil, the shining Nadrali river curving around the edge. The ridge Vaelin was standing on was one of a few high points that rose above the low cloud layer encompassed by the Stormwall. A number of other tunnel entrances were arranged at regular intervals around the city, carved into hillsides. She counted twelve, including the one from which the caravan was emerging, which was the southernmost. Each tunnel entrance was flanked by squat, hexagonal guard towers, with a stout gate in between. Two of the tunnels, on the northeast and northwest sides, were built above tributaries of the river, which disappeared underground.
The banks of the river were lined with people and buildings, and boats moved slowly in both directions, loading and unloading cargo at the long stone quays. The boats were uniformly narrow and low to the water, so they could travel through the tunnels. 
Further away, up against the foot of the volcano that rose near the north edge of the city, she could just make out a cluster of buildings, impossibly huge even at this distance. They were high enough on the mountainside to sit above the layer of clouds. One in particular, a tall, flat-topped tower of dark stone, rose up from the foot of the mountain like a massive tree. It had a number of flaring ribs --- she couldn't tell how many --- that projected out at the base and then tapered together to form smooth walls at the top. It was so big that it almost looked as though the mountain had sprung forth from the tower, rather than the other way around. It could only be the Umbratorium.
Next to that building, still massive but dwarfed by the tower, was an odd-looking structure that resembled some kind of huge ice crystal. The main building was a single massive hexagon, and on each corner of the hexagon, another, smaller hexagonal chamber was attached, offset toward one edge. Each free corner of the smaller hexagons branched out into yet another hexagon, and so on, so that each individual section of the building looked like a miniature model of the section it had sprung from. The whole shape formed a six-sided spiral that she found oddly compelling to look at.
"The Madrium," said Belosveka. She hadn't noticed him standing beside her, and she startled a little when he spoke. "That's the six-sided monstrosity. The tall tower beside it, as I'm sure you've guessed, is the Umbratorium. And the third building, can you guess what that is?"
The building he referred to was harder to see, since it was somewhat blocked by the Madrium, but she could make out a triangular structure with solid white stone walls, a single row of windows high up toward the top. A chill went through her as she realized what it was.
"The Yewiyatum," she said quietly.
"Good. It will take us the better part of the day to get to our caravansary, so you might as well try to learn the lay of the city while you have a good vantage point. The cluster of big buildings that houses the Umbratorium and the Madrium is called the Warda. That big road leading north to the Warda, that's the Vaiumbratal, or the Umbrata's Way. That's the heart of the city; all the lesser roads branch off from that. Our caravansary is in a big courtyard a short distance up that road from the gate."
"So when we get to the caravansary, what exactly am I supposed to do then?"
"You'll make your way to the Madrium. The process for seeking entry will be clear once you get there. I don't remember exactly what you'll need to do, and it's probably changed a bit regardless."
"Wait. You're not coming with me?" He said nothing. "You want me to go alone?" A note of panic had started to rise in her voice, against her will.
"You'll do fine. You worry too much. In any case, I cannot go with you, I have many other things to attend to."
She simply stared at him. She couldn't believe he was going to make her do this alone, after all she had been through.
"Malishka," he said, putting his hand on her shoulder, his voice low over the rumble of the Stormwall. "This is something you must do by yourself. I wouldn't send you there if I didn't think you could do it. No one can help you during the selection process, so there wouldn't be much point in me being there anyway. Trust me on this. I have not yet steered you astray, have I?"
"No."
"No," he affirmed. "So. You will go to the Madrium, and you will use your wits and the gifts that the Luminae have given you, and you will succeed."
She looked out again toward the massive buildings, the slowly churning madness of the Stormwall, and hoped, once again, that he was right.

From a distance, Thelenza was overwhelming in its grandeur and scale. Up close, it was overwhelming in odor. Some of the scents made her mouth water, and others were ghastly enough to make her gag. They often seemed to coincide on the same block, where an errant breeze would carry one or the other up an alley and straight into her face. After the monotonous damp smell of the tunnel, the sudden odors of the city reminded her of Aabsaan, although in Aabsaan the odors had never been so dense, so powerful. But she was struck with a certain nostalgia, which she was surprised to recognize as homesickness. She was a little disappointed with herself for that. Hadn't she wanted to leave Aabsaan behind? But there was no denying it --- a part of her longed for the dirty familiarity of Baranaath. As alone as she had felt there, at least she had known what to expect.
The noise, too, was overwhelming, a ceaseless churning of horse's hooves on cobblestones, wagon wheels rolling, goods being moved about, and people shouting at one another. And behind it all, the incessant rumble of the Stormwall. The Thelenzans seemed to be capable of only two modes of speech: near-inaudible murmuring, or ear-splitting shouting, accompanied by dramatic hand gestures. Given that Ventaca called itself 'The Way of Reason', their behavior was a bit disorienting. Vaelin found it frightening and hilarious at the same time.
The caravansary was, in itself, a sprawling, cacophonous mess. At least four other caravan crews were already berthed there, and the noise of all the oxen and people was astounding, even after coming through the gates. She watched the traders from various caravans greet each other like long lost kin. Even among wanderers, she didn't belong. She tried to tell herself to stop being so pathetic, but she couldn't quite shake the melancholy.
Belosveka had generously given her a small amount of silver, and she used some of it to buy herself a comfortable bedroll and some provisions, which were for sale within the caravansary itself. As she was paying, she suddenly felt better, lighter somehow. As the merchant counted out her change, she realized why: it was because the merchant had no idea who she was. She had no reputation here, no history. She wasn't a farkha thief to him, or an orphan, or anything at all --- she was just another traveler. She could be whoever she wanted to be. The thought was exhilarating.
They slept that night in one of several inns surrounding the caravansary. Vaelin shared a bed with the rest of Belosveka's servants, as she had done on the road. In the morning, she rose early, and went out to make water, crunching across the morning frost, her breath steaming. When she got back, Belosveka was awaiting her.
"Well," said Belosveka. "Looks like it's time."
She turned away so he wouldn't see the look on her face. "Yeah. I guess so."
"Given the circumstances, it would not be wise for you to use your true family name while you are here. I would suggest finding another name, one that is easy for you to remember."
Vaelin thought about it for a moment. "How about Drulaadi? That's my friend Jalaat's family name."
A strange expression flitted across Belosveka's face, then was gone. "Yes, that would be fine. Listen, malishka. Just remember who you are and where you came from, and you'll do fine. The road to the Madrium is out there," he said, pointing to the Vaiumbratal.
It occurred to her that, when it came down to it, she knew neither of those things, and thought about saying so. Instead, she said, "Yes. I know the way." Then, picking up her satchel, she walked out onto the road.

As soon as she stepped out the broad, painted gates of the caravansary and onto the main thoroughfare, it hit her: she was truly alone in the city. She almost turned back then, but stopped herself. She couldn't give up without trying, after coming all this way.
She set out up the long hill, dodging huge wagons and trying not to get splashed with mud. People in all manners of dress were hurrying along the pavement on either side of the road: Cantarian workers carrying bags of grain or loads of bricks stacked atop their heads; Cantarian beggar women carrying dirty children; aristocratic-looking Ventacan men and women in fine cloaks and furs, studiously ignoring the others. It was warmer inside the city than it had been beyond the walls, but it was still chilly and damp, and waves of steam were rising from the workers' heads. The sun pushed through the ever-present layer of clouds like a pale moon.
On several corners, men in tall, round hats were grilling food. Some of them were even cooking the flesh of land animals, brazenly, in the open. As though there were nothing at all wrong with the idea, as if the Madness had never happened. The smell was actually strangely appetizing, but the sight of the flesh being handled and cooked made Vae's stomach churn. In Baranaath, there were some --- foreigners, mostly --- who consumed animal flesh, but it was always done circumspectly. They certainly didn't do it in the streets.
Vae started feeling panicky and ducked into an alley to have a quick puff and calm her nerves. She thanked her past self once again for remembering to bring her entire stash of minuaj when she fled Aabsaan. She had been conservative with it, only taking a hit here or there to dull the edge, even though she had wanted more. Her caution had paid off and the stash had lasted this long, but she would need to find some more soon. 
With the icy coolness of the minuaj tingling in her scalp, she stepped out once again into the thoroughfare, trying to look nonchalant. She didn't want to make herself a target, for thieves or salesmen or... whatever they had here. Some way or another, someone was going to try to take advantage of her. That much was true everywhere.
At one point, her path took her along the edge of a vast market, some of which was outdoors and some of which was covered by either canvas tarps or wooden lattices. All manner of goods were for sale, grouped loosely in sections. She passed one area that seemed to contain nothing but dried fruit; another, nothing but woolen vests and hats. Vae had to constantly stop herself from gawking. Then she wondered if perhaps she wasn't gawking enough, and maybe staring straight ahead and ignoring everything was even more obvious. She eventually settled on glancing casually at things, trying not to look surprised, but also not too bored, which was challenging enough to distract her from the fact that she was probably going to drive herself insane by overthinking everything.
The vendors, almost all Cantarian, were hawking their wares, but quietly, which surprised her.  She would have expected the bazaar to be at least as loud as the caravansary, but instead it gave off an air of subdued watchfulness. There was a significant presence of armed men in copper cloaks, and several times she noticed shopkeepers glancing at them. The look on their faces couldn't quite be called fear, but it came close.
She came to a square. Unlike Aabsaan's central square, this space was vast, big enough to take a good portion of a day to explore. It sat near the city center, with several broad avenues leading off in different directions around the perimeter. The edges of the square were lined with more vendors and shops, some of which looked a good deal fancier than anything she had seen in the bazaar: fine furs and other clothes were displayed on stiff wooden figures out front, and delicate vessels of colored glass glittered in long rows. Some of the shops even had large glass windows, a feature she had only previously seen at the Ahctan's palace and the most sumptuous of the four temples in Aabsaan. She had to stop herself from scoffing at the foolishness of building with glass windows. There weren't any Fingers, here, which would turn glass into clouds of glittering projectiles. No reason not to build tall buildings, or to use glass. 
She paused in front of a shop with a window display of syrillium figurines and trinkets. The door was smooth aside from a single letter in some language she didn't recognize, made from hammered silver and embedded in the polished wood. She wasn't sure if she was supposed to knock or just walk in, so she shrugged and opted for the latter.
The interior was spacious, with spotless white tile covering the walls and floor. In the center was a long, rectangular table, along which were laid an artful selection of syrillium items, each one with a paper label in front of it. The syrillium glittered invitingly in the light of a few tasteful chandeliers. Behind a low counter at the far end of the room, a slender Ivaelian girl about Vae's age was sitting on a stool, carefully painting another of the paper placards with a long calligraphy brush.
"Hello, welcome to Frao. Can I help you find any..." The girl's voice faltered as she looked up and took in Vaelin's appearance, her dusky Kulnarran skin, and her travel-worn clothes. She stopped short of wrinkling her perfect little nose, but Vae could just about see the impulse trying to worm its way out.
"Um. Just browsing, thanks."
The girl managed a smile, at least. "Sure. Just let me know if you have any questions." Vaelin cleared her throat and shuffled over to the table. A pair of syrillium scissors caught her eye. "Can I pick these up?" she said. Better to be cautious.
"Of course," the girl said, too brightly.  And try not to break anything, because we both know you can't afford to pay for it. Vae picked up the scissors. Not bad work. Decent joinery, and a good edge, although the handles could have used a bit more texture.
"Careful, those are very sharp," the girl said. Vae smiled and nodded and bit back the urge to respond that of course they were fucking sharp, they were scissors. She put them back on the table and picked up the placard.
> These delicate Baranaathi artisan scissors were made for cutting the woven grass mats that Baranaathi men use for practicing qhurasothi, the Baranaathi indigenous martial art.
Vae snorted before she could stop herself. Ridiculous. No one cut qhurasothi mats with fucking scissors, much less syrillium scissors. The damn things were two fingers thick, tough and springy. Where had these people gotten that idea? 
The Ivaelian girl was looking at her, head cocked. "Question?"
"Uh, no. Sorry." Then Vaelin looked at the price, and her jaw dropped open like a fox trap. Twenty aurei? For a single pair of scissors? "This price. Is this, uh, normal?"
"Oh, those are on special. They're usually twenty-four."
Vaelin blinked twice and slowly put the placard back down. With these kinds of prices, she could make an absolute killing selling her own work. Of course, everything else here was just as expensive, but still. It was worth thinking about. She just needed to get her hands on a good supply of raw syrillium.
"Thanks," Vae mumbled.
"Of course. Come back soon," the girl said. Or never. Never would be good. Vae closed the door behind her, careful not to knock anything over with her pack.

Outside, the sudden bustle of the square was bright and loud after the dim quiet of the shop. But the Vaiumbratal continued on the opposite side, so she needed to get across. Best to just brave the crowd and get it over with.
The center of the square was occupied by a big, rectangular building with marble colonnades along each side and a squat, square tower on one end. Atop the tower, a huge stone sculpture of a woman stood holding aloft a glittering semicircular object. On the other end, one entire corner of the building was in utter ruin, like mud that had been crushed by a child's fist. The damage looked fairly recent, but Vae didn't see any signs of construction. An accident, maybe? It looked like a Finger had struck the building, but it was only that one structure that had been damaged. And of course there were no Fingers here, inside the Stormwall.
The crowd grew thicker as Vaelin approached the ruined building. Between the building and the crowd was a wooden scaffold, about twice Vaelin's height, made of rough-cut timber. And suspended from the scaffold were six people --- all, by the looks of it, Cantarian. At first, she thought they had been hung, but as she got closer, she could see that it was much worse than that. The people --- four men and two women, she could now make out --- had been nailed to a horizontal post by their tongues. The tongues were horribly distended and torn, shredded by nails. It looked like some kind of long sausages had been shoved down their throats. Ropes were tied around the bodies to support some of the weight, lest the tongues rip through completely. All but one of the bodies were completely still. The last, a young man only a few years older than Vaelin, was still twitching feebly. Vaelin covered her mouth and stared, suddenly afraid.
A small crowd was gathered in front of the scaffold, blocked off by a line of soldiers armed with halberds. In the front row of the crowd, an old woman was sobbing and crying out, being held back several other people. She wore some kind of patterned scarf around her neck, as did a number of the caramel-skinned Cantarian women Vaelin saw nearby. As Vaelin watched, the woman broke free of the others and dashed forward. One of the guards swung the back end of his halberd into her stomach and she doubled over, but kept moving forward. Another guard hit her on the back and she fell, screaming. The guards pulled out truncheons and began beating the old woman, rhythmically and mercilessly, until she stopped crying out. Then the guards allowed the crowd to drag her back into their midst.
Vaelin had worked her way in by this point, and she glimpsed the woman's face as her senseless body was carried away. She was not actually an old woman at all, but perhaps in her early forties, and Vaelin realized that she was probably the mother of the boy on the scaffold. The parts of her face that were visible behind the bruising showed that she was old long before her time, and her body had been bent by suffering rather than years.
Vaelin turned to the man next to her, a portly Ventacan aristocrat in a fur-lined cloak. The man saw her looking at him, stared at her like she was insane, snorted, and moved away. Apparently, the rich in Thelenza had a similar attitude to her class as the rich in Aabsaan. So much for equality under law.
She found a woman who appeared closer to her social strata and caught her eye. "Excuse me, but what is this? What happened here?"
This woman also looked at her strangely. Vaelin wondered if her dialect was incorrect and she had inadvertently said something rude. But a tall, balding man in humble dress, with a skin tone similar to the beaten woman, spoke to her in an unfamiliar accent.
"You are new to Thelenza?" She nodded. "These people were Cantarian, like me. But unlike me, they were disloyal. Do you see that destroyed wall, there? They did that. There were thirty five people trapped in there, mostly government ministers and their staff. All dead. These terrorists are getting what they deserve."
Vaelin was aware, vaguely, of some kind of ongoing fracas between Cantaria and Ivaelia, but she didn't know the details. She thought she remembered that Cantaria was currently a protectorate of Ivaelia, which had been the case since the war. Vhar had also been involved, somehow. But apparently some Cantarians weren't happy about the state of affairs.
Another Cantarian man, younger and bearded, was listening in on their conversation. He broke in with a furious whisper. "What? How can you say that? They were just boys and girls. You think that the shavaliae have agents in the field that young?"
"Why not? Jovadao was that young when she ---"
"Oh yes, you would bring up Jovadao, wouldn't you? Your fucking hero, I'll bet. You're as much of a traitor as she is."
The older man laughed with disdain. "I'm no traitor. I'm loyal to the country I live in, the one that I'm a citizen of. The one whose fruits you're enjoying. You don't look like you're starving, friend. Why don't you wake up?"
"I'm not your fucking friend, old man."
"You certainly are not! I should turn you in, traitor."
Their conversation had grown progressively louder, and others in the crowd had begun to turn around to see what the commotion was about. Vaelin saw several of the guards craning their necks to see as well. She decided that she didn't need to be involved in this scene and slowly slipped out of the way and continued across the square. She didn't see what happened next between the two Cantarians, but she heard shouting. She kept her back to it and didn't look.

She arrived at the gateway to the Warda as the sun was setting, red and fat in the sky. Half of the inner surface of the Stormwall glowed a deep red-orange, the other half fading into a dark slate. For the last hour, she had been climbing a steep hill, one of a few that peeked out above the cloud layer. The hill was completely surrounded by clouds so thick that she could barely see the opposite side of the street, but as she rose and the vapor began to thin, she could see brief glimpses of the city through the gaps.
The Warda had its own wall, very old and only about twice Vaelin's height. It was made of the same dark stone as much of the city, heavily pitted and covered with yellowish moss. The stones were hewn in a hexagonal pattern, and every point within each hexagon was connected by a graven line to every other point. The top of the wall was carved into intricate geometric shapes; all of the carvings seemed to have six or twelve sides, twelve points, or some other variant on the numbers six and twelve. Like the Madrium, many of the patterns repeated themselves at ever smaller scales, patterns within patterns within patterns.
She continued through the gate, which, judging by the rust on the hinges, was not opened or closed very often. The hill grew even steeper immediately behind the wall, and the road turned into a series of switchbacks. The buildings in this area were much more lavish than those on the other side of the wall; they were larger, and frequently had their own walls or tall fences, some complete with liveried guards who gave her hostile stares as she passed by. There was less traffic in this part of the city as well, although that might have just been due to the time of day. Within the estates she passed by, she could make out servants lighting lanterns and torches. All of the servants she could see appeared to be Cantarian.
From within the rich estates, she could smell food cooking, redolent with spices. She found herself tempted by the scent of cooking meat, and felt ashamed. She was visited by an unexpected pang of longing, feeling her aloneness more acutely than she had all day. There would be no warm hearth for her tonight, not even at the tail of a wagon. She had her bedroll, though, and it would be warm enough. Probably.
It was completely dark by the time she got all the way up the hill. When she turned around, she was greeted by a fantastic view of the city. The veil of clouds spread out below, hovering above a thousand thousand candles that rolled over the low hills and plains. Above the clouds, the air was humid but clear. Here and there, beams of light shot out through the thinner parts of the cloud layer. The southern half of the Stormwall rose darkly in the distance. Whatever else might be true about the city --- loud, smelly, crowded, violent --- she had seldom seen a sight more beautiful.
She turned and completed the final switchback, and was greeted with an even more awe-inspiring sight. The three great buildings of Thelenza stood before her, the side of the Stormwall rising, a deep purple now, behind them. Closest was the Madrium, although she could only see the top of it above a thick hedge. But even its hexagonal bulk was dwarfed by the tower of the Umbratorium, which soared above her like the leg of a giant. This close, she could see that each of the ribs of the tower was edged with a ribbon of syrillium, which was glowing softly now in the darkness. All of the ribs terminated about a quarter of the way from the top of the structure. The ribbons of syrillium snaked over the edge and come together at a single point, perhaps a balcony of some kind. Tracing the lines back down, she realized that they each continued along the ground, running in parallel down the center of the main road for a long stretch before branching out into different parts of the city at the bottom of the hill. She had walked right next to the lines earlier that day without noticing them. She suppressed a chill. This was where the orders came from, all of them. The words that made and destroyed lives --- great lives, and smaller lives, like her own.
All three of the main buildings were surrounded by a number of smaller buildings, and it wasn't until she cleared the last of these that she got a full view of the Madrium. It, too, was breathtaking, but in a different way. The walls were decorated with the same geometric motifs she had noticed on the wall of the Warda, but these were traced out in glowing syrillium, then covered over with colored glass, creating the effect of an enormous scintillating prism. During the day, the designs probably looked austere, but the colored glass gave the building a kind of warm glow at night, especially in the cool mist that had started to gather around the hill.
The gate to the courtyard of the Madrium was wide open, flanked by a number of guards who completely ignored her as she walked through, trying not to gape. There were a large number of lit fire pits in the courtyard, with crowds of young people gathered around each, warming themselves and chatting. Many of them seemed richly attired and in good spirits, but she saw a few who looked even more tattered and lost than she felt. There were a few tents scattered about as well. Overall, the entire thing had the atmosphere of a big festival.
She wandered over to a fire that looked empty and sat down on a log, then pulled out her minuaj pipe. She stared at it, rolling it over in her hands. A feeling of emptiness, of utter aloneness, filled her like a bubble of cold air. It felt like it often had in Aabsaan, the few times she had gone to parties where everyone but she seemed to belong to some group or another. She felt detached, as though all the people she was seeing were human and she was something else.
She smelled some food cooking nearby and realized that she was famished, so she put away the minuaj and started rooting around in her pack for the hard bread and cheese she had brought. When she looked up, there was a boy standing in front of her, hands on his hips. He was handsome, with the high cheekbones and light hair common to Ivaelians, but something about his expression spoke of deep arrogance.
"You must be quite talented," he drawled, a small smile on his face.
"Why do you say that?"
"Because you're obviously not rich."
She wanted to start off with a positive attitude in this new place, so she decided to give his backhanded compliment the benefit of the doubt. Besides, it was true: she was, quite obviously, not rich.
"You're right about that," she said brightly. "Does that make you less talented than me? You obviously come from means."
He laughed and sat down beside her. "Perhaps. My name is Katho, of House Dranavan."
"Vaelin, of, uh, House Drulaadi," she said. "So, you're here to try to get into the Madrium?"
He sniffed. "I won't merely try. I will get in. It's very simple."
"Well. You're quite confident, aren't you? How do you know for sure?"
"Because I've been training for it since I was six. And what about you? Do you feel prepared?"
"No," she replied, truthfully.
"Well, don't worry. I can always find a place for you with my other girls if you don't get in."
She sat there for a moment, absorbing this. Cantarians were known for having multiple wives, but this boy was not Cantarian. That fact soaked in before she realized how incredibly insulting he was being. It was so unexpected that she didn't even recognize it right away. "Wait," she said. "Did I miss something? When did I agree to be one of your girls? What does that even mean?"
He chuckled and put his hand on her leg. "Oh, girls are always happy to be with me. I've never had any complaints," he said.
"Hey!" She pushed his hand off her leg. She might have been forced to take this kind of treatment in Aabsaan, but she was damned if she was going to accept it in Thelenza. Not after what she had been through to get here. She didn't care how rich he was. "Who do you think you are?"
"I told you. I'm Katho, of House Dranavan. Maybe you should work on showing a little more respect for your betters."
She was mustering up a sharp retort when she heard a melodious voice calling from across the yard. "Katho! Hoy! Come here, I have to show you something."
She glanced across to where the call was coming from, and she forgot about Katho for a moment. In front of another fire was a very handsome boy, and he was looking at her. Or maybe looking at Katho. But whatever. He was looking near her. 
He wasn't tall, but he moved and stood with athletic grace. He had light-brown Cantarian skin, curly dark hair, and his eyes were light-colored; by the firelight, she couldn't tell if they were green or blue or something else. Something about his bearing bespoke a pride and self-assurance that had been missing from most of the other Cantarians she had seen in Thelenza.  There was something odd about his skin, but the lines of his bone structure were clean and strong, his jaw hard and muscular. 
"Well, nice chatting with you. Vaena, was it?" Katho said.
"Yeah, that's it," she said distractedly.
Katho stood. "Right. I'll be seeing you around." He sauntered away, and she scowled at his back. Then she glanced across the fire again, and the stranger was still looking at her. Definitely at her this time, since she was alone. He smiled, and her heart fluttered like a giuji about to hatch. This handsome stranger had called Katho away for her benefit. He had saved her. That was the kind of thing that just didn't happen to Vaelin, and it almost made her panic. She felt herself begin to blush furiously, and she looked away and started getting her bedroll ready for the coming night. 
Just to be safe, she slid her knife into the bedroll, near her hand. But looking around at all the other youths, she didn't really feel unsafe --- not like she would have back home. There was too much merriment here. She glanced up again before closing her eyes, and the stranger happened to glance her way again. She closed her eyes quickly.
But not without smiling back first.

She was jerked awake the next morning by a chorus of deep bells and chanting, both of which seemed to emanate from inside her own skull. She sat up, shaking off a light dusting of frost, and found that someone had put an extra blanket over her during the night. It was not an expensive blanket, but it was woven with cheerful yellow and green patterns. And someone had given it to her.
She looked around and, almost immediately, saw the stranger from the night before. He was putting on a fresh shirt, showing a muscular abdomen in the process. He pulled the shirt down and, almost as if he could sense her eyes on him, turned and looked at her. He smiled at her lazily, and she knew it was he who had given her the blanket. She felt a flush in her cheeks and looked away quickly and started packing up her bedroll, fastidiously brushing off the dust and dampness.
By the time she finished, he was standing before her, smiling down. She held up the blanket, neatly folded. "Is this yours?"
"Yes, but it's a gift. Please, take it." His voice was soft and low, with a slight Cantarian accent, like the men from the square the day before. Up close, he didn't look quite as perfect as he had from far away. The skin on one of his cheeks, stretching back to the ear, was puckered and shiny --- the mark of an old burn. His nose had also clearly been broken more than once. But these things made his lopsided grin somehow more charming, like cracks in the glaze of old pottery.
She nodded as graciously as she could. She had always felt strange about accepting gifts, but, knowing almost nothing about Cantarian custom, she thought it might be insulting to turn him down.
"May I?" he asked, indicating the seat next to hers.
"Please." 
He sat, then leaned back on his hands and took a deep breath, his eyes closed. "It's a beautiful morning for the Challenge, isn't it?"
"A challenge?"
He looked at her, surprised. "The Challenge. What we're all here to do?"
"Oh, right. Yeah, of course. I just, uh, we call it something else where I'm from."
He smiled. "Yes, you have an accent, too. And where would that be, where you're from?"
"Aabsaan. It's in Baranaath."
"A long way from here. You must be excited."
She thought about it. "Yeah. Yeah, I guess that would be one word for it."
He laughed. "I'm nervous, too."
"You don't look very nervous."
"I'm just good at hiding it," he said, looking off toward the gates. "Looks like they're getting started. We'd better get in line."
They grabbed their packs and joined the rest of the crowd. "So," Vaelin said, "is Katho a friend of yours?"
"That guy? No, I just met him last night. Honestly, I don't like him very much."
"Me either," she said, relieved. "So, where are you from? I mean, obviously Cantaria. But where in Cantaria?"
"Tenoava. Have you heard of it?"
"No."
"It's in the north. Do you like spicy food? Tenoavans make the best guloaj in Cantaria. We produce the best musicians, too. Everyone thinks of Rilao when they think of music, but it's not the only city in Cantaria."
She nodded, as though she had any idea what he was talking about. "Yeah. Right. So, um, what's your name?"
"Gadarien. Yours?"
"Vaelin."
By this time, a rough line had formed in front of the wide doors. The bells had ceased chiming, but now a single vast, low tone rolled into the air, vibrating the very ground. She couldn't tell if it was a bell or a gong, but it must have been huge to make such a sound. At the same time, the massive gates began to swing open, and a procession of young men and women dressed entirely in black, with black sashes wrapped around their waists, began to file out. They looked to be around Vaelin's age, perhaps a bit younger. They marched out and stood in ranks in front of the door, flanked by guards in copper cloaks. 
Next came a procession of slightly older students, dressed identically except that they wore blue sashes instead of black and looked, on average, a bit older than the previous group. They, too, formed up in ranks in the courtyard. This was followed by several other groups, all wearing black, with the colors of the sashes growing progressively lighter, the students getting older, and, she now noticed, the numbers growing dramatically smaller. The final group of students was quite small, perhaps twelve in all, and all of them wore immaculate white sashes and had their heads shaved, men and women both. They looked tough, their features shorn of baby fat and chiseled into hard masks.
There was a pause in the tolling of the bell, then it rang again, to the accompaniment of cymbals crashing. A group of dancers came out into the light, with flashing swords and bright masks and costumes, leaping about acrobatically. Several of them were linked together by strings at the wrists and ankles, and performed a complicated dance, leaping over and ducking under the strings as they moved about, always in tension. They wove in and out in precise geometric configurations. It was fascinating to watch, as were other dancers who swung flashing bits of metal on the lengths of ropes, spinning intricate patterns in the air. All the while, cymbals were crashing and some sort of flute was playing a high-pitched, reedy melody that reminded Vaelin of the wind in the mountains.
The cymbals crescendoed and the music tapered off into silence as the crowd applauded. The large bell rang out again, and another procession began, this time of adult men and women dressed all in white robes, with various colored sashes. Some of them wore sashes of multiple colored stripes, some just a single color. The crowd was completely hushed as this procession filed out to stand in front of the others.
Finally, a much smaller group walked out into the light. There were only two figures in white robes; one, a stern-looking woman with iron-colored hair, wore a multicolored sash. The other, a tall man with a hawkish face, a thick mustache, and an elaborate white headdress, wore a sash that looked pure white from certain angles, but flashed silver where the sun struck it. It was either made of or laced with syrillium. The two of them were surrounded by a small group of hard-bit soldiers in copper cloaks, several of whom carried flectari slung over their shoulders.
"That's the Yewiyatus," said Gadarien. Vaelin had already guessed as much, but said nothing. "I guess he's interested in seeing the Challenge."
The younger Sanavale had a paternal smile on his face as he looked over the crop of potential students. One of the soldiers saluted him, then handed him a conical speaking tube. He held it up to his face and addressed the crowd.
"You are probably wondering why I am here beside Maestra Haidana today. Due to recent security threats, we are implementing a new process for the Challenge. We have been informed that a Cantarian terror group, the shavaliae, has plans to infiltrate the Madrium. The Challenge will proceed as normal, except that each Challenger will be interviewed by our own resident Auratao, Maestro Jovadao." The crowd began to mutter at this news. "Maestro Jovadao will ask you a few questions about your loyalties. Those who pass the Challenge but fail to satisfy him will be gifted to the Yewiya for our research." The muttering grew in pitch. One boy, a chubby kid a little younger than Vaelin, bolted, his bedroll flapping behind him. A guard captain signaled to a couple of his men to follow the boy, and they trotted off after him.
Gadarien wore a look of grim determination. "This changes nothing, really. It's just a show of force. They would have interrogated each of the new tirae once we got inside in any case."
"Who is Jovadao? And what's an Auratao?"
"Jovadao is... famous among my people. Or infamous, you might say. He was one of the most powerful telumancers to ever come out of Cantaria. That's what an Auratao is --- our version of a telurix. Among other things, a high-level Auratao can detect when someone is lying, by listening to the musical pitches in his words."
Vaelin felt her stomach sink. She wasn't here with pure motives; she had no loyalty to the Nasura. Far from it. Would this man be able to tell, or could she fake it? Surely not everyone they let in would be a fanatical adherent of Ventaca. Would they? Belosveka certainly didn't fit that description. But she couldn't just run off, like that boy had done --- that would only make her seem more suspicious. She had to see this through.
"Do not attempt to lie to him. He will know. Believe me," Gadarien said, answering her unspoken question. 
The soldiers who had been flanking the processions now moved in concert, forming all the prospective students into a line. There was now a palpable air of fear mingled with the excitement. Vaelin and Gadarien were too far away from the front to make out exactly what was happening, but they could see that the men and women in white robes had taken seats in the courtyard, behind a long wooden table. The line wasn't terribly long, but the crowd was thick, so it was difficult to see what was happening. One by one, those in line were walking up, bowing, and doing a complex series of things that Vaelin couldn't decipher. She caught a flash of silver-white and realized that, whatever they were doing, it involved syrillium. For some reason, that idea calmed her.
The day progressed, and so did the line, slowly. The crowd cheered whenever a challenger did well, and jeered when they did poorly. Vaelin thought that was bad form; the poor things had already failed in front of everyone, so what was the use in making them feel worse? She resolved not to join in with the crowd except for the cheering part.
Eventually, they got close enough to view the proceedings directly. A challenger, this one a short girl with dark red hair who reminded Vaelin a little of Halavansa, stepped forward into the open space in front of the judges and bowed. Closer up, Vaelin noticed a small stream of aestus flowing along the center of the courtyard, barely visible where it passed into shadows. The girl stood directly in it.
"Ladrana Karanoya, from Zoldov, Vhar. I seek entry to the Madrium," the girl said, her voice ringing clearly across the square. Vaelin wasn't sure she could muster that kind of confidence.
The girl bowed again and then, suddenly, stepped back with one foot and raised both arms from her sides. Her movements were quick and sharp, her baggy blue clothes snapping in the air. She swung her leg up and kicked high above her head, then held her leg there for a few moments before lowering it to the ground. She then entered into a series of graceful movements, leaping and kicking and throwing her limbs around her as though fighting off an invisible army.
"Am I supposed to be able to do that?" said Vaelin apprehensively.
"Oh no, of course not," said Gadarien. "You can do any of the twelve major forms."
"Oh, good," said Vaelin weakly.
The girl finished, to polite applause from the crowd. She bowed again, then said, "Maestrae, I seek entry to the Madrium. Will you honor me with your questions?"
A white-robed maestro, wearing a purple sash, spoke immediately. "What are the names of the two central meridians of the upper leg?"
The girl answered without hesitation. "The crusal and the daradal meridians."
Another maestro, this one with a yellow sash, said, "Name the first three of the nine Celestial Winds."
"The Franal-Pusan. The Golanadal." The girl paused for a moment, thinking, then said, "The Elyrial?"
Gadarien scoffed. "Is that all? These are easy." Vaelin laughed nervously. She was starting to feel an alarming sense of urgency in her bowels.
The maestro nodded, without smiling, and sat. The girl looked visibly relieved. A maestra with a red and blue sash stood up. "What are the three essential virtues for a tira?"
"Um... purity. Humility. And..." The girl thought for a long moment. Just when it seemed she wouldn't come up with the answer, she exclaimed, "Obedience!"
The questions continued on in this vein for a bit longer. Finally, all the instructors remained seated for a long moment before one of them spoke, sounding a bit bored. "You have done well. Now you must demonstrate proper use of a gyrus. This courtyard is bisected by one major meridian, but also several minor meridians. Find the correct alignment of a three-tiered shrine in the center of the courtyard, making sure to account for the Heavenly Angles on each of the three levels. You have three minutes." 
A man dressed in a red shirt and pants walked out into the clearing, bowed to the judges, and placed a small circular object in front of the challenger, along with a slate tablet and some chalk. Vaelin could just make out that the circular object was covered in lines and symbols, with concentric rings of writing around the outer rim. Several interlocking metal dials were inset in the front, and appeared to move slightly as the device was set down.
The judge turned over an hourglass and sat down. The challenger bowed to the judges once more, then knelt before the device and began fiddling with the dials and marking things down on the slate. Several times she stood and turned slowly, watching the device and making minute adjustments, glancing periodically at the hourglass. Just before the hourglass was about to run out, she set the slate and gyrus down in front of her and bowed again. The red-dressed man collected the objects and took them to the judging table.
The judges conferred for a only few moments. The one who had spoken previously stood and said, "This answer is acceptable, although imperfect. Now for the final, and most critical, portion of the challenge: the drawing of syrillium. You must draw forth the semblance of an aculus from this brick. It is allowed to be larger than a real aculus, and it need not have cilia, but it must be sharp enough to puncture flesh." Vaelin didn't know what cilia were, but she knew that an aculus was basically a hollow needle, like the ones Belosveka had shown her. 
Another servant, this one dressed all in blue, stepped forward and put a small chunk of raw syrillium in front of the girl. It was about the size of a thumb, but it flashed brightly in the sunlight. The servant also put down a small, ornate knife. The girl bowed again, then knelt and picked up the syrillium and the knife. She pricked the inside of her arm and squeezed a drop of blood onto the syrillium, which absorbed the blood greedily. She then began attempting to pinch off a corner of the chunk, concentrating hard as she tried to will it into shape. Vaelin saw sweat dampening the girl's clothes.
"What's the big deal? Even I can do this," she said, under her breath.
Gadarien gave her a strange look. "What do you mean? That's pretty hard, I think."
Vaelin looked at the girl again. What was he talking about? Sculpting syrillium was so natural to her that she didn't even think about it --- she just did it. She imagined the syrillium taking a certain shape, having certain texture, elasticity, density, and so on, and it simply took that form. Of course, you had to do it in the right order, and you had to put in the proper amount of time into each step. And you had to cure certain steps before moving on to the next. But surely everyone who worked with syrillium knew these things. Didn't they?
The girl was trembling. So far, she had succeeded in pulling out only an almost imperceptible nub from one side of the syrillium. The judge knocked on the table three times and said, "You have one minute remaining." The girl didn't look up, but her expression intensified and she closed her eyes. Vaelin found herself rooting for her, silently. The entire crowd seemed to be holding its breath.
Finally, the syrillium began to elongate. The girl pulled on it --- too hard and too quickly, Vaelin thought --- and it separated from the block. A long tail drooped down from the bit she had pulled off, and she began hardening it, pouring her will into it.
The judge rapped on the table again, three sharp knocks, and the girl immediately fell to her knees and laid the syrillium before her. The servant scurried forward once more and ferried it to the judges. The judge picked up the aculus and frowned, inspecting it in the sunlight. Several of the other judges passed it around between them, murmuring to each other, not looking at the girl at all. The first judge took the aculus back and signaled to the servant, who reached into a pail and produced what appeared to be a chunk of meat, complete with skin. Vaelin wrinkled her nose. The servant brought the meat forward on a plate and put it in front of the judge.
The judge looked up at the girl, then slowly pressed downward into the meat with the syrillium. The aculus created an indentation, forcing the surface of the meat down, but didn't quite puncture it. Vaelin could see the tip of the aculus bending with the pressure, and wondered if it might snap. The judge pressed harder and harder, but the needle wouldn't penetrate. He shook his head. Then, as if on a whim, he pressed down one more time, and this time the needle popped through the skin and slid into the meat. The crowd let out a collective sigh, and a few people cheered, but soon hushed as the judge looked up sharply.
"This test was a failure," he said. The girl brought her hands to her mouth and looked like she was about to cry. "However," said the judge, smiling just a little bit, "given your performance in the other categories, I find this acceptable enough to give you a chance. What say the rest?"
The other judges nodded or shrugged, but none protested. The judge stood and bowed, and the girl let out a sob as she bowed back. The crowd let out a full cheer this time, and Vaelin joined them. 
"All that remains now is verification of faith and loyalty," said the judge. "Maestro Jovadao, if you please." 
Jovadao stood. He was an imposing man, with the brown skin of a Cantarian and the muscular build of a warrior, his black hair cropped close to his broad head. Like the other judges, he wore a pure white robe, although he was the only one of them with a green and yellow sash. His neck was tattooed with strange symbols, with an entirely different aesthetic than the geometric patterns adorning the Madrium. These were less angular, made of a series of lines and curves and arcs. They radiated out from a central circle around his larynx, then wrapped around his throat and up the back side of his jaw to terminate around his ears, which were also heavily tattooed. 
Jovadao stepped out from behind the table and stood with his arms clasped behind his back. The girl solemnly approached and stood before him, and they talked quietly for a few moments. Jovadao then turned and nodded to the judges and sat down again.
This time, it was Maestra Haidana who stood and said, simply, "Welcome to the Madrium, Tira Karanoya."
The crowd cheered enthusiastically. The red-headed girl half walked and half skipped over to an area where several other youths were gathered, and took her place among them, amid pats on the back and congratulations.
Several other Challenges passed in the same way. Some of the challengers didn't make it past the first round, and Vaelin pictured herself in their position as they walked back into the crowd, heads bowed in shame. Her throat was dry, as was her water skin. She was about to humiliate herself in front of all these people, but if she turned tail now, it would look even more suspicious than before. Given what she had seen earlier, she really didn't want to attract that kind of attention. Who knew what had happened to that kid who had run off? Maybe he was being interrogated right now. Based on what she had heard about the Yewiya, she really didn't want to find out what that was like.
Finally, the line moved up, and Gadarien was next. "Don't worry," he said in his soft accent. "You're going to do fine."
"Good luck," Vaelin whispered.
Gadarien stepped out in front of the judges, his gait calm and relaxed. He bowed and said, "Gadarien Relotea, of Tenoava." There was some murmuring in the crowd at this statement. Gadarien was the first Cantarian challenger to appear, and it seemed that his home town was known somehow. "I seek entry to the Madrium."
Gadarien began his athletic routine with a looping, dance-like step, which quickly turned into a series of spinning kicks and acrobatic flips and hand-stands. It was masterful. The crowd, despite their feelings about Tenoava, burst into applause when he was done. He bowed, only slightly out of breath.
He handled his question-and-answer challenge just as deftly, and when his turn came with the gyrus, he solved it with a whole minute remaining in the hourglass. The syrillium appeared to be the only challenge that was actually a challenge for him, but he managed to create a reasonably sharp aculus with a little time to spare, even if it was enormous compared to a real aculus.
Then Jovadao stepped out. With the other, non-Cantarian, challengers he had seemed simply impassive, but toward Gadarien, he looked hostile. They spoke for a significantly longer time than the others had, and Vaelin could see the tension between them, the tightness in Gadarien's shoulders, the rigidity in Jovadao's face.
Finally, they both seemed to relax. Jovadao stepped back, and they bowed to each other, then Jovadao gave the other judges the nod. The applause was polite, but muted, as Gadarien joined the ranks of his fellow tirae.
It was Vaelin's turn. Her hands and feet felt cold and detached, as though they were no longer part of her body, and her head felt like it was about to float away. Somehow, her legs took her out to the center of the courtyard.
"Vaelin Drulaadi, of Aabsaan, Baranaath. I... I seek entry to the Madrium," she stammered. She had almost forgotten and used her real name. Her tongue felt thick in her suddenly dry mouth.
She bowed, and began a village dance that she had learned as a child in Aabsaan. Someone in the crowd snickered and was quickly hushed. She had to do something more impressive, more like fighting. She started working in some qhurasothi moves, throwing kicks and simulating takedowns. Normally, her movements would have been efficient and restrained, simulating realistic strikes, but she exaggerated the motions. The crowd was murmuring, but she couldn't tell what that augured. She threw herself into the movements, sweeping her arms and legs around in big arcs. 
She suspected she wasn't meeting the mark. She needed something spectacular. Reaching back in her memory, she thought of a dance step that she remembered her mother practicing when she was very young, and had always liked. It was something she had done a few times, experimentally, on her own, but had seldom done perfectly. It was far too flashy to be practical, and she had never used it in qhurasothi sparring. Now, though, she had no choice: she needed something flashy. But if she was going to impress these judges, she had to do it flawlessly.
Dipping down, with one leg stretched out and the other curled under her, she drew both hands along the ground in front of her. Then, suddenly and dramatically, she pivoted onto one hand, spun in the air, and kicked. Her body twisted as she came back down, flipping out a second kick just before landing. A small whirlwind rose up briefly from the courtyard dust and swirled away. The crowd gasped and applauded, but the judges were frowning, looking at each other.
One of the judges, a light-haired man wearing a purple sash, stirred. "Where did you learn that last move?"
Vaelin paused. She couldn't tell the whole truth. "I'm not sure. I guess I must have picked it up from someone on a caravan."
Jovadao frowned. The other judges whispered to each other for a few moments. "You may continue," said the one in the purple sash. The crowd's murmuring grew louder, until the judges finally turned and shushed them.
"Name the four major meridians of the head."
Vaelin felt her face flush. "I... I don't know."
The judges looked at each other. "Name three phenomena of the Five Phases of Wind in the body."
"I don't know."
The judge sat down, and threw his hands up in the air. "Well. Do you know anything? Did you prepare at all for this Challenge?" She said nothing, just stood with her head down, fidgeting with her hands. "Do you know how to use a gyrus?" She shook her head. Her face felt like it was on fire, and she could hear people in the crowd openly laughing at her now.
"It appears you have come here to waste our time. There is a penalty for such things --- do you know what it is? No, of course not. It will be ten lashes for you if you don't come up with a reason why we should spare you."
She looked up, dumbfounded. Belosveka hadn't mentioned this.
"Well? Nothing? Okay." The judge signaled to the guards, two of whom strode toward her.
"Wait! The syrillium. I can do that part," Vaelin said, backing up. The soldiers paused and looked back at the judges expectantly. The judge sighed and pinched the bridge of his nose, his eyes closed. Without opening them, he irritably waved forward the man in blue with the chunk of syrillium and the knife, which had been carefully cleansed in the interim.
Vaelin picked up the syrillium. It wasn't top grade, and it wasn't virgin, but she could work with it. She warmed it up a bit between her hands, then blew on it before pricking herself with the knife --- on her tongue, so it would heal quickly --- and dripping a bit of blood on the material. She heard snickering and murmuring from the crowd. She closed her eyes, then, swiftly, pulled off a small chunk of syrillium, shaping it into a perfect tapered point as she did. She held it up at the correct angle relative to the courtyard's meridian --- she hadn't seen anyone else do this, either --- and hardened it with her will. The aestus flowing along the ground swirled up a little, moving around her legs, tingling ever so slightly where it touched her. She heard gasps, but didn't look up. She then drew another needle from the chunk, identical to the first, and hardened that as well. The crowd began to chatter, but they were hushed again by the judges.
Vaelin had taken the chunk of syrillium between her hands and was manipulating it. She made sure no one in the crowd could see what she was doing. She stood with her eyes closed for over a minute, sculpting, while the hushed crowd watched. Then she opened her hands, and between them was a small syrillium bird. As the crowd stared in astonishment, the wings flapped up and down slowly, an exact replica of the motion of a real sparrow.
The judges sat staring at her, several of their mouths hanging open. Jovadao had a quiet smile on his face. She heard a whoop and clapping, and glanced over to see Gadarien grinning at her. The clapping spread, and then the whole crowd was applauding. She still didn't quite understand what the big deal was. If she had had top quality, virgin syrillium to work with --- and a little more time, of course --- she could have done something with much finer clarity and cleaner lines. But apparently even her rough sculpting was something special.
"Extraordinary," said the purple-sashed judge. "Where did you say you were from, again?"
"Aabsaan. In Baranaath."
All of the judges were looking at her, but one was leaning forward and staring with a strange intensity. She realized with a shock that it was Demeia Sanavale. She had been silent during all the proceedings, looking faintly bored, but now she seemed completely intent.
"Well. Exceptional. Given your talent with syrillium, we may be compelled to overlook your other failings. However, one challenge remains. You must be accepted by Maestro Jovadao." Jovadao stood and came around the table. Slowly, Vaelin walked over to him, all eyes on her. The Yewiatus was still leaning forward, his elbows resting on the table.
"Relax," said Jovadao. His voice was deep and resonant, though he spoke very softly. "Now. What is your purpose in coming to the Madrium?"
That one was easy. "To learn," she said. Not a lie.
"You say you are from Baranaath, but you don't look Baranaathi to me. Where are you really from?"
"My mother was Kulnaran. I never knew my father."
"Well, you are telling the truth about that, at least. Now, a more important question. Do you accept Ventaca as the Way of Reason?"
She swallowed. "I'm not sure."
He frowned. "Historically, not all tirae have been of the devout. But, as you no doubt heard, the Yewiatus is cracking down on entry to the Madrium, especially for foreigners. I can't allow you to enter unless you can renounce all other philosophies and faiths and accept Ventaca as the Way."
She stared at him, mutely, trying to will herself into believing that what she said next was true. "I... I accept Ventaca as the Way," she said.
Suddenly, Jovadao's stare turned cold, his frown deepening. He stepped back and turned toward the judges. Then, slowly, he shook his head.
The guards snapped into motion, stalking toward her from both sides. They grabbed her by the arms. Her blood turned to ice water. "No, please. No." She looked around at the crowd, and saw Gadarien staring, his eyes wide in dismay, and his hands covering his mouth. The murmur of the crowd grew louder.
"Wait," said a voice from behind her. She turned, and there was Demeia Sanavale, looking down at her, a small smile on her face. The woman was very tall, far taller than she had looked from a distance, almost the same height as Belosveka. She half-turned, addressing her fellow judges. "This girl is clearly not Cantarian. I don't think she's plotting anything. Besides, talent like hers should never be wasted. We shall grant her entry to the Madrium." 
Her knees suddenly went weak, and she slipped out of the hands of the guards, who looked almost as shocked as she felt. Demeia turned back to Vaelin and looked her up and down where she knelt. The tall woman smiled. "But we will be watching you."

# Chapter 6 #

The chamber had no windows, but there was a lantern hanging from the point of the inverted bell that formed its walls and ceiling. The six walls were blue, like the other cells to either side of it. Aside from the carved wooden doorway and the thin hexagonal carpet on the floor, the room was bare.
Vaelin lay belly-down on the carpet, feet crossed above her, paper and pen in her hands. The essay was ostensibly about what lessons she had learned from Ventaca and how she had applied them in her life. Given that she had known next to nothing about Ventaca prior to a few weeks ago, she was having difficulty with this one. Fortunately, she had discovered a certain aptitude for bullshit in her time at the Madrium.
The chamber was small and isolated, but she didn't mind the isolation as much as some of the other tirae seemed to. She was used to being alone. Actually, she looked forward to being alone with books, and the Madrium had no shortage of those. Her first sight of the library had stolen her breath --- row after row of books and scrolls, stretching back hundreds of feet. She had never dreamed of having access to so many. And that was just the First Library, with the books that were open to everyone. There was a second level, accessible only to uppertirae, and a third, not available to tirae at all. 
Vaelin moved aside her scratch paper and started again. Even such a luxury as paper had been beyond her in the past. She still couldn't bring herself to throw the stuff away, especially if it only had writing on one side, so a stack of used sheets stood tottering in the corner.
She had also managed to acquire a private journal, bound in waxed canvas and filled with rough paper. It was a cheap item in Thelenza --- Vaelin had borrowed it from a vendor in the Kharsium, the grand bazaar she had originally passed through on her way to the Madrium. She fully intended to pay the vendor back once she had a chance to make some sculptures and sell them. She wrote in the journal every day, recording her most private thoughts. For privacy, she had devised a kind of shorthand code that only she knew how to decipher, and had gradually started writing every entry in that code.
She stopped daydreaming and got back to work on her essay. To me, Ventaca is a means of exploring my spirituality, she wrote. True enough, although that exploration was more in opposition to what she was being told than in line with it. Decades-old bitterness and rage could be spiritual, she supposed. The other tirae seemed to be gobbling up everything they were fed regarding Ventaca: it was a balm for all wounds, it was the key to health and prosperity, it was the one true path to Order and Peace on Telua. Blah blah blah. All she could think about when she was being fed such lines was Aabsaan, the crushing poverty, the ruins of buildings shattered by Sky Fingers, crumbling in the sun. Thelenza was rich, but the Nasura did not share its wealth. She knew better than to say so out loud, of course.
She spent the best part of the next two hours working her way through the essay. She was particularly proud of managing to tie Ventacan numerology and telumancy to her own Baranaathi understanding of the flow of winds out of the desert, although, in reality, they had nothing to do with each other. But that was what this was all about, as far as she could tell. She threw a line about how outsiders were all devils who should be cleansed, just for good measure.
She signed her name at the top of the essay and carefully folded it as she had been instructed, then departed for the office of Maestra Haidana, head of the Madrium and instructor for this particular course. So far, Vaelin's strategy had been to strive for the middle ground between terrible and exemplary, trying to avoid scrutiny as much as she could. She was still very much an oddity in terms of her background, not to mention her ignorance of Ventaca, which she couldn't completely hide.
The corridor outside her cell was lit brightly by hexagonal colored glass windows set high in the wall. She walked briskly, not looking into anyone else's cell. The staff had been quite clear about the rules: tirae in their first few months at the Madrium were not to fraternize with each other except in expressly sanctioned settings, such as self-criticism sessions --- informally referred to as "crits" --- or the nightly meridian cleanse.
Maestra Haidana's office was all the way at the end of the building, in one of the corners of the hexagon that composed this part of the Madrium. The door was, as always, closed, although it was a bit warped and hadn't quite latched. Vaelin had noticed several instances of this kind of detail at the Madrium: things that looked impressive until you looked a little closer and saw the flaws. Perhaps the Nasura itself would prove the same someday.
 Vaelin knocked. She waited for half a minute before knocking again, slightly louder.
"Enter," said a voice from within.
The Maestra's office was clean and austere, the pure white walls mostly bare except for a few mounted artifacts, all of which looked ancient. A large hexagonal window was bisected vertically where the two outer sides of the building met. One of the other walls was lined with bookshelves, but the shelves were mostly empty. There was no dust to be seen anywhere.
Maestra Haidana was reading something behind her large ironwood desk, and she didn't look up when Vaelin came in. Vaelin stood there awkwardly for a time, looking around. Her eye caught on one of the artifacts, an ornate silver and syrillium tube about the length of her forearm. The cylinder caught the light and refracted it in many hues, which were splashed across the wall. The silver was dented and tarnished, but beautifully crafted.
"The Scroll of Maidara," the Maestra said, still not looking up. "It's over two thousand years old, painted on vellum with ink made from ashes, blood, and ironwood sap. It's written in Old Kulnarish, which almost no one here knows how to read." She finally looked up. "You are of Kulnaran descent, are you not?"
"Yes," Vaelin said.  The Maestra frowned, and Vaelin corrected herself. "Yes, Maestra."
Haidana snorted. Vaelin actually did know how to read Kulnarish, or at least the basics of it. She had learned the rudiments from her mother before she died, and kept in practice all these years with a tattered Kulnaran folklore book she had managed to scavenge from an old trader. But the thought of an ancient scroll, containing who knew what mysteries from her ancestral homeland --- that was something else entirely. Vaelin had to force herself to stop staring at the scroll case.
"I assume you are here for a reason, Vaelin, and not just gifting me with your presence," the Maestra said. Vaelin cleared her throat and handed over her paper. "Ah, another masterpiece. I'm sure this will be enlightening."
Vaelin's cheeks grew warm. "Have I done something to displease you, Maestra?"
The Maestra sat back in her chair and smiled. "Indeed. You are here, at the Madrium. Taking the place, perhaps, of a truly worthy candidate. And all because Lady Demeia finds you amusing."
Her face was burning. She already felt out of place here; why did the Maestra need to shove her nose in it? "I'm just doing the best I ---"
"Yes, yes, I don't need to hear your tiresome justifications. I'm sure you're wearing your little heart out trying to make yourself look like something you're not. Well, I am not fooled. And I am going to see to it that you are put to the test. Speaking of which, I have a special duty for you. Tonight, and every night for the rest of your time here, you will serve the Vorsari."
Vaelin's jaw dropped open. "Every night?"
"Yes."
"But I haven't done anything wrong!"
"Serving the Vorsari is a privilege. They are responsible for the Stormwall. You should be honored."
Vaelin gritted her teeth. Every night? Serving the Vorsari was something that was usually assigned to those who had mouthed off to an instructor or transgressed in some other way. It wasn't the worst of punishments, but the uppertirae spoke of it with dread, although they had declined to go into detail about it. The worst part was that it was night duty, which meant that she would be up very late. When would she sleep? When would she study? 
"May I go?" she said, before rage made her say something she regretted.
"Of course. Report to the Vorsarius before the beginning of second watch tonight. Your prefect will give you instructions on how to get there. I'm sure you'll find the duty inspiring. Oh, and close the door carefully on the way out, please. It tends to bounce back open." 
It was all Vaelin could do not to slam it shut.

 There was a surprise crit that very afternoon, before the cleanse and after chores. Vaelin's prefect came for her just as she was finishing up an angry, coded entry in her journal. 
The prefects gathered up their respective tirae and herded them into one of the Madrium's many courtyards. This one featured a twelve-sided fountain with syrillium tiling that lit up at night. In the afternoon, of course, the tiles just looked like glass. Still, it was pretty, Vaelin thought as she sat down on the ground with the other tirae.
The Maestro leading the crit was a short, disheveled, jowly man named Lovad. He was a geomancy instructor, but also enthusiastically led crits. He seemed to enjoy handing out both criticism and punishment, along with a healthy dose of self-righteousness. Vaelin couldn't stand him, but she was careful not to let that sentiment percolate into her words or her demeanor. Lovad was not a man to forget an insult.
"Ours is a world of chaos and disaster, fraught with danger and strife. The Nasura has brought order and stability. We owe the Nasura everything," he was saying. "We should all praise the Nasura for what it has given us. Without the Nasura, we would be ruled by animals." He paused and gave Gadarien a significant look. Gadarien just smiled, as though he were enjoying the performance. Vaelin chuckled inwardly, but kept her face carefully neutral. 
"Now. Time for us to express our shortcomings. Where have we failed? What could we have done better, both for the Nasura and for the glory of Ventaca? Let's start with you, Falden," he said, indicating a short, sandy-haired boy. 
Falden looked surprised, then stammered out a reply. "I, uh, I have failed... to... study hard enough," he finished lamely.
Lovad gave him a sour look. "Surely you can do better than that. Does anyone have any criticisms for young Falden, here? How about you, Adranaya?"
All the heads turned toward Adranaya. She was strikingly beautiful, clearly thoroughbred Ivaelian --- tall and slender, with long, straight hair and high cheekbones. She paused in thought for a moment, then said, "Falden has been late to class and crit several times this week. The teacher had to repeat himself when Falden was late to one of our study sessions. He wasted everyone's time."
"Ah, good!" exclaimed Lovad. "And what should his punishment be? Anyone? Vaelin."
She jumped. Shit. She couldn't be too lenient, or Lovad would turn his ire on her, but she had nothing against the poor kid. She settled on a middle ground. "Ten demerits?"
Lovad's eyes narrowed, but he seemed to accept this. "Fine. And since young Falden here has already amassed forty other demerits this week, he will be cleaning latrines tomorrow rather than enjoying forest meditation with the rest of us."
Oops. She hadn't realized that she would be pushing Falden over a demerit threshold. She gave him a guilty look, but he didn't meet her eyes.
"Since Vaelin has already spoken, why doesn't she continue and tell us her failings this week?" Lovad said with a smile.
Shit. Shit! What would he want to hear? Ah, yes, something regurgitated directly from his own words. "I have made the mistake of thinking of myself as having worth on my own, when, in reality, I am only useful as a part of the whole," she said gravely. "There is no me without all of us." Out of the corner of her eye, she caught Gadarien suppressing a laugh at her false gravitas.
"Good! We must all remember this lesson! None of us are above reproach. All of us are part of something bigger, and we must never forget. 'For we are each of us but weak vessels, through which the wind of righteousness may blow.' Shame on you, Vaelin, for thinking otherwise. Five demerits. Now, who shall be next?"
The crit went on for some time, until eventually it was Adranaya's turn to confess. She stood up straight and spoke in a clear voice. "I am guilty of judging others more harshly than I judge myself. Sometimes I forget that I, too, have failed to do my absolute best for the Nasura."
Lovad looked pleased by this admission. Vaelin struggled not to gag. "Fine. Gadarien, what should her punishment be for this transgression?"
Gadarien looked at Adranaya, and Vaelin saw his expression change. Oh, no. She recognized that look --- it was the same look Jalaat had worn when she looked at Jov, her crush back in Aabsaan. Probably the same look Vaelin herself wore when she looked at Gadarien. He had it bad for Adranaya. And why not? He was the golden boy, and she was the perfect girl: beautiful, always composed, always on top. Vaelin began to hate her just a little.
"I don't think she deserves any demerits," Gadarien said.
"No? So, you think she is perfect, then? Well, I disagree. Five demerits for Adranaya, and ten for you, Gadarien. I hope you're happy."
Actually, Gadarien looked pretty happy. Adranaya looked at him and quickly looked away, her face flushed. Vaelin's heart sank.
As the crit continued, Gadarien and Adranaya kept glancing at each other. And Vaelin watched every glance.

The entrance to the Vorsarium was through a series of dank tunnels below and behind the Madrium. They were constructed in much the same way as the tunnels leading into and out of Thelenza, a combination of natural caverns and man-made passageways. This time, however, Vaelin was walking through them alone, at night. Water dripped from the ceiling, sometimes landing on her head and rolling coldly down her back, adding to her general unease. The tunnels started out chilly, but grew steadily warmer as she headed down the slope.
She had asked around amongst the other tirae in her class, but no one seemed to know much about the Vorsari aside from the fact that they were responsible for the Stormwall, and that they were somehow dangerous or creepy. There were rumors that they drank human blood, or lava, or that they cocooned themselves and glowed in the dark, like giuji. One tira swore that the Vorsari weren't human at all, but spirits encased in volcanic stone, with breath of hot steam. Vaelin had a hard time not laughing at that.
Still, the walk through the tunnels was unsettling, and she found herself jumping at small noises and shadows. By the time she reached the actual door, she was sweating, both from nerves and from the heat, which had increased considerably.
The door was unadorned old oak, with rusty hinges. Twin braziers on either side of the doorway burned with a greenish flame, giving off a pungent, acrid scent. The walls behind them were covered with a patina of black soot. From behind the door, she could hear a sort of howling sound mixed with a bass rumble. Her heart pounding, she took a deep breath, smoothed down her clothes, and knocked.
The man who opened the door was not what she was expecting at all. He was short and reedy, with pale, watery eyes and brittle blonde hair. His eyes were also slightly bulging, giving him the look of a surprised amphibian. He appeared not to have slept, ever.
"Hoy," he said. His voice matched his appearance, thin and watery.
"I'm here to report for the night shift," Vaelin said, raising her voice above the rumble. "For the Vorsarium. Is this the right place?"
"Oh, yes, they told me about you. Come inside," the man replied.
The man shut the door behind her. "I'm Etibo, the night shift Keeper."
"Vaelin," she said, making the clasp with him. Behind Etibo, a group of six silver-cloaked guards stood silently, watching her. They looked as though she was the most interesting thing that had happened to them in months.
"What did you do? Insult an instructor?" Etibo asked.
Vaelin just grimaced and shook her head. She had no idea why Maestra Haidana had assigned her here, especially for every night, so she had no explanation.
He shrugged. "Oh well. It's not actually as bad as people make it out to be, once you get used to it. It's just that the Vorsari are... peculiar. Come on, I'll show you around."
One of the guards, a short woman with iron-grey hair, put up a hand. "I need to search you for weapons. Raise your arms, please." The guard patted Vaelin down thoroughly --- a little too thoroughly, perhaps --- and then waved them on, stepping back into place.
They continued down a passageway similar to the one Vaelin had come from, except now the eerie howling, rumbling noise filled the space completely. It wasn't that loud, but it sounded ominous. The passageway sloped downward and curved left in a wide arc, lit at intervals, as the preceding passageway had been, by braziers burning a pale green. After a few hundred paces, the noise grew louder, and the passageway suddenly opened up into a wide gallery, with a view into the gargantuan hall of the Vorsari.
The chamber was as big as the central building of the Madrium itself. The ceiling, if there was one at all, was not visible, due to a thick column of steam that rushed past through the center of the room. The steam was lit from far below by a reddish light, and the whole column of it --- indeed, the whole chamber --- glowed red. The rumbling and howling sound were joined here by a persistent hissing noise. There was a noxious, sulfurous smell in air. 
Spaced evenly around the walls of the chamber were a number of long, narrow balconies that projected out over the space, connected by a thin walkway clinging to the wall. Vaelin looked over the edge of the walkway and immediately drew back with a gasp. At the bottom of the chamber, far below, lava was bubbling and churning. Directly above that, several waterfalls cascaded out of the wall and into the lava, becoming the column of steam. It looked as though a good portion of the Nadrali river had been diverted here.
"It's something, isn't it?" Etibo shouted. "Don't worry, you get used to it."
Between the balconies, leading onto the walkway, were access tunnels like the one from which Vaelin and Etibo had just emerged. Each balcony was guarded by another silver-cloaked man or woman, armed with a spear. Several wide galleries were carved into the rock above. One of them, midway along the wall to Vaelin's left, looked to be quite large and deep, and there was some sort of stone plinth just at the edge of the gallery overlooking the drop-off.
"That's the Hall of Winds. They hold executions there sometimes," Etibo shouted cheerfully.
All of this was background, though, to the main feature of the room: The Vorsari. They sat at the very ends of the narrow balconies, balanced precariously over the column of steam. They were all, as far as Vaelin could tell, young women, sitting nearly motionless and cross-legged. Stretching over their heads were structures made of numerous long poles, affixed to stout posts behind them. The poles glinted with syrillium, and at the end of each structure was what looked like a huge flectarus, fluttering in the steam. The Vorsari held their hands in front of them as though playing invisible harps, their skin glinting redly.
Etibo turned and began traversing the walkway toward the nearest balcony. "Your first duty will be changing out the chamber pots. Then you'll bring them a meal. It is absolutely critical that you don't disturb them in any way --- be as quiet as you can. It's pretty hard to wake them, they're so deep in their trances, but best not to find out what it takes."
As they drew closer, Vaelin was able to pick out more details about the nearest Vorsarix. This one had pale, gleaming skin and dark stubble where her head was shaved almost bald. She was wearing a diaphanous white garment that left little to the imagination. It was hot enough in the chamber that Vaelin envied her a bit, but the envy ended abruptly once she got closer. The Vorsarix's skin was gleaming because of constellations of aculae, which covered her from her forehead all the way to the soles of her feet. Vaelin had never seen so many on one person.
"Doesn't that hurt when they walk?" Vaelin said.
Etibo gave her a strange look. "Walk? They don't walk."
Even closer, Vaelin saw thin strings of syrillium connecting the Vorsarix's fingertips to the pole that stretched above her. As she moved her hands, there was a corresponding motion in the flectarus at the end of the pole. aestus swirled and flowed down a syrillium-tiled channel in the center of the balcony, terminating at the Vorsarix's tailbone.
Etibo put his finger to his lips and they walked past the guard, down to the end of the balcony. The edges of the cloud of steam sped past, blowing Vaelin's clothes and hair about. Sure enough, there was a chamber pot beside the Vorsarix, and a tray with several empty bowls. Etibo pointed to them, and Vaelin quietly stacked them and picked them up. The Vorsarix didn't move, except for her hands, which continued to weave slowly in the air.  Her eyes were shut, but Vaelin could see her eyeballs rolling around underneath the lids, as though she were dreaming. The heat from the steam, and the noxious fumes --- which seemed stronger out here at the edge --- made Vaelin feel a little light-headed.
They took the pot and tray back down a different tunnel, where there was a kitchen and other necessities. The kitchen was filled with Cantarian servants, bustling quietly about.
"Do you know how to cook?" Etibo asked.
"Yes," Vaelin said. That was one skill in which she was fairly confident.
"Good. You'll help prepare their meals; they're pretty particular."
"Do they talk to you?"
"No."
"When do they sleep?"
"They don't sleep."
Vaelin was taken aback by this. "What? How do they live?"
Etibo looked at her strangely once more. "They don't." Vaelin just stared, wide-eyed. "At least, not for more than a few years." 
Vaelin had heard that it was the greatest honor a Ventacan family could achieve to have a daughter among the Vorsari. Generations of young Ventacans had lined up for the chance. The existence of the Stormwall, and therefore Thelenza itself, depended upon it. Vaelin wondered if those girls and their families had any idea what kind of sacrifice they were really making. 

The tunnels that led back from the Vorsarium were long, winding, and riddled with smaller side tunnels that led off who knew where. Vaelin was already exhausted by the end of her shift, and the walk back was tedious. On the upside, though, there didn't appear to be anyone around at that time of night, so she was free to scoot down one of the side tunnels and have a quick puff.
She ducked aside and went around a bend, into complete shadow, just to be safe, and sat down with her back to the tunnel wall. For a few moments, she just sat there, exhaustion soaking through her body like rain through a thin tunic.
She dragged her pouch into her lap and opened it, intending to dig for her pipe, and was surprised to see a faint glow illuminating the interior. She dug around until she found the source: the cocooned giuji that she had put in the bag back in Aabsaan. It was pulsing very slowly with bluish light.
She brought it close to her face. There were small cracks in the surface, and the light emanated more strongly from these. As she watched, a long crack along the length of the cocoon began to split open. Faintly glowing, translucent goo dribbled out onto her hand.
"Gross," she whispered, wrinkling her nose.
The cocoon slowly split apart. Inside was a fat, healthy giuji, glowing brightly. She picked the rest of the cocoon off of it and stared at it for a little while. It was a male. And it was little piece of home.
She got up and carried the giuji down the tunnel, using its light to guide her. The tunnel wound around several bends, growing a bit narrower as it did. From the musty smell and the thick layer of dust on the floor, it appeared that no one used this tunnel any more, ever.
After a while, she found what she was looking for: a small alcove, really just an indentation in the wall with a nearly-flat bottom. She tore a strip of cloth off the inside hem of her Madrium-issued robe and wadded it up into a makeshift nest, and put the giuji inside it. She had taken a roll of bread from the Vorsarium kitchen for a late night snack, and she tore off a bit of this and put it in the nest with the giuji. She would sneak some more appropriate food and bedding into the tunnel later.
The giuji needed a name. She pondered it for a while, and then smiled. "Fihro," she said. She petted the creature gently, then turned and headed back out the dark tunnel, feeling her way along the walls with her fingertips.

Weeks passed. Each night, Vaelin reported to the Vorsarium, returning to her chamber in the early hours of the morning. She was constantly exhausted, but she somehow managed to drag herself out of bed each day and sit through her lectures and practice sessions. Her physical training suffered, but, fortunately, she had been in excellent condition to begin with, thanks to her years of qhurasothi. And as the weeks went by, her body slowly began to adapt to the lack of sleep. Bit by bit, her performance improved.
During this time, several tirae were dismissed from the Madrium. Two girls were selected to become Vorsari, and taken off to begin their training in a completely separate environment. The other tirae all congratulated them, as though they had won some sort of lottery. Vaelin bit her tongue. 
Mostly, though, the expelled were those for whom the rigors of constant physical training, isolation, and sleep deprivation proved to be too much --- rich kids, Vaelin thought, with a mixture of pity and contempt. 
After the first crop of tirae had dropped out (or been thrown out, depending on who you asked) the remaining tirae finally began learning about the practical aspects of teluro, rather than just mathematics and philosophy. Vaelin was pretty good at math, calculating angles of influence and proper lines of unda flow, but that didn't mean she enjoyed it.
Her favorite classes were those that dealt with manipulation of syrillium. She was far and away the best tira in that category. Infuriatingly, Adranaya sometimes gave her strong competition, but Vaelin could usually outstrip her if she put in a bit of effort. And, of course, Vaelin had a hidden advantage: Fihro the giuji was producing syrillium. It was only a little bit, but the quality was much higher than what they were given to work with by the Madrium. She felt a bit guilty about using this advantage, but not guilty enough to stop.
For the first few weeks of syrillium training, Vaelin's preexisting skills had been enough to impress the teachers. She and Gadarien often sat at the back of the room and joked around, glossing over the entry-level training. Some of the instruction was, in her opinion, just plain wrong, but she supposed people had to learn a simplified version of the techniques before moving up to her level. 
She was still quite attracted to Gadarien, but she had learned how to hide it. She knew a lowly medicine girl like her didn't have a chance with a guy like him, not really, but it was fun to pretend.
The curriculum finally caught up to her innate abilities after a few months. She and Gadarien were snickering in the back of the room, trying not to laugh out loud, which, of course, made everything much funnier than it actually was. The instructor --- Maestra Haidana herself, this week --- glanced up from the complex numerical diagram she was drawing on the large classroom slate.
"Vaelin!" 
Vaelin started guiltily. "Yes, Maestra?"
"You seem to have a lot to say. Perhaps you can tell us all how, exactly, an aculus is affixed to the body?"
Vaelin gulped. She was sure she knew the answer, but her mind had suddenly gone blank. "Um... hooks?"
A few of her classmates laughed, but Maestra Haidana showed no sign of amusement. "No, Vaelin, not hooks. You certainly think you're clever, don't you? How does twenty demerits sound? Do you feel clever now?"
Vaelin said nothing. Her cheeks burned. Twenty demerits was pretty harsh. A few more for the month and she'd be facing some serious trouble.
"Who here actually knows the answer?"
After a polite moment, Adranaya raised her hand. "Cilia, Maestra."
Haidana smiled. "Indeed. And what are cilia? How do they work?"
"They're like little hairs. When the aculus is implanted, the cilia stretch out and curl up, like screws, anchoring the aculus in the body."
"Good!" said the Maestra. Adranaya beamed. Vaelin rolled her eyes and turned to Gadarien to make a snide comment, but he was looking at Adranaya, smiling. Vaelin crossed her arms and slumped back in her seat.
A half hour later, they filed out of the classroom. Vaelin turned to find Gadarien walking beside her with his loose, confident stride. 
"So, you're really into Adranaya, I guess," she said, trying her best to sound casual.
Gadarien grinned. "You're wondering what I see in her."
"Well, I mean, yeah. She's so... good. All the time. How can you stand it?"
"No, I get it. She seems stuck up if you don't know her. It's a confidence thing, I think. She has a lot of confidence." Vaelin tried not to feel personally insulted by the implicit comparison. "Girls act different when they're in a group. They get competitive."
Vaelin snorted. "And you don't? Please."
"Of course we do. But girls try to humiliate each other in public, while acting like they're not doing anything. At least guys are straightforward about it. Girls try to sneak-attack each other. Especially when there's something they both want."
"Oh, and what would that be? You?"
Gadarien said nothing, but wore an infuriatingly smug look on his face. Vaelin shook her head. He acted like he knew everything, which was deeply annoying, even if he was right sometimes. Did he think he was some kind of village elder or something?
Adranaya turned and smiled back at Gadarien, her long hair swaying as she whispered to the girls who formed her fan club. Despite herself, Vaelin felt a swell of envy. Would she ever have that kind of effortless grace? Doubtful. No wonder Gadarien was into her.
"She's not what you think," Gadarien said, still watching Adranaya's sashaying figure. Vaelin would have sworn that her hips were moving more than they strictly needed to. "She acts like a good girl in front of the teachers, it's true. But there's more to her than that. A lot more. I think you two would actually like each other if you gave it a chance."
"I'll keep that in mind," Vaelin said. But Gadarien either missed or ignored her sarcasm.
"Don't worry," Gadarien said. "I have a big heart. There's room for two in there." Vaelin stopped abruptly and stood gaping at him. Had he really just said that? He walked away, grinning, leaving her standing in the hall as the other tirae streamed past.

Vaelin's nightly trips to the Vorsarium had become routine enough that the guards recognized her, and she could come and go without being searched every time. She cooked meals, served them, and collected the chamber pots, over and over. Strangely, she never once saw the Vorsari make use of either item. Perhaps they waited until there was no one around. The guards who stood at the entrance to the balconies always faced away, so the Vorsari had some measure of privacy.
It was always hot in the kitchens, and tonight was no exception. She put down the ladle and wiped her brow, then picked up the tray of soup bowls she had just finished pouring. She glanced up at the Cantarians, who were bustling around, doing various kitchen chores. She had gathered a few words of kitchen Cantarian, but there wasn't really much time to talk, and these Cantarians weren't terribly talkative in any case. Besides, what would they talk about?
It was a tiring walk up the long stairway from the kitchens, and she trudged upwards, balancing the tray on one hand. A tunnel ran in a ring around the main chamber, opening onto the balconies where the Vorsari kept their vigil. Vaelin usually took this route, although it took a bit longer than the walkway along the inner edge of the chamber. The walkway's edge was a steep drop off, and there was no guard rail. It unnerved her.
She carried the tray down the brazier-lit tunnel to the first of the twelve balconies and nodded to the guard who stood at the balcony entrance. The guards were supposed to keep silent, but sometimes they would nod back or even smile. This one nodded solemnly.
She walked carefully down the narrow balcony, aestus swirling past her legs. The Vorsarix was, as always, sitting cross-legged and silent, slowly weaving her fingers in the air. Vaelin was putting down the soup bowl when her hand slipped on a wet spot and it clattered down onto the ground, hard. Only a bit of soup splashed out, but it was loud.
"Sorry!" Vaelin said, and then immediately covered her mouth.
But it was too late. The Vorsarix had heard her. 
Slowly, she rose up off the rocky surface. Vaelin gaped, open-mouthed. The Vorsarix was hovering in mid-air, a few inches off the ground. Just as slowly, she rotated around until she was facing Vaelin, who still stood with her hands up over her mouth, wide-eyed. The structure over the Vorsarix's head swayed a little as the syrillium threads stretched.
The Vorsarix opened her eyes. They were solid white, rolled all the way back in her head, and glowing faintly. She opened her mouth, but all that came out was a clacking, choked sound. Her entire mouth, including the surface of her tongue, sparkled with aculae, and her teeth shone like the moon.
Vaelin screamed and, forgetting her tray and everything else, ran full-tilt back to the safety of the tunnel. She never spoke to one of the Vorsari again.

# Chapter 7 #

"Hey, Gadarien, wait up a minute," Vaelin said. It was winter now, and everything was covered with a light dusting of snow, which twinkled like glass. The frost crunched beneath her boots as she walked quickly across the large, hexagonal courtyard to catch up with him.
He turned around and grinned. "Vaelin. What's happening?"
"Hey," she said again. She leaned in close, and spoke in a low voice. "Do you happen to know where I can score some minuaj around here? I'm almost out."
He looked surprised for a moment, and then laughed heartily, slapping his thigh.
"I'm serious," Vaelin said, looking around to see if his laugh had caught anyone's attention.
"I know," he said, still grinning. "Actually, yeah, I do."
Vaelin felt relief wash through her, both at finding a minuaj source, and at the fact that he wasn't laughing at her. 
"Great!" she said.
"What's in it for me?" said Gadarien, suddenly serious.
She paused, staring at him. "What? What do you mean?"
He broke into a grin again. "Just kidding, it's no problem. You have cash?"
"Yeah, of course," she said, relieved once again. She had spent several of her weekly free days down at the Kharsium, and had managed to sell a few sculptures and small items, syrillium sewing needles and the like. Her private syrillium factory, Fihro, had provided the raw material, and she had done the rest. People were willing to pay far more in Thelenza than she ever could have earned back in Aabsaan, and, for the first time in her life, she found herself with a significant amount of discretionary income. Of course, everything here was also more expensive, so it mostly evened out. But her meals and basic needs --- uniform, bedding, etc. --- were already taken care of by the Madrium itself, so any money she earned was available to spend on whatever else she wanted. Most recently, she had bought herself a warm cloak and nice boots for the winter, both of which she was wearing.
"Okay," he said. "But just for reference, I do accept sexual favors. How much do you want?" he said, before she could react to the previous comment.
"Um. Enough to last me a couple months. Maybe a quarter stone?"
"Wow," he said, chuckling again.
"What?"
"That's kind of a lot. But yeah, no problem. I can have it for you in a few days."
"Great," she said again. Her conversational well seemed to have suddenly dried up.
"So..." Gadarien drawled, "you want to go smoke a little right now? I have a pipe, and I know a good spot."
"Now? Right before class?"
"Why not?"
It was a tempting idea. Their next class was Ventacan Theosophy Through the Ages, and was almost guaranteed to be dull. More importantly, the instructor, Maestro Ypanti, was notoriously soft-headed, and probably wouldn't even notice that they weren't there. And she would be alone with Gadarien.
"Sure," she said.
Gadarien grinned again. "Come on," he said. 
He led the way back across the courtyard and down the hallway, then opened a small door that appeared to be locked, but wasn't. The door led to a winding stone hallway, similar to the ones that led to the Vorsarium.
"Did you know that there's a whole network of these tunnels under Thelenza? My people built them, mostly."
"What for?"
"Originally, they were there to service the homes of the Ventacans. When the Stormwall was first raised, there was a long period --- years --- where it rained all the time, so they needed tunnels to keep dry. Now it's stabilized a bit, so everyone uses the streets, but the tunnels are still there. Cantarians have moved into the tunnels and expanded them."
"Wow. Is that where we're going?"
"No, I have a better place. I'll show you."
They continued down the tunnel, taking several turns and twists, until they came to another small door, barred on the inside. He unbarred and opened it.
Through the door was a small balcony with stairs leading down to the street, and a breathtaking view of Thelenza in shades of bright afternoon grey. The passageway had taken them to a spot in the middle of the hill, with the Madrium walls stretching high above, and the Stormwall higher above them. The gates of the Warda were just below, on a parallel street.
They sat down on the wall of the balcony, brushing off the snow. "A lot of people know about this exit, actually. People use it to sneak into town after curfew, and the instructors just ignore it. They all did the same thing when they studied here. They don't care."
"How did you find out about it?"
He smiled. "I have friends in town."
"The same ones with the minuaj hookup?"
"Yeah." He pulled a pipe out of his pocket, along with a flint and striker.
"Nice pipe," Vaelin said. It was carved out of some kind of translucent stone, perhaps jade. Her own was cheap and utilitarian, made of stonewood. She had plans to make herself one of syrillium, but hadn't decided on a design.
"Thanks," he said, offering it to her. He struck the flint for her while she held her hands around the bowl to ward off the breeze. The feeling as the smoke entered her lungs was immediate and delicious, a familiar chill that ran down her spine and made her extremities tingle. She kept her eyes closed, enjoying the kaleidoscopic colors for a few moments. When she opened them, Gadarien was watching her, grinning.
"Good?" he said.
"Oh, yes. Very good."
He performed a small bow, and they both laughed. "Cantarian, of course. Much better than the stuff they grow around here."
"We got okay stuff in Baranaath, but this is better."
"Tell me about it," he said.
"The minuaj?"
He laughed again, musically. "No, Baranaath. What was it like there?"
She handed him the pipe. "Depressing," she said, taking the flint. "Compared to here, everyone was poor, even the rich people."
"You must have been angry at the Teluri," he said.
"Angry at them? Why?"
He raised an eyebrow. "The Whirling Wastes? Where do you think they come from? All the land south of the Shuliath mountains used to be fertile, until the ancient Teluri started fooling around with the weather. Trying to fix things that they didn't understand. Now there are constant whirlwinds and sandstorms out there. All thanks to the Teluri."
"Wait. Are you saying the Sky Fingers are the work of the Teluri? In our history classes, they said Baranaath and the Wastes had always been that way."
He snorted. "They would. Their curriculum is handed down from here."
She could feel a slow anger welling up, but the minuaj dulled its edges. This was something to think about, perhaps, but later. It was too nice out here to get angry right now.
"Enough about that," Gadarien said, sensing her hesitation. "What was your home like?"
What to tell him? The truth was bitter, but she didn't want to lie outright. She couldn't possibly reveal what she really was, though, not to Gadarien. He would never look at her the same way again. "I grew up in a very strict house. Mahishat didn't take any back talk."
"Your mother?"
"No, my mother died when I was young. And my father died a long time before that."
He nodded, as though he had expected as much. "Mine too, they both died."
She thought about asking him about the manner of their death, but realized that she didn't really want to talk about that, either. She just wanted to enjoy this moment. She had avoided thinking much about Mahishat and her grisly death, and her mother's death as well, the whole time she had been at the Madrium. With all the new faces, new emotions, and new things to learn, she had been preoccupied anyway. And the nights at the Vorsarium left her too exhausted to think about the past. 
But apparently Gadarien wanted to talk about it. "Was it the war?"
She sighed. "Yes, for my father. I never really learned the details, but I know he died in the war. And my mother..."
And then, suddenly, she was crying, the tears running cold down her face. She put her face in her hands and wept, wept for her mother, for Mahishat, for the poor medicine girl that she had been. She felt Gadarien's arm go around her shoulders, felt him pull her in, and she leaned toward him and put her weight on his chest. Part of her was mortified that he was seeing her like this, but another part of her felt warm and cared for, for the first time she could remember, and this made her cry even harder. 
Gradually she became aware that Gadarien was singing. It was a soft, lovely melody that seemed to reach inside her and run soothing fingers down the center of her. It was almost like a drug in itself. She stopped crying, wiped her nose, and looked at him in surprise.
"It's a Cantarian thing. We're good singers," he said.
She smiled and laughed through her tears. "Yeah, you are." She disengaged herself from him and scooted back a bit. "Sorry about all that. I haven't thought about any of that stuff in a long time."
"Don't worry about it. Gets to me too, sometimes." And he put his hand on hers and squeezed, and it felt good, and for a while she didn't feel jealous toward Adranaya at all.

Adranaya was, Vaelin had to admit, a charming girl. The instructors clearly favored her, but she was unfailingly humble. Vaelin wanted to detect a note of falseness in her modesty, but, truth be told, it wasn't there. Adranaya's outward image betrayed no cracks, no glimpses of hidden motivations.
Vaelin didn't actually exchange more than a few sentences with her until they were paired up for an exercise to sharpen their skill with aculae. Maestra Haidana put them together, she said, in the hopes that Adranaya would "rub off" on Vaelin.
At the start of class, each pair of tirae was given a live dog. Theirs was a brown puppy with large, black paws and floppy ears. His hair had been shorn close to the skin, so he looked somewhat pathetic, but he seemed sprightly and in good health. Vaelin was afraid that they were going to be asked to kill the poor thing, but Maestra Haidana assured them that they would not actually be harming the dogs unless they completely failed the exercise. 
Great, thought Vaelin. No pressure.
"Since this is the first time you will use your own aculae on a sentient animal, an instructor will be supervising each of you directly, and I will be circulating around the room. Your assignment is to implant nine aculae in the dog, three along its primary meridian, and three more along the utial and ansavial meridians. Then you will demonstrate an ability to control the dog's actions. You will each have ten minutes. Your partner will assist you in holding the dog while you implant your aculae."
"I know we're not hurting him, but still. Don't you find this kind of disturbing?" Vaelin said quietly.
 "No," Adranaya responded. "I think we need to do it. Would you rather try it on a human the first time?"
"At least a human would know what they were getting into," said Vaelin. Adranaya said nothing, but began studiously examining her aculae, which she, like everyone else, had prepared in a previous session. They were nearly perfect, but not quite as good as Vaelin's. Of course, Vaelin's were made from the superior quality syrillium she had been farming from Fihro. But no one needed to know that.
Vaelin petted the dog, which seemed strangely calm. She wondered if it had been drugged. Maestra Haidana and another instructor finished up with a nearby pair of tirae and came over to Vaelin's table. She looked at Vaelin sourly, then smiled at Adranaya. "Are you ready to begin?"
Adranaya nodded. She began by closing her eyes and breathing deeply, entering a light trance state. When she opened her eyes, they were dilated wide. She began carefully feeling out the dog's meridians with her fingertips. Vaelin held the dog, petting his head softly. She thought, very briefly, about sabotaging Adranaya's efforts, but just as quickly quashed the idea. It was beneath her, and besides, she didn't want to hurt the dog. Also, her own turn was coming up next, and she needed Adranaya's cooperation. She concentrated on soothing the dog as best she could. The rest of the class was watching, politely silent, from their own tables.
Adranaya put her last aculus in the dog's forehead, and sealed it. Vaelin let go of him, and Adranaya half-closed her eyes, holding her hands out to the sides. The dog stood, looking a bit wobbly.
"First, you will guide the dog in a circle around the table," Maestra Haidana said. "Be careful not to let him fall off the edge." 
The dog took a tentative step, then stepped back. He looked up at Vaelin. She smiled encouragingly, but said nothing; she wasn't allowed to help. The dog looked over his shoulder at Adranaya, then took another step forward. Then he took a few more steps. Eventually, he completed the circle and barked once, sitting on his haunches. 
"Good. Now make him stand on his hind legs and hold the position." The dog complied almost immediately. "Now for the real test: can you make this animal do something that he wouldn't ordinarily be able to do? With his front paws, inscribe two circles in the air, each moving in the opposite direction of the other."
The puppy looked back at Vaelin again, his tongue hanging out. Then, slowly, his paws began to move toward each other. The puppy turned his head and stared down at his paws, looking confused. The paws met in the middle, then, jerking a bit, circled out away from each other. He barked once more, then dropped onto all fours and looked up expectantly, panting and wagging his tail.
"Excellent. You may remove the aculae. Be careful --- it's easier to cause injury while removing aculae than while putting them in. Be sure to relax the cilia completely before pulling."
Adranaya put her hand on one of the aculae and closed her eyes. The dog whined a little bit as she pulled the aculus out, but stayed still. She moved to the next aculus and the dog yelped almost immediately. Adranaya jumped and exchanged a guilty look with Vaelin. She closed her eyes and slowed down her breathing, and the dog calmed as well. Slowly, she withdrew the aculus, and the dog remained silent. A sheen of sweat had appeared on Adranaya's perfect forehead, and she exhaled audibly after the aculus was free of the dog's skin. The puppy looked a bit dazed for a moment, but soon wagged his tail again and began licking Vaelin's hand.
Adranaya removed the rest of the aculae, but she was breathing hard by the time she was done, sweat stains soaking her clothes. The dog yelped once more when she removed an aculus from a sensitive area near the tip of his nose. Adranaya finished and laid the final aculus on the table and bowed to the two instructors.
"Well done, Adranaya. Nearly full marks." Maestra Haidana picked up an aculus from the table and held it up to the light. "Your cilia are too long and too thick. That's why you had trouble with the withdrawal. Try to concentrate on that next time. Now," she said, turning to Vaelin, "your turn."
Vaelin relinquished the dog to Adranaya, who gave her a brief smile of sympathy and began petting him. Vaelin went through the breathing exercise and picked up one of her aculae.
She slid the aculus home, and the dog didn't even seem to notice. She closed her eyes and concentrated, willing the cilia near the surface to wind into corkscrew shapes under the skin. The dog paused in his panting, but gave no other sign of distress. Vaelin released her held breath and permitted herself a little smile. So far, so good.
She put in the rest of her aculae. To her satisfaction, the dog hardly reacted at all. She stepped back and looked at Maestra Haidana.
"Good. First, the circle," Haidana said. The dog walked in a circle immediately, stepping smartly and returning to his exact position when he was finished. Haidana looked up with surprise, and Vaelin shrugged.
"Right. Now for the standing ---"
But the dog was already up on his hind legs, balanced perfectly, drawing circles in the air, first in one direction and then the other. He paused, looking straight ahead as though he were a soldier. The he spread his front paws wide and slowly brought them together and bowed.
"What is this?" Haidana asked. But Vaelin wasn't done.
The dog crouched down, still balancing on his hind legs. Then he dropped to all fours and jumped into the air, throwing out two kicks with his back legs before landing. It was the same move with which Vaelin had ended her Challenge routine, adapted for a dog's body. The dog stood on his hind legs and bowed once more before dropping back to all fours.
The Maestrae stood still, jaws agape. "Vaelin, how did you do that?" Maestra Haidana said.
Vaelin shrugged again. "I have good aculae."
"Hmmm." The Maestra looked at her with a mixture of disapproval and grudging respect. "By pushing your control so far, you risked damaging the subject, or driving him insane. All for the sake of showing off. For taking such a risk without approval from your instructor, ten demerits. However, it was still impressive work. Full marks on your test."
Vaelin bowed, eyes lowered. When she looked up, Adranaya was looking at her with an unreadable expression. Was it admiration she saw? Or something else?

"So, I'm guessing you're a good dancer," Adranaya said.
Vaelin's initial thought was that this was a racial slur, but Adranaya's expression wasn't snide. Kulnarans were widely assumed to have some sort of innate sense of musicality, and Kulnaran bards were famous all around Telua. The assumption rankled a bit, although in Vaelin's case, it happened to be true. Maybe Adranaya just didn't know any better. "Why do you say that?" Vaelin asked.
"From the way you train. You really know how to move. Did you study fighting before you came here?"
"Qhurasothi. Twelve years of it," Vaelin said, impressed that the willowy girl could tell such things just from her movements. And more than a little flattered.
 "Oh, wow. That's mostly grappling, right? Want to come with me to the Kharsium? There's a group of musicians in town from Hoshin. I asked Gadarien to come with me, but he says he doesn't like Hoshinese music, even though he's never actually heard it."
Vaelin was nonplussed. Where was all this coming from? She and Adranaya hadn't ever done anything together without Gadarien. Was this some kind of strange aggression, asserting her ownership of him somehow? Or was she just reaching out a hand of friendship? Vaelin felt a bit ashamed of herself for being so suspicious, and decided to accept the offer as it stood.
"Sure. When, today?"
"Yeah, are you busy?"
"No. Let me just get my bag."
They stopped by Vaelin's quarters, then headed out the main entrance. Every twelfth day, Madrium students were permitted to come and go as they pleased during daylight hours, since they sometimes needed to purchase items in town for their studies. The freedom was intoxicating, even if she only had time to take advantage of it once every twelveday. The day was bright and warm by Thelenzan standards, and the air felt fresh and crisp. The roar of the Stormwall had become such a constant in Vaelin's hearing that she hardly noticed it anymore, but the sight of the colossal structure still took her breath away every time.
"Did you get a lot of musicians coming through Aabsaan?" Adranaya said.
"A few. Mostly it was just people on the caravans who called themselves musicians, but it was good enough to dance to." When she had been allowed to dance. When she wasn't trapped in the house of Mahishat, doling out her medicine, the hot weight of a man pressing her down. She shook her head, willing the negative thoughts away.
"Well, I've seen this troupe before. They're amazing. You're going to love it."
Vaelin smiled. Maybe Adranaya wasn't so bad. Maybe her outward perfectionism was reserved for her schooling. Gadarien certainly saw something in her. Vaelin started feeling a bit nervous, for some reason she couldn't define until she realized that she was afraid Adranaya might not like her.
"I bet you've seen a lot of great troupes, living in Doriola," she said.
Adranaya's face lit up, and she began to gush about all the shows she had seen. It was hard not to be jealous of her privileged life, but it was also hard to hold it against her, now that Vaelin was starting to see her enthusiasm for something other than following the rules. In Ventacan high society, it was generally looked down upon for unaccompanied young women to attend events, especially something as dubious as music, but Adranaya had done so many times, sometimes even sneaking out. Despite herself, Vaelin was impressed.
They made their way down the Vaiumbratal, their Madrium attire drawing a few stares. No one accosted them, though; it was strictly forbidden for normal citizens to molest Madrium students in any way, a rule that was enforced quite harshly. However, Madrium students were known to be relatively free spenders, given how many of them came from wealthy backgrounds, so the merchants started at them with a mixture of longing and reluctance.
They traversed the Kharsium, stopping once to admire a few intricate Cantarian woven goods, and another time to gawk at some crumbling pottery that was purportedly from Old Tisuul. It was certainly expensive enough. Eventually, they reached a small, paved courtyard, one side of which had been given over to a makeshift wooden stage.
Vaelin had met Hoshinese workers before, as part of the caravan crews. But she had never seen Hoshinese in their full traditional costumes, feathers and all. They were resplendent and frightening, their long wicker masks extending far above their heads. Several of the performers rode stilts covered with exotic animal skins, giving them the aspect of strange, long-limbed animals themselves.
But it was the music that captivated most of all. It was at once stirring and haunting, a persistent throbbing beat underlying layers of eerie woodwinds and strings, with a single drone note pervading all. It made the hairs rise on Vaelin's neck. She wished she had a bit more money to throw into their collection basket, but Adranaya's contribution more than made up for it. She and Adranaya were the first in the crowd to begin dancing, but the Hoshinese soon had everybody moving.
They danced for almost an hour straight, and were both flushed and grinning by the time the music finally winded down. The musicians bowed to the applause and began packing up their instruments and taking off their costumes.
"Well, that was something," Vaelin said.
"Why don't we go talk to them?" Adranaya said.
"What?"
"Let's go meet them. Come on." She grabbed Vaelin's hand and dragged her over to the stage. "You were great," she said to one of the musicians. He grinned and bowed, but clearly didn't speak Ivaelic. 
Vaelin was embarrassed. "Shouldn't we be getting back?" The sky was starting to darken, and they had a sunset curfew.
"Oh, stop worrying," Adranaya said. Vaelin felt a flash of annoyance.
One of the other Hoshinese approached them, a young man not much more than Vaelin's age. He was quite short, but attractive in a lean, sinewy sort of way. "Thank you for coming," he said, in accented but flawless Ivaelic.
"Thank you for coming to Thelenza," Adranaya said. "I take it you've been here before?"
"I spent part of my childhood here, at the Xhoha Academy," the man said.
Adranaya looked impressed. "Well, you must really know your stuff."
The man smiled wryly. "About music, yes. Uolsha," he said. He extended an upward palm in greeting, Ventacan-style.
"I'm Adranaya, and this is Vaelin," Adranaya said, placing her palm on his.
"I can introduce myself," Vaelin said. She immediately blushed, feeling rude.
Uolsha's grin didn't falter. "We're going to the tavern two streets over to have a drink after we pack up. Would you care to join us?"
"Sure," said Adranaya.
"We can't," said Vaelin, simultaneously.
Vaelin grabbed Adranaya by the elbow. "Excuse us for a second," she said to Uolsha, who shrugged, still smiling. 
"We have to get back. We'll miss curfew," Vaelin said.
Adranaya rolled her eyes. "Come on, it's just a drink. We won't stay long."
Vaelin was confused. Adranaya was always a teacher's pet at the Madrium; Vaelin was the one who was supposed to be a troublemaker. What had happened? When had their roles gotten switched? Perhaps Vaelin was just more familiar with the consequences of getting on Maestra Haidana's bad side. But she definitely didn't want to be bore.
"I don't know," she said.
"Come on," Adranaya pleaded. "Just for a little bit, then we can hurry back. I'm tired of always playing by the rules."
Vaelin bit her lip. The part of her that wanted to rebel fought with the part of her that was afraid of disobeying. But Adranaya was persuasive, and in the end, her sheer charisma won out.
"Fine. But just one drink."
Adranaya did a little jump and clapped her hands together. Vaelin had to laugh.
The Hoshinese were boisterous and gracious. None of them spoke Ivaelic very well except Uolsha, who acted as translator. Just one drink became just one more drink, and then it was full dark, and they were going to miss curfew anyway, so why not have another drink? They could always sneak in through the postern door.
By the time they left the establishment, with unabashed embraces all around from the Hoshinese and a promise from Uolsha to pay them a call at the Madrium, the lanterns had been lit all across the city. It was a beautiful sight as they ascended the hill to the Warda, the skin of cloud above the city glowing a soft orange.
"That was fun. We should do that again," said Adranaya. She grabbed Vaelin's hand and squeezed it. Vaelin just managed not to jerk her arm back in surprise.
"Yeah," she said. It had indeed been fun. But now she was thinking of what awaited her back at the Madrium. She didn't have a Vorsarium shift this evening, thankfully. But if they got caught sneaking in after curfew, Maestra Haidana would not be pleased.
They climbed the shallow staircase carved into the rock below the "secret" postern door. Vaelin paused at the top for a last look at the city, a sight which still never failed to inspire awe. The Stormwall wasn't clearly visible in the dark, but she could feel its moving bulk, rising up and up into the night.
Just as she was turning to reach for the door handle, the door burst open and slammed against the wall. Standing in the doorframe was Maestra Haidana. Vaelin leapt back, almost tripping over Adranaya, whose mouth was hanging open.
"Out for a stroll, were we? Vaelin, I'm not surprised, but I expected better of you, Adranaya. To my office," she snapped.
They made the long walk down the tunnels in silence. Vaelin's heart was pounding, her palms were sweating, and she felt a lump in her throat that wouldn't go away. This was going to be bad.
They filed into the Maestra's office, which was lit by oil lamps. The precious artifacts hanging on the walls cast deep, angular shadows, accenting the harsh lines of the room.
Haidana leaned back against her desk and crossed her arms. "Adranaya, you have obviously been led astray by this one," she said, not even looking at Vaelin. "Since this is your first serious offense, I am willing to let it slide. You may go." Maestra Haidana walked back around her desk and slid open a drawer, removed a wooden box, and laid it on the desk. Vaelin felt a sinking feeling in her gut, but she wasn't surprised. She began to steel herself for what was to come.
Adranaya looked petrified, but she didn't leave. "Wait," she said. "I wasn't led astray. The whole thing was my idea. I wanted to break the rules. Vaelin just came along."
Vaelin turned, shocked. She was the medicine girl, it was her role to take the blame. The idea of someone else taking it in her stead was unfathomable, especially someone like Adranaya. "Adra, don't. You don't know what it's like. I've done this before, I can take it."
Adranaya shook her head. "No. It was my fault. You shouldn't have to pay for it." She turned to the Maestra. "Please," she said.
Maestra Haidana pursed her lips, her dark eyebrows raised. "If you insist. Vaelin, you may go."
"Wait, she can't ---" Vaelin began.
"If you want to share her fate, feel free to stay," Haidana said. Vaelin closed her mouth and looked at Adranaya, who smiled at her, sadly.
"Go," she said.
Vaelin closed the door, but it refused to latch completely. She waited in the hallway, slumped agains the wall, not able to make out the words, but definitely hearing their intent. Maestra Haidana had a gift for humiliation, and finding just the things to say that would make a tira feel like total scum. And then it would be time for the aculae.
Adranaya didn't cry out, which Vaelin found impressive. Eventually, she came out of the office, wiping tears from her eyes. 
Vaelin pushed off the floor and stood up. "Are you all right?" she whispered.
Adranaya smiled conspiratorially. "We should do that again some time," she whispered back. They laughed about it --- quietly --- all the way back to their quarters.

Vaelin wondered whose job it had been to collect mosquitos and trap them in a glass jar. Did they have to use their own flesh as bait? No doubt it was some poor tiro who had earned himself one too many demerits.
"You are wondering, I am sure, why I have a jar full of mosquitos," said Jovadao, his deep, accented voice rolling across the chamber. He smiled wryly. "I, too, am wondering." The tirae chuckled. "In seriousness, the reason I have this is to demonstrate an important point about channeling aestus. I will need a volunteer."
No one moved. "What, a bunch of teluri in training afraid of a few mosquitos? If no one volunteers, I'll pick someone. No? Okay. Vaelin, you look like you want to volunteer."
She sighed, stood up, and walked over. Jovadao was actually one of her favorite instructors, but he tended to push her more than some of the others. But Vaelin could tell that he genuinely cared about teaching, as opposed to Maestra Haidana, who seemed to begrudge every bit of knowledge she imparted.
"Aestus," said Jovadao, "is, of course, the source of our power. But aestus is not power. Aestus is perception. It doesn't make you stronger, but it allows you use your body more efficiently, so you seem stronger. It doesn't make you faster, but it allows your movements to flow together, so you seem faster.
"No one is sure where aestus comes from, or what it is. But we all use it. It doesn't matter if you're a Ventacan telurix, a Cantarian like me, or a Stoneslinger from Vhar --- we all draw from the same thing. But what happens to you, to your body and your mind, when you use aestus? What happens, over the course of years, if you keep drawing the same amount of aestus every day?"
The tirae all looked at each other. They hadn't studied this before.
"Nothing. Nothing happens --- your power stays where it is. You see, using aestus is like using your voice. If you don't use it for a long time, you forget how to speak." She paused at this, looking down at the floor, for an uncomfortably long time. The tirae looked at each other.
Jovadao looked up suddenly, blinking, as though she had just remembered the tirae were there. "If you use the same amount of aestus all the time, nothing changes," she continued, her reverie apparently over. "However, if you gradually increase the amount of aestus you draw, what happens? You get stronger --- up to a point. Just like with physical strength, each telumancer has her limits. Within those limits, the more aestus you draw, the more aestus you can hold within you. Of course, there are legends of those who have no limits --- but that's all they are. Legends."
Whispers fluttered through the room at this, but Jovadao impatiently waved the tirae into silence.
"Don't worry yourselves about the so-called Apexi. If they ever existed, they haven't been seen or heard from in hundreds of years. And, according to the legends, they've always been the product of two original conduar bloodlines, which means they were nobility. Which none of you are. So forget about them.
"Back to the lecture. If the silanus you're drawing aestus from is more powerful than silani you've used before, your capacity expands to hold it. But if you can't expand enough --- if you try to draw too much at once --- it can drive you mad, or kill you outright. This makes sense: imagine if you were blind your whole life, and then suddenly you were not only given sight, but given the sight of a hundred people, all at once. Your mind would not be able to handle the strain, and it would collapse."
Jovadao waved Vaelin forward. "If you'll permit me to mix metaphors, I'd like to illustrate this with an example. Come forward so you can all see. Vaelin, your arm, please." Vae stared at her dubiously for a few seconds, then slowly extended her arm. "Don't worry, you'll be fine." She opened the jar, then quickly upended it over Vae's forearm. The mosquitos flapped around angrily inside the glass. One of them landed on Vae's skin, and Jovadao swiftly pulled the jar away and put the lid back on it.
"Most of you already know that there are sites situated around Telua where the aestus seemed to flow totally unobstructed. A raging river instead of a small spring. In years past, teluri were able to find and tap into these rivers of aestus using a teluric map, but, unfortunately, the last remaining copy of the map was lost almost twenty years ago. Without the map, it has become much more difficult to navigate through the wilderness to any given silanus, although we still know where several of the big ones are. Obviously, there's a large one, the Madrafar, located underneath us right now. It's what allows the Stormwall, and therefore Thelenza, to exist.
"In any case, these silani allow a telurix to channel huge amounts of power, exerting control over, say, an entire army downstream in the teluric current. The amount of power flowing out of a silanus ebbs and flows, but some of them provide a constant stream. This is, clearly, a huge advantage. Why is it, then, that teluri don't just march to a silanus, park themselves there, and seize all the power in Telua for themselves? If the power to become a dictator is there for the taking, why does no one take it?" The class was silent. Jovadao looked around for a long moment, then looked down at Vaelin's arm. The mosquito was feeding now. Vae was almost shaking with the effort of not moving her arm away, but Jovadao either didn't notice this or didn't care.
"Well, for one thing, the Umbrata would crush them. But there is another reason. Imagine that this mosquito is a conduar, like you or I. As long as she is sipping aestus, she is fine --- she can draw off as much as she wants until she is full. If, however, she attempts to draw aestus from a source that is too powerful for her, like a silanus that suddenly surges..." Jovadao slapped Vaelin's arm above where the mosquito was feeding. Almost instantaneously, the mosquito burst, drawing sounds of disgust from the watching tirae. Vaelin's arm stung, and she scratched at the swelling mosquito bite.
"Don't scratch that, it'll make it itch more," Jovadao said. Vae scowled and went back to her seat, sullenly scratching the area all around the bite. "Anyway. As I said, the center of the Warda is situated on top of a powerful silanus. Actually, the Madrafar is underneath the Umbratorium, not the Madrium, but the Madrium is above a large meridian that flows out of it. The classrooms in this building are insulated from that flow, using special syrillium tiles. If they weren't, some of you would be dead.
"Now you may be wondering: if I can just draw more and more power to make myself stronger, why doesn't everyone just draw as much as they can, slowly, growing more powerful with each sip? The problem is that you can't know what your own limit is until you've surpassed it --- until you're flowsick, in other words. If you overdose just a little bit, you will feel terrible for a few days, but you will recover. A little bit more, and there will be no recovery."
Vaelin looked down at her arm. There was still a bit of blood and blackness crushed there, which she would have to wash off. Despite her dislike of the creatures, she felt a strange sympathy for the mosquito. It hadn't known it was drinking too deeply. It was, from its perspective, not doing anything wrong. And if that was true, how was a girl like Vae supposed to know any better?

"What are we doing here, again?" Vaelin whispered. Last night had been a particularly long shift, due to a clerical error and a mix-up of ingredients that were supposed to go to the Vorsarium's kitchen, but ended up in a cold-storage room that Vaelin spent several hours tracking down. The result was that the literal fog pervading the square in front of the Umbratorium seemed to have also penetrated her skull and replaced her brain. She was having trouble keeping her burning eyes open; her eyelids felt like weighted curtains.
Adranaya looked at her with concern. "Are you feeling okay?"
"No."
"Maybe you should go lie down."
Vaelin shook her head. She refused to give Maestra Haidana the satisfaction. She would participate in everything that the other tirae participated in, even it killed her. "Just tell me what I'm supposed to do. I kind of missed that part."
A small part of the square was occupied by Madrium tirae and faculty, separated by a rope from the mass of Thelenza residents who filled the rest and spilled out into the adjacent streets. Most of the crowd looked Cantarian, and all of them looked poor. Some were clearly starving. Aside from the Madrium faculty, the well-heeled members of Thelenzan society were conspicuously absent. The crowd reeked, and, alongside the stench, an excited murmuring wafted through the shreds of fog.
"Just follow along with the chanting, and sit down when everyone else does," whispered Gadarien.
Vaelin nodded. Sitting down would be nice. The big Madrium bell rang out, a dark sound that was almost a rumble, and the murmuring quieted down into an expectant silence. In the distance, the Stormwall roared.
The front doors of the Umbratorium were covered with ornate Ventacan religious motifs in carved stone and syrillium inlay. They opened slowly, and a double rank of Umbratori, in full ceremonial dress, swaggered out. Aculae and syrillium tattoos glinted down their bare arms, like the diagrams Maestra Haidana often drew in class.
Behind the Umbratori came the Umbrata himself. He was dressed plainly, in soft grey robes, with a circlet of syrillium on his head. The soldiers halted and turned smartly to face each other, and the Umbrata walked between them, smiling at the crowd. He was a very ordinary-looking man, with dark hair and a slight paunch, but his posture was straight, and he walked with great purpose and gravitas. He ascended a wooden dais and stood for a few moments, looking out over the silent crowd.
"My children, be welcome. Today we are gathered for The Raising. Twelve of your number have been selected to rise to glory, and a life undreamed of. This tradition, begun by my father's mother, has become a cherished part of our culture, a way for those who come from outside our borders to truly enjoy all that Thelenza has to offer. You know the tales of those who have been Raised. I hardly need speak their names: Ilano Ros. Thiala Banivao. The incomparable singer, Lirola. But today, I have a special guest, a man who doesn't often appear in public. He's agreed to speak to you."
The Umbrata turned halfway, raising his arm in welcome. Another man, a portly, sweating, bald Cantarian in rich red and purple clothing, emerged from the Umbratorium. He was beaming, and waved in response to the excited chattering that followed his appearance.
"Who is that?" Vaelin said.
"I think it's Umbo Faisal," Adranaya said. "He's the biggest clothing merchant in Thelenza. He makes cloaks and headwear for all the richest citizens. He's a bit eccentric, likes to just show up in unexpected places riding his big white camel, and throw money around. I mean literally --- he actually tosses gold into the crowd. And then he disappears for months, and there are always rumors about where he's gone. Some say he took the money from his Raising and went to the lands beyond Hoshin and sold his soul to become a great merchant. But he's very popular, especially with the poor."
That much Vaelin could tell from the crowd as recognition spread. The chattering turned to cheers as word spread to the back.
"Brothers and sisters!" Faisal called out, to more cheers. He continued once the sound had died down. "Ten years ago, I was like you. I was hungry. My life was a struggle, always fighting for scraps like a dog in the street. But then I was Raised. This man," he said, indicating the Umbrata, "changed my life, and I've done my best to share that good fortune with you, my people!" More cheers. "It is only through the largesse of this man, our holy Umbrata, that this city thrives. He keeps us safe. He builds the bridges and roads and fountains that we use every day. He is merciful and just! And all he asks in return is your allegiance. Will you give it to him?" He raised his hands, and the cheering grew very loud.
"They'd cheer anything he says. The people in the back can't even hear him," Gadarien whispered sourly.
"Shh!" Adranaya said, looking miffed. "People will hear you."
"Good!" Faisal and Gadarien both said simultaneously. Gadarien looked surprised, then scowled.
But Faisal was continuing. "Let the Raising commence!" He waved again, and bowed, and then stepped back off the dais. The Umbrata took his place.
"Each of you, of course, has your ticket. My assistant will draw twelve numbers. If your number is called, you and your family will receive enough gold to start a new life. Open a business. Pay for your children to attend one of our fine academies. Give back to your community --- to our community!" More cheering. "The Sisters will draw twelve numbers from the temple bell. If your number is called, make your way to the men in the blue robes at the front, and your new life will begin. And now, let the first number be drawn!"
A number of Sisters of the Wind, in their drab off-white cloaks and glass-bead veils, walked forward slowly, bearing between them a great upturned bell filled with scraps of paper. The bell rang as they set it down, a low, mournful sound that felt like an auditory twin to the fog.
The Sisters bowed to the Umbrata, and he inclined his head in return. One of the Sisters reached her hand into the bell and made a show of stirring the papers around before selecting one and, ceremoniously, handing it to the Umbrata. He smiled, then turned to the audience and read the number. There was an immediate whoop and a Cantarian man in his late forties began jumping up and down, one hand held high in the air. He was near the front of the crowd, so Vaelin could see his huge grin as he was congratulated by friends and family around him. He began pushing his way through the crowd toward the waiting attendants. 
The rest of the ceremony proceeded in the same fashion, numbers called, cheering, and the crowd stirring like a huge bowl of porridge. Madrium students weren't allowed to participate, so Vaelin's addled brain drifted off, until the last of the numbers was drawn.
The Umbrata read the number out, but the crowd remained silent for a few long moments. And then a rail-thin Cantarian man with a thick beard, probably in his mid-thirties, slowly raised an arm. He looked familiar, but Vaelin couldn't place him. His hand was clenched in a fist, his eyes hard as he stared, unsmiling, at the Umbrata. The people around him were not cheering. Slowly, deliberately, he raised his other arm and tore the chit in two, then let the two halves drop, fluttering.
The Umbrata did not look angry, merely puzzled. But he made a small gesture with his head and several Umbratori started moving though the crowd, toward the bearded man. The man remained where he was and did not resist as the Umbratori seized him and began dragging him away. Gadarien snorted with disgust.
"What was that about?" Vaelin whispered.
"A partisan. Making a pointless gesture," said Gadarien.
"What will happen to him?"
"Nothing good."
The man walked upright, refusing to be dragged. As he passed by, he caught Vaelin's eye, and she recognized him. He was the man who had spoken to her in the square, her first day in Thelenza, defending the supposed terrorists who had been executed. He stared into her eyes, and she felt a sudden, strange guilt, as though she were somehow responsible for his predicament. The inexplicable feeling haunted her the rest of the day until, finally, she collapsed into her bed.

The line stretched out the door and into the courtyard, its outlines blurred by thick curtains of rain. Not that Vaelin was interested in seeing the details any better --- as far as she could tell, all of the people in line bore a depressingly similar appearance. Sodden, ill-fitting clothes, grimy faces, a stooped posture of subservience. Just like the Baranaathi back home, except wet.
Of course, misery was precisely why these people were here in the first place; they had come to be Healed. This monthly clinic was the sole low-cost option for many of the poor; and in Thelenza, poor meant Cantarian. The air inside the clinic was thick with the musical strains of their language, reverberating loudly against the close stone walls. It was difficult to have a conversation, let alone make a diagnosis or suggest a course of treatment to someone who barely spoke Ivaelic. But she was trying, as was Adranaya, who sat next to her at the low wooden table that stretched across the middle of the room. 
The process was made more difficult by Vaelin's nerves, which were stretched to their breaking point by the presence of the man behind her. Demeia herself had decided to attend the clinic today and demonstrate her Healing powers, so any of Vaelin's diagnostic mistakes would be funneled directly to her. The woman had smiled at Vaelin dangerously when she walked in, her dark eyes twinkling, and Vaelin had felt rattled and out of sorts ever since. But Vaelin hadn't botched any diagnoses so far.
A very old man made his way to the seat in front of her and, slowly, painfully, sat down, tucking his long white beard out of the way. Vaelin managed a smile.
"What seems to be the trouble today?"
The old man worked his teeth for a while before answering. Perhaps his mouth was dry. "It's my back," he said, finally. "I can't lift heavy things any more."
Vaelin thought that this might have to do with the fact that he was older than the Ivaelic tongue, and possibly older than the entire concept of spoken language. He was certainly too old to be doing manual labor anymore. But, of course, he might not have much of a choice. Aloud, she said, "Well, let's see what we can do about that."
She took his arm and felt along the meridians of his right hand, then his left. There was definitely something out of alignment, but she couldn't tell which side it was on; the flow seemed to be constricted evenly on both sides. She stood and came around the table to him. He looked at her nervously.
"It's all right," she said, holding up her hands.
He relaxed, seeing that she didn't have any aculae. Everyone knew that being Healed was a painful process, so people were understandably apprehensive. She knelt and placed her open palm on his back and closed her eyes, entering a light trance. Ah, there was the problem: the meridian along his right hip was constricted, causing nerve pain. An easy problem to fix.
She returned to her side of the table and explained the issue to him as simply as she could. He nodded in understanding, then looked apprehensive.
"That's six and one," she said. The man stared at her, tears beginning to appear in his eyes. "You don't have the money, do you?" she asked, gently. The man lowered his head in shame.
She felt bad, but had no say in the matter: the cost was low, but if the patient couldn't pay, there was nothing she could do. She and the other tirae worked for free, but the clinic needed to sustain itself. Vaelin almost reached for her purse to cover the cost herself, but this was strictly forbidden. Otherwise, affluent tirae like Adranaya would constantly be paying the tab. Besides, if she paid for one patient, how could she justify charging all the others? It was sad, but there was no helping it.
But then Vaelin looked up and saw Demeia staring at her again, her wide, thin lips tipped upward by a smile. She beckoned.
"What's the hold up?"
"It's a simple treatment, your Glory. The right Florial meridian is blocked. But he doesn't have the money, so I was going to turn him away."
Demeia grinned and waved this thought away. "No, no. Bring him over here. I'll treat him. In fact, don't turn anyone away today. I'll get through them quickly."
Vaelin smiled and bowed. Perhaps the rumors were inflated; perhaps all the rumors about Demeia were untrue.

The diagrams were insanely complex, with hundreds of interconnected lines branching outward from the heart into each of the limbs, like lightning frozen on the page. The head was the most complex; there were six separate diagrams of the scalp alone, from various angles. Vaelin had to nearly touch her nose to the page to read the names of some of the smaller meridians around the eyes.
"Do they expect us to know every one of these?" Adranaya asked apprehensively.
Vaelin snorted. "Like you're going to have a problem. You've had them all memorized for weeks!"
Adranaya looked doubtful. Despite being at the top of their class, she still fretted and worried before every exam, continuously twirling and untwirling her long hair.
"Your hair is going to end up looking like mine if you keep doing that," Vaelin said. Both girls were envious of each other in this regard. Vaelin coveted Adranaya's smooth, straight waterfall, and Adranaya frequently gushed over Vaelin's wild, curly mane. It was emblematic of their respective social positions: Vaelin wanted badly to fit in, and Adranaya wanted to fit in a little less.
Adranaya dropped her hands to her lap. "Well, I don't feel like I know them. Can you quiz me again on the ears?"
Gadarien sighed loudly, to the annoyance of both girls. "I'd be happy to," Vaelin said pointedly.
"Well," Gadarien said, "I think we need a break, to let our minds rest a little bit. It's not good to just keep cramming things in there. You need time to absorb it all."
Vaelin couldn't really argue with that. Her skull felt like it was about to pop. "Okay. What should we do?"
"Let's play Skin or Secrets!" Adranaya said, laughing. Vaelin and Gadarien laughed as well. And then they all stopped laughing and looked at each other.
"You want to?" Gadarien said.
Adranaya covered her smile with her hands, then grinned wickedly. "Sure, why not? Everyone else is asleep, no one's going to come by." 
Vaelin had played the game a few times in Aabsaan, clandestinely, with other children of low status. It was always a thrill. Around these two, though, she felt strangely shy about her body, despite all the men who had seen her. Maybe it was because, to them, she was still just an ordinary girl, and she desperately didn't want to spoil that image. 
"I don't know," Vaelin said.
"Don't be scared," Adranaya said. "We won't judge you. Much."
Vaelin smiled uncertainly. "You guys go ahead."
Gadarien rolled his eyes. "Come on. It's nothing we haven't seen or heard before."
"I doubt that," Vaelin replied. But Gadarien was already pulling out his dice. He rolled one of them, grunting at the result.
"Four," he said. He passed the die to Adranaya, who, of course, rolled a twelve. Adranaya handed the dice to Vaelin.
Vaelin sat with the smooth die, carved from some kind of animal hoof, in her hand, staring at the floor. It felt cold and wrong.
"Well?" said Adranaya. Vaelin looked up at her doubtfully. Well, maybe she would get lucky. She could always make something up, although that was very much against the spirit of the game. She rolled.
"Ones," Gadarien said. "You go first. Skin or secret?"
Vaelin picked up the die and felt her face start to flush. She couldn't do this. Her lip was trembling, and she struggled to control it. She couldn't cry, not now.
"Vae?" said Adranaya. "What's wrong? We're just messing around."
"You don't have to play," Gadarien added.
And at this simple kindness, Vaelin's guard came crashing down. She wept, dropping the die on the ground and covering her face, shaking with sobs. After a few moments, she felt a hand on her shoulder.
"Vae, what is it? You can tell us. Really," said Adranaya.
She gasped out another sob and looked up. Gadarien wordlessly handed her a handkerchief, and she wiped her nose. If she couldn't tell them, who could she tell? She couldn't live with her secret forever. If she didn't confess, she would always have to wonder whether they were truly her friends, whether they would still be her friends if they knew. Well, it was time to find out.
"In Aabsaan, I was..." she started, then paused, staring at her hands.
"Yes?" said Adranaya gently.
"I was a medicine girl," Vaelin said, almost too softly to be heard. She looked back up, and Adranaya was covering her mouth with her hands, eyes wide. Gadarien had a look of sadness that suddenly made him seem far older.
Vaelin turned away and, wordlessly, pulled down the top of her tunic, showing the oddly-shaped white scars across her back, a memento of the pain potion.
"Oh, Vae," Adranaya breathed.
Vaelin cried, facing away from them, her back and her past exposed. They pitied her, as she knew they would. How could people like them, good people, clean people, possibly be friends with her? She had been deceiving herself.
And then she felt arms encircling her. It took her a moment to register what was happening, and she flinched. But they were just holding her, both of them. Gadarien withdrew as Adranaya tugged Vaelin's tunic back into place and just looked at her, smiling sadly.
"Wow," Gadarien said. "Secrets and skin in one round." And Vaelin laughed through her tears, and, for the first time in a long time, she felt like she belonged.

As the months passed, fewer and fewer tirae remained in their class. Some were eliminated based on merit, some based on perceived flaws in character or behavior. Vaelin managed to keep her borrowing to a minimum, knowing the consequences if she got caught would be severe. Given how much Maestra Haidana disliked her, it might even result in her being kicked out entirely, and that was motivation enough to keep her urges in check. Early on, she had borrowed a few things from Gadarien; he was bemused at first, but as it continued, he grew increasingly annoyed. Finally, after the fifth instance, he told her that their further friendship depended on her cutting that shit out. She stopped after that, but had taken to biting her nails in frustration.
One more girl was shunted off to the Vorsarium, amid solemn congratulations. Vaelin was careful not to show any emotion at the news.
Some of the tirae were eliminated from the program via high-stakes competitive games, which Vaelin found, to her own surprise, she enjoyed. One game she particularly liked was called chalaval. It was similar to games that Vaelin had played in Aabsaan with a ball that had to be thrown into a small goal at one end of a field, but instead of balls and goals, chalaval involved lightweight darts that floated on air currents in the room. The players faced off against each other across a broad chamber with glass windows separating it from a viewing stand, where the judges and spectators sat. Each player was issued a dull flectarus --- made of syrillium, but not made by the player, and therefore not fully bound to his or her will --- and several darts. 
The point of the game was to sense the meridians of the room --- the invisible axes of force, the flow of air, the subtle curvature of floor and ceiling --- and use the flectarus to push a dart through the air and strike the other player. The darts weren't sharp enough to cut, but they stung. Usually, the way the game shook out, a player would score by circling the dart around his or her opponent's back and striking from behind; frontal strikes were very rare, since they were easy to block. A player had to account for not only her own movements, and the air currents they created, but the movements and currents created by her opponent, attempting to trick him into lending force to her own efforts. It was a complex, exhausting dance, and Vaelin loved it.
During one such game, she found herself facing off against Katho, the boy who had been so insulting the night before the Challenge. He was as arrogant as ever, but she thought she saw a drop of worry in his expression when the game brought him together with her. By this point, she was known for her competitiveness and skill. The bastard was right to be worried.
The class had started the day divided into brackets; there were sixteen tirae left in their class, so they were easy to divide. The contests had been hard-fought --- everyone who was left was strong. However, Gadarien, Adranaya, Vaelin, and Katho had struggled up through the ranks, and soon it was down to the four of them.
Vaelin stepped out onto the court and bounced up and down a bit on the balls of her feet. She was tired from her other matches, and she suspected that she had strained a muscle in her groin while dodging Ladrana's dart two matches prior, but overall she felt good. She waved her flectarus through the air a few times, making sure of her grip. Across the court, Katho was rolling his shoulders out.
The chatter from the audience quieted down, and Katho and Vaelin turned and bowed to the judges, then to each other. Katho's bow seemed a bit sarcastic, and he had a smirk on his face that Vaelin was determined to wipe right off. She picked up her darts and spread them out in her hand, holding them loosely between her fingers. She crouched and waited, watching Katho's midsection.
The gong rang out and she sprang into motion. She floated her first two darts in the air and ran forward, fanning them in front of her. Katho looked flustered, taken aback by her aggressiveness. She grinned and shot one of her darts toward his face, allowing the other to drop toward his feet.
Katho danced out of the way of the first dart, but the second struck him on top of his left foot. Only strikes to the torso would win a match, but it made him curse and take a step back. This was the opening Vaelin was looking for. She spun to her right, releasing another two darts into the air as she did. She easily dodged two of Katho's darts, which he was frantically fanning toward her. Then, just to show Katho who was boss, she flipped up onto one hand, shooting the darts forward with the flectarus held in her other hand. He deflected the first dart, but the second curved around behind him and struck him solidly in the shoulder blade, behind his heart.
The gong rang, and Katho cursed again. Vaelin smiled as she bowed to Katho and the judges before turning and walking out of the court. On her way out, she glanced through the glass and saw Adranaya and Gadarien sitting very close together, while Jovadao looked on with mild disapproval. She wasn't sure what to call the feeling that went through her, but she didn't like it. It wasn't quite jealousy --- she had let go of the idea of having Gadarien to herself several months ago, when it became clear that he and Adranaya were becoming an item. No, it was more like the feeling she had experienced back in Aabsaan, when the other kids would exclude her from their games. It was a feeling of being... left out.
Vaelin realized a moment later that Gadarien and Adranaya were about to face each other on the chalaval court. Aside from Vaelin, they were the only ones left. Vaelin took her seat behind the glass and received the congratulations from her classmates. But her eyes were on the court.
The gong rang. Gadarien and Adranaya both stepped forward and began an attack at the same time, neither one caught off the back foot, neither one giving ground. Gadarien's movements were powerful and athletic, Adranaya's graceful and flowing. The darts zoomed around the chamber, coming nerve-wrackingly close to striking before one or the other of the players danced away.
Finally, they were down to one dart each. Adranaya launched hers from across the chamber, going for a surprise straight shot. She followed behind it, whipping it forward through the air with her flectarus. The dart sped toward Gadarien with shocking speed, and, almost too quickly to register, he deftly stepped aside at the last moment, sweeping the dart up with his own flectarus. Spinning off of this move, he stepped forward into Adranaya's path and shot his dart a short distance, straight into her abdomen.
The gong rang, and the tirae cheered. Adranaya bowed gracefully to Gadarien, wincing slightly, a wry smile on her face. Gadarien bowed back, smiling, and waved to the audience.
Gadarien and Vaelin were left. Vaelin vacated her seat and joined Gadarien on the court.
"You ready to get tagged?" Gadarien said.
"Not likely, with you tripping over your big feet," Vaelin said, grinning. Adranaya was watching them through the glass, but couldn't hear what they were saying. Vaelin waved to her, and, after a moment, so did Gadarien. She gave them a saucy look, and laughed. 
The judge knocked on the window and motioned for them to separate. Vaelin went back to her corner and readied herself, weight on the balls of her feet, darts splayed out between her fingers. The gong rang, and they both moved forward cautiously, neither one wanting to overcommit and give the other an opening. They circled for a few moments.
Vaelin had an idea and took a fake step, as though she had stumbled. Gadarien fell for it, stepping to the side to attack. She waited for him to move, then turned her fake stumble into a flipping mid-air kick, launching the dart at him from off the tip of her foot. Gadarien almost dodged the move anyway. He was incredibly fast, but not quite quick enough. The dart caught him in the shoulder.
The watching crowd erupted in applause. Vaelin and Gadarien embraced one-handed, their flectari held out to their sides.
"Nice one," Gadarien said. 
"Are you mad? Don't be mad," she said.
"I'm only mad at myself. Seriously, that was nice. I'm going to have to remember that trick."

Adranaya winced a little as Vaelin slid an aculus into place along a meridian on her forehead. "Sorry," Vaelin murmured. 
Adranaya shook her head. "It's nothing. You're doing great."
Vaelin tried to smile and failed. Her hands were trembling a little bit, making it difficult to hold the aculae. Over her shoulder, Maestra Haidana and two other instructors watched impassively. Vaelin blinked against the bright lantern light and tried to focus.
She prepared the final aculus, dipping it into the small cup of her blood as she had done with the previous ones. The device sucked up her blood greedily, its fibers pulling the liquid into itself, and she sealed the tiny droplet in place.
"Okay," she said. "Last one. You ready?"
Adranaya nodded and smiled at her encouragingly. Vaelin found the part in Adranaya's hair, and laid her fingers along the meridian there, feeling the subtle pulses of energy coursing through it. She closed her eyes, visualizing the correct angle, then, breathing deeply, pushed the aculus into Adranaya's scalp. Adranaya breathed out through pursed lips as Vaelin stepped back and looked at her.
"Wow," Adranaya said. "That feels... weird."
Vaelin grinned. She felt good, powerful, like she had just eaten after a long fast. It was the end of their first year at the Madrium, and this was their final test: to create a brachiarus with their classmates, and demonstrate the precise control that made teluri such a fearsome power in battle.
It was now Adranaya's turn to pin two of their other classmates, passing the chain of control down like the branches of a tree. Vaelin had already pinned Gadarien, and he had pinned two more classmates below him in the brachiarus. He sat patiently meditating off to one side of the chamber. Vaelin joined him, sitting cross-legged on the floor. 
She breathed deeply, slowly entering a trance state. As she had placed the aculae in Adranaya and Gadarien, she hadn't really felt much of a change, but now that she stilled her mind, she could sense the power flowing between the three of them, like invisible threads joining her to each of their aculae. She could feel their bodies in space, feel each breath they took, each small movement as Adranaya prepared and placed her aculae. She knew she couldn't directly control them --- not without their consent --- but she could feel a kind of influence, as if she could pull on those threads and their limbs would move, like puppets. As her trance deepened, it felt as though the rest of the world receded, and she could feel more and more of that influence. Eventually, her mind was still enough that she could feel the secondary threads as well, connecting her to the two tirae below Gadarien. His subtle touch was an intermediary, as though he were holding onto the threads at their midpoint.
Adranaya finished with her tirae, and all seven of them sat in a circle, meditating. When the connections felt stable enough, Vaelin opened her eyes.
"Are you ready?" said Maestra Haidana.
Vaelin nodded, and all the tirae stood, still in their circle. Maestra Haidana handed each of them a few darts, and they all drew their flectari. They had each created a flectarus only a few weeks before, and most of the tools were rough in some spots, the ribs not quite perfectly aligned, or the mesh between the ribs not very fine. Vaelin's was as close to perfect as Maestra Haidana had ever seen, although she had only admitted as much in a deeply grudging tone of voice. For safety, none of their flectari had a killing edge. Not yet. Vaelin had already figured out how to make hers into a real weapon, even though they hadn't officially studied the technique.
Vaelin took a breath, then lifted her arm. All the tirae lifted their arms in perfect synchronicity. She opened her flectarus, and they opened theirs, at exactly the same time and pace. Vaelin could feel the control emanating out of her body and mind, feel the other tirae responding to her movements, to her thoughts. The power seeped into her own aculae from the room's meridian, connected directly to the powerful meridian beneath the Madrium. She stepped back into stance, and so did everyone else. 
As one, they tossed their darts into the air and began fanning them around in a circle between them. Vaelin concentrated, sensing the meridians of the air and the room's space, all else fading into the background. Her normal sense of vision receded, but she could still sense the room around her, as though she were feeling all of it at once with her fingertips. Her eyes, she knew, would be dilated so wide that they would look almost solid black, the usual amber color entirely obscured.
The darts spun through the air in a perfect ring, the flectari moving in waves like seaweed waving in a current. Vaelin pushed, and the darts moved faster and faster, slicing the air. They became a blur hovering in front of the tirae, a cylinder of flashing points suspended in the windless room.
Maestra Haidana stepped forward, holding a chunk of raw meat. It was fresh and bloody. Vaelin wondered briefly what kind of animal it came from, then decided she didn't really want to know.
"On your word," Haidana said. Vaelin nodded. She sped up the darts just a little more, pushing them to unnatural speed.
"Now," she said. Haidana tossed the meat into the ring of darts.
Instantly, the meat was shredded into a thousand pieces, spraying a fine mist of blood into the air. It flew into Vaelin's face, and she closed her eyes and averted her head. She hadn't been expecting the blowback, and the ring of flectari faltered in their motion. Most of the darts had already dropped to the ground after they had shredded the meat, and the rest now went careening off into the walls. Maestra Haidana had to duck to avoid one of them, and she glared at Vaelin.
"Sorry," Vaelin said.
Haidana looked annoyed, but nodded her head. "You need to work on maintaining control despite distractions. Now that you have lost control, it is a simple matter for a more skilled telurix to break your brachiarus entirely, regardless of aculae." She stepped back, directly into a spot marked on the floor as an apex of power from the silanus, and lifted her arms toward Vaelin.
Vaelin felt her control of the other tirae slipping away from her. She tried to hang onto it, but it was useless --- it was like trying to keep a boulder from rolling down a cliff. She felt her control ripped away from her, and the pain was almost physical.
Maestra Haidana lowered her arms, and all the tirae lowered their flectari. "Despite this failure," Haidana said, emphasizing the last word, "you have succeeded in the basic task. Congratulations, Vaelin. You are now a second year tira."

# Chapter 8 #

Gadarien and Vaelin were practicing sweeps, each taking turns kicking the legs out from the other and rolling smoothly to their feet, again and again. They had already finished their requirements for class, but decided they wanted to work some more, and had met up in a private sparring chamber, away from the rest of the tirae. The floor was covered with spongy mats that softened their falls, and their footsteps made a hissing, brushing sound. The only other sound was their breath, loud whooshes as they landed and exhaled, and the thudding of their bodies as they rolled.
After a while, they paused to catch their wind. "Let me see your hand," Vaelin said. She took his sweaty arm by the wrist and lifted it up, placing her own palm opposite his. Their palms were very warm. "Wow," she said, still breathing hard. "You have huge hands. You got some apes in your family?"
"Every one of us is an ape, even you. Just apes without the hair. But in Cantaria, we have a saying about men with big hands," Gadarien said, then trailed off into expectant silence. 
Vaelin simply stared at him. "Yes?"
He stared back. "Well, it means, uh... hmm."
Vaelin stared for another moment, then waggled her eyebrow at him.
Gadarien pulled his hand back, laughing. "I keep forgetting, you just look unsophisticated." 
"Unsophisticated. That's a big word for a Cantarian. I've never heard you say anything with that many syllables." She punched him in the shoulder, and he swept her arm to the side, dragging her toward him as he slid around her back and wrapped his arm around her neck. Suddenly his mouth was by her ear and she could feel his warm breath on her cheek.
She peeled his arm away, but gently, and slid back to face him. "Gada," she said, but before she could say anything more, he was leaning in and they were kissing, his hand holding her just below her ear, her hand resting on the plane of his chest.
She pulled away and stared at him. She knew perfectly well that she shouldn't do this. But oh, how she wanted it. Despite all the times she had been forced into sex, all the men she hadn't wanted --- this time, with Gadarien, her craving was almost painful. It was as though making love to him --- a man she wanted to be with, and a man forbidden to her --- might somehow erase her past. As though by joining with him, she would be made anew.
In the end, the temptation was too much for her. She leaned forward and kissed him again. And then their clothes were coming off. And then, he was hers, if only for a brief time.

It was several days before Vaelin could even bring herself to meet Adranaya's eyes. She had a sinking feeling in the pit of her stomach every time the three of them got together, which was frequently, since they were somewhat of a social clique unto themselves by this point. 
Gadarien betrayed no outward sign that anything had happened. Vaelin wasn't sure how she felt about that. In one sense, she was glad he was able to keep it to himself, for the sake of their mutual friendship. But on the other hand, his refusal to acknowledge it made her feel dirty and cheap. Which, of course, she knew she was. She was just a filthy medicine girl, and always would be. Why had she even thought she could be anything else?
"Vaelin," said Adranaya, a bit sharply. Vaelin jumped, then realized both Adranaya and Gadarien were staring at her.
"What?" said Vaelin.
"I said, what are you doing this twelveday? Do you want to go to the Kharsium and look at hats?"
"Oh. Right. Um, sure."
Adranaya looked at her askance. "Are you okay?"
Guilt flooded through Vaelin's veins. Adranaya had always been warm and accepting, and always generous with her considerable wealth. Vaelin couldn't count the number of times Adranaya had paid for her food and drink on a day out in Thelenza. How could Vaelin have done this to her? She bit her lip.
"I'm just... really tired. From the Vorsarium. It gets to me, sometimes," she said.
The look of sympathy in Adranaya's eyes almost made Vaelin start crying, right there in the courtyard.

More months passed. Vaelin and Gadarien didn't make love again, and, slowly, she began to put the incident behind her. The guilt faded but never completely went away.
Meanwhile, their skills were sharpening, their bodies growing leaner and harder as they endured the rigors of training. Very few tirae left the program at this point. Everyone who was still there was committed and strong-willed. One boy was expelled for attempting to cheat, and the public chastisement he received on his way out was enough to prevent anyone else from even thinking about doing the same. Another three tirae had to leave due to training injuries. 
Only one of those was Vaelin's fault.
It happened during basic flectarus combat training. Vaelin was paired up with her favorite person, Katho, who was proving annoyingly difficult to eliminate. She had tried all of her usual tricks, things she had picked up from older tirae who, although somewhat intimidated by how quickly she learned, were eager to show off their own knowledge. In some cases, she took what she had been taught and extended it, then came back a week later and demolished the person who had shown it to her, using their own technique.
But today, for some reason, none of that was working. Katho was, despite his odious personality, a talented telurix, a fact which Vaelin grudgingly admitted. There was no way, however, that she was going to lose to someone she disliked so intensely. 
She tried another trick, a sweeping, rolling leg attack, and he jumped out of the way easily. But as she was moving, she noticed something, a sort of spike in the onda where, apparently, the special shielding tile that surrounded the Madrium's training chambers had either cracked or eroded. It was just a thin seam of more powerful aestus, which she caught with her left leg as she rolled past. It felt a bit like moving through a waterfall, but in all directions --- a tingling line of pressure along her calf. Clearly, no one in authority had noticed this, or they would have patched it already.
Vaelin stepped back so that the seam bathed the back of her body. She filled herself with aestus, and it felt like rain soaking into dry ground. Her whole body felt new, energized, as though she had just woken up after a good night's sleep. Katho, she could tell, was tired --- as she had been just a moment before. She was careful to keep her face neutral as she waited for him to make a move.
Finally, he did. He faked left and then cut right, attempting to circle around to her flank and attack where she was vulnerable. She let him move a little, then, with a speed she herself found breathtaking, she leapt behind him, striking out at his spinal meridian with her flectarus as she did. She heard a soft popping sound, and then Katho was screaming. She turned around, confused. He was on the ground, his flectarus flung away. He was convulsing, clutching his chest, and bits of white foam were forming on his lips. His eyes rolled back in his head.
Jovadao, who was supervising the training, ran out onto the court. He glanced darkly at Vaelin, then knelt by Katho's side.
"What did you do?"
"Nothing," she lied. "I just hit him with a lateral backhand strike."
"That's not possible." Jovadao stood up. "I'll deal with you later," he said, and jogged off to get medical attention.
Vaelin looked around. Several other groups of tirae had stopped their training to gape at her, flectari lowered to brush the ground. She stared back, defiantly, until her gaze found Gadarien and Adranaya. Gadarien looked troubled, and Adranaya had one hand over her mouth, in shock. Suddenly Vaelin felt ashamed, and a flush crept up her cheeks.
"It was an accident," she said softly, almost inaudibly. But they all knew it wasn't true.

Their first live training came close to the end of their second year at the Madrium. Winter had come again to Thelenza. For the exercise, the tirae were to "assist" a detachment of the Teluric Guard as they swept a Cantarian shavaliae cell out of their hiding place and destroyed them.
There was excitement and nervousness in the air as the tirae lined up in the pre-dawn darkness of the Madrium's main courtyard, a large, grey space surrounded by tall stone columns with elaborate geometric tile in stripes around their circumference. The syrillium in the tile, tastefully applied in thin lines throughout, glowed softly, and a stream of aestus swirled through a central channel in the yard designed for that purpose.
The Teluric Guard, resplendent in their shining copper cloaks, marched into the courtyard and lined up in front of the tirae. Many of them had syrillium tattoos lining their own meridians, joining their aculae, and these, too, glowed faintly. They marched, stopped, and turned with uncanny precision. Even the sounds their boots made on the pavement were in total unison, as though it were a single large foot rather than many. Jovadao turned to address the tirae.
"This morning," he said, "will be your first live training exercise. We do not expect you to do any fighting --- you are here to watch. If you are attacked during the course of the exercise, you will not fight unless it is absolutely unavoidable. You will run. Your chance to be a hero will come some other day. You may think that you are trained well enough at this point to take on a shavali, but, believe me, you are not. In the years that I have been doing this, we have lost seventeen tirae to live training. Without exception, those tirae chose to attempt to fight the enemies we came across, rather than running, like their wiser counterparts. Do not become one of these. Stay with your assigned squad. If a member of the Guard tells you to do something, you do it, immediately. Follow these simple rules and you will survive the day."
Without any further ceremony, the Teluric Guard began marching out the gate into the street. The tirae followed, arranged in groups of four. The instructors had allowed the tirae to pick their own squads, so Vaelin's group consisted of herself, Gadarien, Adranaya, and Ladrana.
"Do you think we'll get attacked?" Ladrana said.
Gadarien scoffed. "We're not even going to see any shavaliae. They'll scatter and run back to their little rat holes as soon as there's a sign of trouble." 
The vehemence of his speech took Vaelin aback. "Not a fan of the shavaliae?"
Gadarien was silent for a moment, then said, "They're responsible for the destruction of my family, my country."
Vaelin waited for more, but he said nothing further. Every time the subject of the shavaliae and their holy war had come up in the past, Gadarien had been very guarded about his opinions. She wasn't sure what to make of this outburst.
They marched on in silence, following the swaying silver-cloaked backs of the Guard. The city was still asleep. The only sounds were the shuffle of feet and the soft clinking of weapons echoing off the stone walls of the steep, cobbled alleys. As usual, a low fog hung over the city, and tendrils of it mixed with the tendrils of aestus, the hushed grey and the glowing white swirling around each other in the gloom.
They came to a crossroad, lit by oil lamps that guttered and threw grotesque shadows against the stone walls. Across the street was a temple with a facade of golden stone, carved into arcane geometric symbols surrounded by swimming fish. Even after two years at the Madrium, Vaelin had trouble making sense of the angular lines and shapes. She knew they represented spiritual mathematics, but her schooling so far had really only covered the basics, and many of the symbols on the temple wall represented the deep mysteries. Which, to be fair, probably weren't all that mysterious to someone who had been raised on Ventaca from birth. Vaelin was still playing catch-up.
The procession continued down the main street, then wound its way through a number of smaller streets and alleys which grew progressively poorer and more run-down. When they reached their destination, the commanders split the group up into three prongs, each of which squeezed through a separate alley, joining back up in a squalid courtyard. Lines of washing hung from balconies above them, and piles of trash had blown into the corners. A disheveled family was huddled in one corner, the mother and three children asleep on a thin mat on the rutted dirt, while the father stared at the soldiers with a look of dull resignation.
The Guard fanned out to either side of a worn wooden door set into a crumbling wall. Jovadao softly gave an order and two soldiers came forward bearing a stout wooden log capped with stone, suspended from ropes. They positioned themselves in front of the door and looked back, waiting for Jovadao's order. Jovadao held up his three fingers, then two, then one ---
The ground beneath them exploded upward, then collapsed back down, creating a sinkhole into a tunnel below. The two forward soldiers fell into the hole and were hidden by the cloud of dust. Vaelin heard brief screams, cut off suddenly. She watched, eyes wide, heart pounding.
 A moment later, several figures came sprinting up the fallen rubble, bearing some kind of long knives or short swords that were canted steeply forward halfway down the blade. They were making a strange warbling sound, which seemed to get into Vaelin's head, making her feel a dizzy. The Cantarians charged into the waiting first rank of the Guard, swinging their blades, but the Guard had already recovered from the initial shock and were ready for them.
The first several guards dove backward, rolling, while those behind them stepped around to the side, so the Cantarians were suddenly encircled. Vaelin saw only a few quick flashes of white. She gasped and took an involuntary step backward, bumping into Gadarien, who put his hand on her shoulder. 
Two of the Guard were down, blood pooling up beneath them. The huddled family in the corner was now awake, and the woman and her children were screaming. There was a flash of white in that corner of the courtyard and the screaming stopped. Vaelin covered her mouth with her hands. She was shaking. She glanced around, and all the other tirae had similar looks of shock on their faces.
Once the first wave of Cantarians was slaughtered completely, the Guard formed up around the exposed tunnel entrance, waiting, flectari at the ready. Nothing happened for a few moments. Then Vaelin heard an odd, high-pitched keening sound, and the guardsmen closest to the opening stepped back in alarm. Jovadao barked an order, and the guardsmen resumed their positions, looking decidedly nervous. They began to inch forward.
A small undulation appeared in the wall behind the soldiers, slightly above head-level. The point expanded outward rapidly in a ring of cracked stone, until, all at once, the wall peeled open with a deafening crash. One of the Guard was crushed beneath the heavy stones.
There was more dust, and a lone figure climbed out over the rocks and stood, surveying the scene. He had a series of tattoos on his throat and face, similar to Jovadao's, but he was taller, thinner, and much darker-skinned, with a mane of curly white hair. He looked calm, even tired, as though the entire attack were a wearisome party he was obliged to attend. In his hand he had what looked like some kind of white rope, with a white spearhead at each end.
The Guard surged forward, and the Auratao met them, swinging his rope. It flashed in the lantern light, and Vaelin realized that it was made of woven syrillium, as were the spearheads. One of the guards tried to block the swinging spearhead, and it changed direction in mid air, flowing around the guard's flectarus like a living thing. It struck him in the throat, burying itself there, and Vaelin thought she saw it change shape inside the guard's neck before the Auratao ripped it out.
Vaelin's knees began shaking involuntarily. She wanted badly to run, back to the Madrium, away from this insanity, but she forced herself to stay.
The rope turned into a blur, whipping around the Auratao like a nest of vipers attacking in all directions at once. Several guardsmen unleashed aerial darts, but the Auratao deflected them easily, in one case sending the dart back into the face of the woman who had thrown it. A number of guardsmen died before, finally, Jovadao stepped forward, drawing his flectarus. The guards warily opened a space between the two Cantarians.
"Beion," said the Auratao. Jovadao merely grunted.
They circled, Jovadao weaving his flectarus through the motions of a battle form, the unknown Auratao swinging the two ends of his rope spear in a complex overlapping pattern. They came together and turned into a whirling, thrashing mass of motion, too fast for the eye to follow. Their veins were glowing underneath their skin, giving them both an unearthly beauty in the pearly gloom. 
The Auratao swung his rope spear with a high-pitched, ululating battle cry, and Jovadao swayed back, barely dodging out of the blade's reach. He countered with his own attack, and the Auratao managed to wrap one of Jovadao's arms with the rope. Jovadao used the momentum to bring his unarmed hand forward and swipe his fingers across the Auratao's eyes. Momentarily blinded, the Auratao threw a kick at Jovadao's head, but barely missed. Jovadao brought his flectarus up and sliced deeply into the other man's groin, then untangled himself and leapt back. The Auratao blinked once. Then he crumpled to the ground, bleeding out rapidly, the color leaving his face. His veins slowly lost their glow, and then he was just an old man, lying on the ground as the sky lightened above him. Vaelin felt sick.
"What did he say to Jovadao? What does 'Beion' mean?" Adranaya whispered.
His voice was grim. "It's a name. Jovadao's name."

It was very late, or very early. Vaelin walked wearily up the rough stone corridor, her shadow stretching and retracting with each brazier she passed. She had gotten used to the long hours at the Vorsarium, had even come to enjoy the solitude and quiet of the duty. But tonight, she was especially tired, and wanted nothing more than to get back to her chamber and catch a few hours of sleep before another grueling day of training.
Her route took her past the offices of several senior Madrium instructors. As always at this time of day, no one was around. She had a hollow feeling in her gut, almost like nervousness, but brought on by the hours of walking and working. Her head felt light, like her skull had been opened up and emptied out and then closed back up and filled with cold air.
Only a part of her mind recognized the fact that Maestra Haidana's door was ajar. The warped door would sometimes spring back open by itself when the lock failed to engage. Usually, Vaelin just closed it and continued on, but tonight, she stopped. And went inside.
Moonlight spread across the pristine surface of the Maestra's desk. The corners and the shelves were all in shadow, but her eyes didn't take long to adjust to the gloom. She stared at the desk, feeling her dislike for the Maestra swell. How often she had been in this office, being reprimanded for one thing or another. Many of those were for arbitrary offenses, or things that other tirae did with impunity. She remembered every instance with glassy clarity. 
Worse than that, though, was the grinding weariness that she had to carry with her every day. It was Maestra Haidana's fault that Vaelin was so tired, so inexorably tired. It wasn't fair. Why did the woman hate her so much? What had Vaelin ever done to her?
She felt herself begin to seethe, and had to breathe deeply to calm herself. There was nothing she could do. The Maestra had all the power; Vaelin had none. 
Vaelin pursed her lips and blew out her breath, crossing her arms. The anger began to evaporate, and weariness flooded back in to take its place, her head once again feeling light as air. As it had every time she was in this office, her gaze returned to the scroll case mounted on the wall. The Scroll of Maidara.
It had been so long since she had borrowed anything. Months, in fact. She had been so good. And the scroll seemed to call out to her. It was such a shame that an artifact like that was just sitting there, unread by anybody. Surely such items were meant to be read, to be treasured, not just to hang on a wall in the office of some harridan.
She took a step. Then another. And then she was reaching up and opening the case, leaving it mounted on the wall, and carefully extracting the ancient scroll, which felt soft, like the skin of an old man.
And then she was walking back to her cell, quickly and quietly, her heart pounding, the scroll tucked into the pocket of her her robe.
She got back to her cell filled with giddy energy, which shone through her weariness like sunlight through Thelenza's thin clouds. She would return the Scroll the next night, or the next time Maestra Haidana's door wasn't shut. It happened regularly enough. Besides, no one would notice it was missing --- it wasn't like people were reading it.
In the meantime, she got out her journal and started making a copy. She didn't understand all the words, but she knew the language well enough to transliterate them into her private code, without even really reading it. It took her until nearly dawn, at which point she stashed the scroll in the middle of her pile of scrap paper and fell into her bed, to scrape out a few hours of sleep before the morning bell.

Adranaya sat down under the tree where Vaelin and Gadarien were eating lunch, her graceful body folding like a weeping willow branch. It was the next day, and Vaelin was somehow managing to stay upright. In fact, she felt strangely awake, although she could feel the tiredness waiting inside her, like a flood looking for a chink in the dam. She had moths in her stomach, but they felt pleasant. The whole world seemed to have a pleasant glow about it.
"Ladies," Adranaya said, raising her hands to the heavens. "I just took the most amazing shit."
Vaelin spat out her drink, laughing. "What the hell, Adra?"
"Why? Why would you tell us this?" Gadarien said, shaking her head.
"I had this feeling of accomplishment. I had to tell someone. Anyway, have you heard the news?" Adranaya said, eyes alight. Gadarien continued eating. She always seemed to be hungry, even if she had just eaten. Vaelin found it endearing. And kind of disgusting.
"What news?" Vaelin said.
"Someone broke into Maestra Haidana's office and stole something. Some ancient scroll."
Vaelin's whole body turned cold, all at once, as the blood rushed out of her extremities.
"The Scroll of Maidara. She has it hanging on the wall. Or had, I guess. I've seen it in there," Gadarien said.
"Oh, the silver and syrillium case? I always wondered what that was."
"Yeah, it's an old Kulnaran scroll, from before the Sleep. It has some kind of forbidden technique in it or something," he said, returning to his food.
"Hey, Vae, are you all right?"
Vaelin was not all right. Her heart was pounding so strongly that she thought her  arteries were about to burst from the pressure. She was about to either throw up, pass out, or both, one after the other.
"I'm not feeling very good. I think I need to go lay down," Vaelin said. She got to her feet unsteadily.
"Overdid it on the squash again?" Gadarien said, smirking.
"Yeah," Vaelin replied. "I'll be back later." She put on a weak smile, then walked away, willing herself not to run. When she got out of sight of the courtyard, though, she did run, all the way back to her chamber.
She dove into the pile of papers in the corner, hunting frantically for the scroll.
It wasn't there.
She looked again, and a third time, but it was just gone. She looked under her bedding, and everywhere else she could think of, just in case. The only explanation was that the Maestra had known it was her, and had come to her cell and found the scroll, and now was only a matter of time before they came for her. Or was it? Why hadn't they come for her already?
Panic welled up inside her, hot tears spilling onto her face. What was she going to do? Maybe, somehow, someone else had found the scroll. Maybe they would be merciful. Maybe she wouldn't be whipped and expelled. Or even executed. 
Right. Sure. Because the Nasura was known for their mercy.
Lacking any other ideas, she simply sank down on her pallet and cried, fear and guilt fighting for space in her mind.

# Chapter 9 #

Class had already started when they finally came for her.
The rest of the students were all diligently scribbling notes, the instructor in mid-lecture. Vaelin was sitting in the back with Adranaya and Gadarien, trying to remain calm. She already felt like a criminal awaiting her execution. She had spent the remainder of their meal break lying despondently in her room, waiting to be collected. When no guards had shown up, she wasn't sure what to do, so she just went to class. Gadarien and Adranaya looked concerned, but, unable to admit the truth, she had told them that she still felt sick.
 The instructor, a thin, bellicose woman named Itann, was lecturing on the historical legitimacy of The Madness. Had it really happened, or was it merely a metaphor? Some scholars contended that magic had always existed, spread so thinly that it was invisible. All living humans shared a single well of magic power, like a collective soul, which had been in evidence when humanity was young, then slowly disappeared as more and more people were born. After the Madness, and the death of most of the world's population, it had once again became concentrated enough to show up in certain individuals --- conduari, as they were known in the present. Other theorists believed that magic was actually a technology created by the ancients, who were thought to have somehow manipulated the threads at life's core. And so on. All of these theories were inherently interesting, but Itann somehow managed to make them intensely dull. 
Vaelin wasn't even looking at the front of the room; she was just sitting there staring at her hands. But she looked up when she heard Itann's usually strident voice falter and go silent. Heavily-armed Umbratari in their copper cloaks were filing into the room and flanking the entrance. The class all began talking at once, while the captain said something into Itann's ear. Itann turned and pointed to the back of the classroom, straight at Vaelin.
The captain bellowed for silence, and the chatter subsided. Everyone was staring at the back of the class. Several of the silvercloaks started tramping up the stairs on either side. Vaelin's stomach churned, and the blood drained from her face. She got ready to stand, and found that her legs were very weak. Gadarien and Adranaya were looking at each other, confused. The captain got to the top of the stairs.
"Adranaya Peliano. Please come with us."
Adranaya laughed. "Are you serious?"
"You have been charged with theft of an ancient artifact and plotting to commit treason against the Nasura. Do not resist," the man said.
"You're serious," Adranaya whispered. She looked helplessly at Gadarien and Vaelin, who was sitting with her mouth open. "What the hell is happening? What are they talking about?" Vaelin had been struck dumb. She tried to speak, but her throat was beyond parched. What was happening, indeed?
"You're coming with us," said the captain. Two of the guards reached out and grabbed Adranaya's arms above the elbow and hauled her to her feet. She stared at them, uncomprehending.
"Wait," Vaelin said, but then the class erupted in noise again as another figure walked into the room, dressed in a rich blue and purple robes chased with syrillium thread. In her left hand she held the Scroll of Maidara.
"Tira Peliano," Demeia said. "This scroll, which was stolen from the office of Maestra Haidana, was found in your cell. What do you have to say about this?"
Adranaya was dumfounded. Eventually she stammered, "It's not... I didn't... That's not mine!"
"Oh, we know it's not yours. It belongs to the Nasura, as do all such articles of power. The question is, what were you planning to do with it? Sell it to the shavaliae?" She was smiling, and her tone was light, as though they were discussing a game of chalaval. 
"It isn't mine," Adranaya whispered.
"Of course not." Demeia gestured to the guards and they began half-walking, half-dragging Adranaya down the steps. Gadarien stood up, and one of the other guards drew his sword and leveled it at Gadarien's chest. "Don't try it, boy." Gadarien glared at him.
"Adra!" he shouted. "You haven't done anything. Don't listen to them!"
Adranaya had begun crying, as had several of the other students in the class, some of whom had their hands held over their mouths.
Vaelin felt as wretched as she ever had in her life. She pushed down her bile and got up, and stood there, wobbling. She had to confess. She mastered herself and walked over to the guards, who whirled and pointed their weapons at her. She opened her mouth to speak.
She said nothing.

Gadarien pushed his way through the throng of tirae to the message tree, Vaelin in tow behind him. The notice was hanging at head-height, stark black letters on a clean sheet of parchment, tacked at top and bottom to the tree, obscuring other messages that had been posted there. It had to have been prepared in advance of the arrest; there was no other way it could have been posted so quickly.
The trial was scheduled for the following day, beginning at dawn. Classes were to be suspended for the day --- no one would have been able to focus on their studies in any case. The crowd was whispering and staring.
"Let's get out of here," Vaelin said.
Gadarien glared at the parchment, then glared at several people in the crowd, daring anyone to say something to him directly. Vaelin tugged his sleeve and he yanked it back, turning his glare on her.
"Hey, we're on the same side, remember?" she said.
"I'm allowed to be angry," he said through a clenched jaw.
He pushed his way back through the crowd, Vaelin following him once again, trying not to meet anyone's gaze. They got back to the housing block and Gadarien turned to her. "I need to be alone with this, or I'm going to hurt somebody. I'm going to the training room. I need to think." Without another word, he stalked off, presumably to take out his anger on a straw bag.
Vaelin went to her room. She tried lying down, but found that she couldn't sit still, so instead she paced back and forth in the small space, chewing on her fingernails. She could smell the acrid scent of her own fear radiating from her body. She knew what she had to do, but she couldn't make herself accept it. She sat down, then got up again, then sat down again, rocking back and forth. And then, at last, she stood and headed toward the office of Maestra Haidana.

Maestra Haidana was cutting flower stems when Vaelin arrived. A sheaf of flowers had been artfully arranged in an elegant cut glass vase, and Haidana was bent over the last few, carefully pruning off thorns and leaves. "Enter," she said.
Vaelin stood hesitantly in front of the desk, unsure of how to begin.
"What is it, Vaelin?" said Haidana, finally looking up from her flowers. Her voice was flat, her eyes as hard as stonewood.
"I... I want to confess something," Vaelin began. "Adranaya isn't guilty. She didn't steal the scroll. I did."
"I see." Maestra Haidana frowned and put down her shears. "And how exactly is it, then, that the scroll came into Adranaya's possession? It was found there by Captain Brallis himself, tucked away in a corner of her cell. Are you saying she was hiding it for you?"
"No. I don't know how it got there. I took it from your office, and ---"
"So, despite the sworn testimony from a Captain of the Teluric Guard, a man who has twice been decorated for bravery by the Umbrata himself, you're saying that it was you, and not she, who did this?"
Vaelin had never heard of this Captain Brallis, and had no idea why he would lie to protect Vaelin. Or was he lying? Had someone else taken the scroll from Vaelin's room and planted it in Adranaya's? Who? Why?
"No, Vaelin, I'm afraid I don't believe you. Your efforts to save your friend are noble. And lest you think we are fools, I will tell you the truth. We know you are not merely friends. We know about your little indiscretions with the Cantarian. You have been under our eye for some time. If coming here was some kind of ploy, it won't work. Adranaya is guilty, and she will pay for her crime. She has already confessed. But don't worry, there's still time for you to be dragged down with her by association, if you're so keen on punishment."
Vaelin stood dumbfounded. Adranaya had confessed? They must have forced it out of her. How could such a confession be taken seriously? 
"But I ---"
"Enough! Be silent!" Haidana shouted.
And Vaelin knew then that it wouldn't matter what else she said. Maestra Haidana was determined that Adranaya be proven guilty. But why?
"Was there anything else, Vaelin? If not, then get out of my office, and don't come to me with this again, or I'll see to it that you both burn."

The "trial" took place the next morning at the Grand Pagoda, which was between the Madrium and the Yewiyatum --- appropriately, since that was Adranaya's situation. Vaelin had spent the previous night numbly going about her chores at the Vorsarium before coming back to her chambers and lying in bed, still unable to sleep despite her exhaustion. She couldn't think of what to do. Her only choice was to hope that, perhaps, the trial would go well, and Adranaya's innocence would somehow be proven. Everything was happening so fast, and Vaelin's mind felt sluggish and foggy, unable to keep up with events. She supposed she could try to stand up and confess publicly at the trial, but she had no idea if that would work. If the Nasura was determined to blame Adranaya for the crime, nothing Vaelin could say would matter. Haidana was near the top of the Nasura hierarchy, so if she was doing something, it had to be with the Umbrata's blessing. Vaelin couldn't make sense of it.
When dawn arrived, she and Gadarien joined the large crowd of tirae that was streaming from the Madrium to the Grand Pagoda, and filed up the stairs onto the balcony reserved for Madrium tirae. He looked ragged and pale, his eyes lined with red. Together, they wormed their way forward to the edge of the balcony and stood pressed against the railing.
The trial began with the somber tones of the temple bell, a huge, spherical iron ball suspended from gargantuan ceiling rafters and carved with Ventacan religious and numerological motifs. The bell rang for at least a minute, during which the chattering of the crowd --- which included all of the instructors and tirae from the Madrium, plus a number of Nasura officials, Ventacan religious figures, and a scattering of regular citizens --- gradually quieted down. 
The chamber itself was a great dodecagon, rimmed with multiple levels of grandstands and supported by twelve dark wooden columns. One side was given over entirely to a stage, upon which were a number of ornate, geometrically-carved wooden chairs facing out toward the room. The space behind the stage was open to the sun and sky. Facing this, so that the light was blinding her, Adranaya stood upon a raised triangular pedestal made of iron. She was motionless in a flimsy grey shift, her head bowed, her wrists manacled together and attached to a ring set into the pedestal. She looked pale and ethereal, and her hair was greasy and unkempt. Gadarien's fists tightened around the rail when he saw her, his knuckles turning white.
"She's innocent. They have to let her go," Vaelin said. 
Gadarien shook his head. "You haven't been in Ivaelia very long."
The Umbrata, clothed in ornate syrillium-fringed robes of a brilliant orange, rose from his chair. As always, he looked unassuming enough, but his chair was larger and more elaborately carved than the rest. He paused for a moment, surveying the crowd. 
Vaelin stared at him. He really didn't look like anything special --- just an ordinary man, even a bit shorter than average. But when he commenced speaking, his voice was clear and sonorous, and it was obvious that he, and only he, was in control of the room. He had the self-assured insouciance of someone who had grown up wealthy and powerful, and simply expected everyone to bow to him. The fact that he was presiding over this affair made it clear that it was meant to be a show --- it had been elevated from the status of a mere theft into something more, a grand piece of theater. But the reason for that remained beyond Vaelin's grasp.
"We are here to pass judgement on this tira, Adranaya Peliano. She stands accused of high treason, theft of an ancient artifact, and plotting to attack the Nasura and its allies by means of terrorism. Daughter, what is your plea?"
Adranaya murmured something that only those on stage could hear. 
"Speak up!" barked the Umbrata.
"I admit my guilt. I beg you to show me mercy." Adranaya's voice was shaking, and it cracked on the word "mercy". A current of whispers passed through the crowd. The judges on the dais began conferring with each other in low voices, but the Umbrata was not participating --- he simply stared at Adranaya. His brother whispered something to him, and he chuckled. Vaelin could actually hear Gadarien's teeth grinding together.
"She must have struck some kind of deal with them," Gadarien said, his voice low and angry. "There's no reason she would confess, unless they're forcing her somehow."
The crowd grew still and hushed as the Umbrata rose once more from his seat. His voice had the somber tones of a sermon as he spoke.
"We have come to a judgement. Our daughter has sinned greatly, and her sins must be cleansed, lest the holy Onda be disrupted and all around us begin to crumble. We must protect our House, and, by so doing, protect all of you. We are merciful to our children, yet when one of them strays and leads others into danger, we must be harsh with them, to protect the rest. 
"The shavaliae believe that they must conquer us, and implement the laws of sadea, right here in Thelenza. They claim that this will bring about the end of the world, the Fineia, and fulfill their twisted prophecies. Their Song will be sung. They desire this, our destruction. More, they believe it is inevitable. We must not allow it! We must stand and defend our nation!" Vaelin was deeply confused. What did any of this have to do with Adranaya? "The scourge of shavalism must not be allowed a toehold in our land. And the most insidious attacks begin with treachery from within. And so we must deal with such crimes harshly. 
"Therefore, with the consent of the judges and the full power of the Nasura, I sentence you, Adranaya Peliano, to be gifted to the Healers."
The crowd gasped. Gadarien and Vaelin gaped at each other. On the stand, Adranaya dropped to her knees, her face a mask of surprise and horror. She had expected something else.
"No," said Gadarien. "No, no, no."
He stood up and started walking down the steps toward the stage. Vaelin stared for a moment before realizing what he was about to do, then dashed after him. She caught up with him and grabbed him by the arm, attempting to spin him around. He looked down at her hand, then up at her face as though he had never seen her before.
"Let go of me," he said.
"Gadarien, you can't. They'll kill you."
"I said let go of me." He shrugged her off, then shoved her when she tried to grab him again.
Vaelin wrapped her arms around him from behind and began trying to take him down, but he was too strong and too well-trained. He broke her grips, but then suddenly another person was there, holding him back. Together, Ladrana and Vaelin managed to drag Gadarien back, each of them holding one of his arms. He was apoplectic, his mouth almost foaming with rage. Vaelin was, for the first time, frightened of him.
The last they saw of Adranaya was her limp form being half-carried off the triangular pedestal by two silver-cloaked, heavily tattooed guards, her hair hanging down in front of her bone-white face.

Demeia was having an excellent day. For once, she had the time to relax into what she did best, which was Healing. The young tira who had been put into her care was proving to be an excellent test subject --- young enough that her body bounced back quickly from even the most strenuous of the Agonies and Ecstasies, but old enough to understand and appreciate what Demeia was doing to her. With her, she liked to think; it was much more difficult to Heal someone who didn't wholeheartedly believe in the process. Adranaya, being the scion of a devout Ventacan family, posed no such challenge.
She had begun with The Itch, as a sort of warm up, and had proceeded through a number of the more prosaic experiences --- The Burning, The Rending, things people usually thought of --- in order to get them out of the way. Then they could move on to the more esoteric Agonies, like The Restlessness or the Sickness, and the Ecstasies as well, perhaps blending some of them together. The girl Healed beautifully, enough so that, apart from her pleading, one wouldn't even been able to tell she had been worked on. Demeia prided herself on limiting the actual damage to the flesh, relying more on the aculae to amplify sensations. Pain was easy to achieve --- even a hack like Maestra Haidana could accomplish that. The trick was in creating novel combinations of sensations, to produce novel reactions. Of course, in order to Heal from any given injury, one had to endure the original pain a second time, which gave Demeia a second opportunity for study. 
The girl claimed, rather convincingly, to know nothing of a terrorist plot. By this point, most would have broken already, the exception being the truly hard-core shavaliae who had been trained to endure such an ordeal. Which was, of course, the point --- if she were a shavalia, it might take a full course of experiences before she broke. Not that it mattered. As Darano had explained it, the whole thing was an elaborate charade, a 'pretext for aggression', to use his exact words. The girl's family was a political stumbling block for Darano's schemes, being moderate when it came to war. Adranaya's supposed treason would be a strong blow to their credibility, and the credibility of their allies in the Assembly. Fortunately, none of the Peliano family actually resided in the capitol. In any case, Demeia didn't much care about the politics. It was the Healing itself that was important. Healing alone was capable of mining the depths of the soul in a way that nothing else could.
Demeia preferred the girl's steadfast denial of wrongdoing to a confession. The Healing wouldn't stop with a confession, of course, but a confession would force her to come up with a pretext --- to borrow Darano's phrase --- which was a waste of mental energy. Adranaya --- Adra, as her friends called her, and weren't they friends, by now? --- had begun the session this morning with a heartfelt profession of Ventacan faith. Demeia suspected that her faith wouldn't last the rest of the day.
There was a knock at the door. Demeia frowned. She had left strict instructions not to be disturbed. And she was forced to answer the door herself, since she had chosen to attend to this session alone.
"Wait here," she said to Adra, then laughed. The girl wasn't going anywhere. She didn't acknowledge the joke. Of course, she couldn't really move her head or speak at the moment, so Demeia supposed it was excusable.
She opened the door. Darano stood with his hands behind his back, flanked by two guards.
"Sister," said the Umbrata.
"Ah. Here to inspect my work?"
"Actually, I had something a little more participatory in mind."
Demeia bowed, a bit sardonically. Her brother's intrusions had originally been an annoyance, but by now they had become standard. Demeia had adapted her practice to them, and integrated them into the experience. A small price to pay. "Of course."
Darano waved the guards off and entered alone. Together, he and Demeia made the long walk across the chamber to the Circle where the girl was bound.
"It has been some time since we did this. Something new you've been wanting to try?"
"No, I think the same procedure as last time will do. Let's start out with pleasure, and slowly ratchet the pain up until the last moment, and then another big dose of pleasure and fear at the end. Wait, not just fear --- awe. I want her to remember me with the appropriate mix of emotions. Make sure she doesn't climax before I do, though. It was a bit close last time. And obviously, no conception."
Demeia nodded. It had not, in fact, been close last time; the timing had been exactly as she had designed it. But she held her tongue. Darano's subtle insults were just how he maintained his vast ego. As long as Demeia got what she wanted, they were easy enough to ignore. "I'll do my best."
She reached up and unlatched the Circle, then wheeled it down to a more horizontal position, noting with satisfaction that the bearings had been well oiled. She checked the tension on the ropes. Then she turned to the box of aculae and selected a few appropriate pieces. "Ready when you are."
Darano pulled open his robe, already hard. "Adranaya, you have been chosen to receive my grace. Hopefully you feel some gratitude for this opportunity. If not, well, I suppose I understand. But I'll be disappointed." The girl tried to say something, but attempting to talk with the ring in her mouth was futile. Her eyes were open as Demeia began placing the aculae. A shudder went through her body, then another as her abdomen began to spasm. By the time Darano entered her, her eyes were rolling back in her head as the involuntary rapture coursed through her.

Vaelin watched from the doorway of Gadarien's cell as he shoved articles of clothing into a small bag. He didn't bother with any of his personal artifacts, as if it all meant nothing to him. 
"What are you going to do?" she asked.
Gadarien didn't pause. "Rescue her."
"How?"
"I have some... friends. In the city. They'll help me. They have to."
"What? What friends? The minuaj dealers? What are you talking about?"
Gadarien stopped what he was doing and really looked at her, for the first time since Adranaya had been dragged away. "I am going to rescue Adra. I have to try, even if it means my death. You can either help me, or you can stay out of my way, but you can't stop me, so don't try."
"I wasn't trying to stop you. I just want to understand. How ---"
"I can't explain it to you right now. We have to get out of here." He turned to her, caught her hands in his. "Come with me. Help me."
Vaelin didn't know what to say. She wanted desperately to confess, but the words were stuck inside her. She felt sick and alone, and wanted nothing more that to have the weight of her secret taken away, to open herself to Gadarien. But he might not forgive her, and she simply couldn't face that, not yet.  
"I'm afraid," she said instead.
"I am, too. But I'm also angry. I can't just sit around and let this happen to someone I love. I wouldn't let it happen to you, either." He paused, and Vaelin just looked down at their linked hands. "In any case, I don't think we have much choice. They're going to come for us."
Vaelin didn't argue. She knew he was right, probably more right than he realized. The Healers would force Adranaya to talk, and sooner or later they would want to talk to Vaelin and Gadarien as well, especially if Adranaya retracted her confession.
"We have to go, and we have to do it now," Gadarien said, gently untangling their hands.
Vaelin looked down for a long moment, then straightened her shoulders and looked Gadarien in the eye. "I need to take a little detour. There are a some things I've got to take with me."
He grimaced, but nodded assent. "Okay. Let's make it quick."
They hurried to Vaelin's cell, managing to avoid talking to any of the other tirae they passed on the way there. Vaelin ducked into her cell and grabbed her satchel, stuffing her mother's amulet, her journal, and her own flectarus into it. She realized suddenly that she wouldn't have a chance to say goodbye to anyone else, or explain where she had gone. Tears gathered in her eyes, but she fought them off and turned her back on the chamber.
Gadarien led the way into the tunnels, heading for the "secret" exit that he had shared with Vaelin. On the way, though, Vaelin, stopped suddenly at the intersection of the tunnel leading to the Vorsarium.
"I have to grab one more thing," she said.
"What? We don't have time for this!" Gadarien said, exasperated. But Vaelin was already running along the passage. Gadarien ran after her. 
She turned into a small side tunnel, and then followed as it twisted and turned in the dark. She found Fihro and scooped him up, nest and all, and slid him into her satchel, being careful not to crush his soft body. In the dim glow that Fihro cast, Vaelin saw surprise on Gadarien's face, but then the glow was extinguished as she closed her bag.
They made their way back into the main tunnel and headed down several steep, narrow flights of stairs into the lower levels of the Madrium. The service tunnels were dark and damp, lit by oil lamps that guttered and painted the ceilings with streams of black smoke. The tunnels curved downward, following the slope of the hillside. They jogged past several mournful-looking Cantarian servants, who lowered their eyes.
Eventually, they rounded the last corner and reached the balcony door. Standing in front of it were twelve guards in copper cloaks and steel armor, armed with swords. Behind them, flectarus in hand, stood Maestro Jovadao.

"Maestro," said Gadarien, bowing gracefully. Jovadao bowed back, then opened his flectarus. There was barely room in the passage for two people to stand abreast. The first two guards grinned at each other as they stepped forward. Gadarien and Vaelin both had only their training flectari, which were blunted along the edges, but they each opened their weapons into a half-moon stance, Vaelin fumbling hers quickly out of her satchel.
The guards surged forward, and Gadarien leapt to meet them. They swung their swords at him and met empty space as he rolled underneath their swings and whipped his flectarus behind him, taking out the legs of the guard on the right. He jumped up and dropped his knee on the downed man's head. The other guard cursed and swung. Vaelin instinctively dropped into Lowered Cat, then attacked with an underhand Ohratta's Venom, cracking the soldier on her wrist and knocking her sword out of her hand. Vaelin transitioned into Crescent Moon, snapping her closed flectarus up into the woman's temple and knocking her out cold.
She stood there for a moment, shocked at what she had just done. In all her training, she had never struck in true anger before, never been truly attacked by someone who wanted to take her life. The moves had worked flawlessly, but no one had prepared her for what it would feel like to fight for her life. Terror lunged into her.
But the next two guards were already in motion. One of them stabbed at Gadarien, who executed a perfect Attia Spiral, warping his flectarus in mid-air and wrapping it around the man's arm, then pulling him forward and kneeing him hard in the solar plexus. A follow-up elbow to the back of the soldier's head took him out of the fight. Then the next guard was attacking, and Gadarien barely managed to block her first thrust. 
In the course of taking out the first three guards, Vaelin and Gadarien had moved into the middle of the pack, and were now back-to-back in the center of the cramped passage, forcing the guards to come at them one at a time. One of the guards, a little smarter than the others, baited Vaelin into an attempt to disarm him. He let her knock his sword out of his hand, but grabbed her blunt flectarus with his other hand and ripped it out of her grip. The move would have taken all his fingers off if her flectarus had been sharp, but it proved a shrewd strategy. Vaelin snatched up his fallen sword, but it was heavy and she was unfamiliar with it, and it showed immediately. He swung, and she blocked, the shock of the blow numbing her hand. He swung again and she blocked again, a little faster this time. But she could already feel herself tiring. She wouldn't be able to keep this up for long. The sheer effort of a real fight was very different from training, far more exhausting. She glanced behind her and saw Gadarien, who had also procured a sword, stab a guard in the eye socket and then fling him aside like a bag of flour. 
She had no time for shock. The guards pressed in. Two of them swung at once. Vaelin managed to spin out of the way of one of the strikes, but the second nicked her hand and she lost her sword with a cry. The guard closest to her raised his arm for the killing blow. And then, suddenly, there was a crackling flash of white and the top of his head flew off with a spray of blood. Jovadao stood behind him, veins glowing red in the gloom of the tunnel. Vaelin barely had a moment to gape in wonder before he was gone again, his flectarus a white blur, blood spraying onto the walls as he lay about him. 
Vaelin picked up a sword in her off hand and retrieved her flectarus with the other. Behind her, Gadarien was wreaking havoc, now wielding a sword in each hand. In the brief glimpses she managed to get, he seemed far more proficient with swords than Vaelin was, as though he had trained with them a great deal. In fact, his fighting was far too skillful --- he had never moved so fast or so confidently in training. He had taken out six armed guards. How was that possible?
Vaelin got her back up against the wall and stood fending off a single guard. It was all she could do to stop him --- she was too tired to attack. The guard was much bigger than she, and seemed to have endless stamina as he hacked and hacked at her. He reached back for a big swing, and then a blade shot out of his upper chest. The guard collapsed, and Gadarien was standing behind him, covered with sweat and blood. Next to him stood Jovadao. All of the guards were dead. Vaelin let her breath out in an explosive burst --- she was still alive.
"Come," said Jovadao. "We must hurry."

# Chapter 10 #

They made their way through the steep, twisting alleys at a brisk trot. Vaelin's lungs were burning, but Jovadao and Gadarien seemed not to feel it, conversing fluidly in Cantarian as they ran. Why was Jovadao helping them? And how did he and Gadarien really know each other? This was clearly not a teacher-student relationship, not anymore. Vaelin didn't even have the breath to ask any questions.
They entered a part of the city she had never been to, a battered slum of narrow alleys and crumbling stone. The air smelled of garbage. She could see by the sparse torchlight that the doors were all painted in bright colors, although many of them were cracked and peeling. The buildings in this area were old and ornate, sculpted with grotesque animal motifs and circular patterns. They reminded her of the tattoos on Jovadao's neck.
"Where are we going?" Vaelin finally managed once they stopped for a short rest.
"To a safehouse, in the old Cantarian quarter," said Jovadao. He turned to Gadarien. "Didn't you tell her anything?"
Gadarien shook his head. "There wasn't time."
Jovadao said something angrily in Cantarian, and Gadarien replied just as angrily. Then, abruptly, Jovadao stalked off into an alley. Gadarien watched him go, saying nothing. 
"Gada, what the hell is going on?"
Gadarien looked down at the ground, then up at the night sky, as if he could find answers in either place. "There are some things I haven't told you."
"Yeah, no shit."
He smiled wryly. "I have some secrets that I couldn't share with you before. It's nothing personal."
"What the fuck do you mean it's nothing personal? I'm in love with you, you shit."
Gadarien looked at her with surprise, and then sadness. "I know. The man you fell in love with, that's the real me. I just have some... other parts. Things I had to keep from you. To keep you safe."
"What things?"
He sighed. "I'm a Cantarian sleeper agent. A shavalia. I'm who they were looking for, Vae."
She laughed. "Right. Sure. And you just happened to end up sleeping with me once, and Adra two or three hundred times."
He grimaced, not making eye contact. "I was planning on telling you. Actually, I was planning on recruiting you. But the time wasn't right yet. You're an outsider, like me. That thing with your mother --- I thought you might have a reason to hate the Nasura. And Adra, she's going to be at the top of the Madrium someday." He paused. "Or she was. It was my mission to get close to people like her, and people like you. But I got a little too close, maybe."
Vaelin felt her world tipping away from her. He was serious. This was real. Her heart was still pounding from the shock of the combat and the long run, and now she felt as though she were receding, growing smaller and smaller, vanishing into her own skull. Everything looked slanted and out-of-proportion. She looked at Gadarien, and his head seemed to be the wrong size for his body.
"The whole time? You were keeping this from me the whole time?"
"Yes. But I'm still me, Vae. I really fell for you. I'm still ---"
Jovadao popped his head around the corner and whistled softly at them. "Come on," he said.
"Vae," said Gadarien.
"Don't. Just don't." She turned, wiping the tears from her cheeks, and followed Jovadao down the alley.

The safehouse was a cramped, shadowy suite of rooms in a derelict building off the alley. Outside the door, several feral cats were mewling loudly. They were mangy and their calls sounded distressed. A scraggly tree with red bark stood solemn watch outside the door.
Inside, the room was humid and filled with the sharp tang of sweat and rust. There were over a dozen men inside, lounging around on crates or piles of equipment, sharpening weapons or playing shells. Some of them looked thin to the point of starvation. Several wore thick beards, others were clean-shaven, and some had tattoos on their throats, but none of them were as elaborate as Jovadao's. A number of oil lamps provided a lot of smoke and a little bit of light.
One of the men looked at Vaelin and said something sharply to Jovadao in Cantarian. Jovadao replied in the same language, then turned to Vaelin.
"They want to know if they can trust you. Can they?"
"Trust me for what?"
The other Cantarian laughed. "Trust you not to betray us," he said in Ivaelian. He was short, with close-cropped curly black hair and angry eyes. His accent was much thicker than Gadarien's or Jovadao's.
She glanced at Gadarien. Her feelings were a chaotic jumble. She didn't know whether she could be trusted or not, honestly. But she couldn't very well tell that to these men. "You can trust me."
"Good. Because if you do betray us, we'll choke you with your own intestines."
Gadarien snorted. "If only your fangs were as long as your rattle, Ruelso." Ruelso just grinned.
But Vaelin looked at Gadarien in shock. His voice... had changed. It was deeper, more resonant. Older. She stared at him, noticing things that had always been there, but that she had rationalized before. The skin around his eyes, not quite smooth enough. And the knowledge in those eyes, which had always seemed older than his age. Well, she had an explanation for that, now.
"Your voice..." she said.
Gadarien looked at her and smiled, a bit sadly. "A trick."
"How old are you?" she said, her own voice coming out far more calmly than she felt.
He glanced at Jovadao, who nodded. "Twenty-five," he said.
She accepted this numbly, looking around at the assembled men. It was an entire community, and Gadarien was, apparently, a part of it. Gadarien, who was not her age at all. Not only had Vaelin never met these men, but she had never heard of them, except for Gadarien's vague references to his "friends" in the city. She had thought that they were just drug contacts, and that was why he had never introduced her. But obviously there was much, much more.
"So, you know all these men?" she said. "How long has this been going on? Have you been hiding this from me the whole time I've known you?" 
"Now is not the time, Vaelin," Gadarien said, looking down at the floor. 
"I mean, do I know you?" she said, trying to suppress a rising edge in her voice. She wanted to shriek, perhaps throw something against the wall, but she knew she had to stay calm.
"We don't have time for this," said Jovadao. "We have to discuss what we're going to do."
"What do you mean, what we're going to do?" said Gadarien. "We're going to rescue her. We have to rescue her!"
Jovadao began speaking in Cantarian, and soon several of the others joined in. They began talking over each other, and were soon shouting.
"What's going on? What are they saying?"
Gadarien looked angry. "They're arguing about whether it's worth risking their lives to try to save Adranaya's."
Jovadao shouted them down, then spoke in Ivaelic, presumably for Vaelin's benefit. "I don't think we have much of a choice. We think maybe she knows about Gadarien, who was not as careful as he should have been." He paused to glare at Gadarien. "We can't risk her telling them what she knows. It could jeopardize our entire mission here."
"So you told her about our mission? Or did you just tell her you were a shavalia?" said Ruelso.
Gadarien said nothing.
"I see. You didn't tell her about us at all, did you? Our mission isn't really in danger. You just want to rescue her because of your personal feelings. Well, I'm sorry, but your feelings aren't important. You forget what we ---"
"I forget nothing!" shouted Gadarien. "I've sacrificed as much as anyone. I've had to swallow their Ventacan bullshit for years now. I had to pretend to agree when they said my home was a plague-infested trash heap. My home, which they burned in front of me. I watched them butcher my kin, and then I got down on my knees and kissed their uptight Ventacan assholes. I know what we stand for."
"Boy, you don't know anything," Ruelso said.
"You know what? If you don't help me rescue Adranaya, I'll expose the mission myself."
This was met with a chorus of shouted curses. Ruelso drew a long, forward-curved knife from behind his back. "We'll kill you first."
Gadarien and Ruelso both stood at the same time, and started to surge forward, but then Jovadao stepped between them and shoved them both back. "Sit down. Sit down! This is insane." He said something else in Cantarian, and, gradually, all the men quieted down and sat. Gadarien and Ruelso glowered at each other.
An intense discussion followed, and Vaelin found her attention wandering. How could Gadarien have not told her about all this? Did he really love her at all? Or was she just that untrustworthy? She thought of the Scroll and cringed inwardly. She still hadn't told Gadarien about that. Maybe she was untrustworthy. Maybe she didn't deserve to be told the truth.
She realized suddenly that the conversation had died down and everyone was looking at her expectantly. "What?"
"I said, you're in, right?"
"In what?"
Gadarien looked exasperated. "In on the rescue!"
"Oh." No matter what Gadarien had or had not done, Adranaya's plight was Vaelin's fault. She had no choice. "Yes. Of course I'm in."  
"Good. Jovadao, Andrad, and Fuari are coming with us. That should be enough of us to break in."
"How are we going to do that? We don't even know where she is," Vaelin said.
"Actually," said Jovadao, with a strange look on his face, "I think I have a pretty good idea."
"Why do you say that?"
"Because I assisted in some of the Healings."

The safehouse was equipped with a store of dark clothing, although none of it was Vaelin's size. She managed to tuck enough of it in that she wouldn't trip over herself. For added stealth, they all darkened their faces with lampblack.
"Demeia will be conducting the Healing in her favorite work chamber," Jovadao said. "On the western side of the building."
"How will we get in?" said Vaelin.
Gadarien grinned. "Don't worry about that. Just be ready to fight once we do. We'll only have a few moments before the guards come."
They armed themselves with the long knives, which the Cantarians referred to as navalas. They also each carried one of the double-ended rope spears she had seen the Cantarian Auratao use, which was called a lancorda. Vaelin was fascinated by these weapons, but didn't have much of a chance to investigate them. As soon as they were armed, they were off and running.
She had thought they would head back the way they came, but instead they went around to the back side of the building and into a cellar. A stairway lead down into the tunnels below the city. These tunnels, unlike the ones under the Madrium, were dark and cramped. For the sake of secrecy, the shavalie were only carrying shut oil lamps, which cast only dim slivers of light. The weight of the city above Vaelin's head made her uneasy.  Layers and layers of rock, and buildings, and people, pressed down on the small tunnel. She could sense that if she thought about it too long or too deeply, she would start to panic, so she pushed the thoughts aside. She had plenty of other things to think about, in any case.
As they jogged along the tunnels, she fought off the thoughts that she knew would be a distraction --- worries about Gadarien, about her own role in Adranaya's fall. She couldn't think about those things now, or she would crumble under the pressure. Not anymore. She was more than the scared girl who had arrived at the Madrium's gates, knowing nothing. So what if she had been a fool, been deceived? No matter what had happened, no matter what mistakes she had made, she was now one of the elite --- or becoming one, at any rate. She wasn't worthless. Whatever they found at the Yewiatum, she had to handle it.
She couldn't avoid, however, the inherent strangeness in running through dark tunnels with a group of men who she had been taught were her mortal enemies. She had never quite swallowed the party line, but she had nonetheless absorbed some of the Nasura's sensibilities. These men were shavaliae --- a word, in the Nasura's opinion, synonymous with terrorism. They presumably wanted to destroy Ventacan society and replace it with their own dogma. What was she doing with them? And was Gadarien truly one of them? Did he believe in tearing down modern civilization and replacing it with the strict codes of Cantarian scripture? It seemed incompatible with everything she knew about him.
They rounded a corner. The tunnel opened up before them into a broader thoroughfare, and the glow of torchlight indicated the presence of guards. Jovadao stopped them with a hand gesture, then made some other hand gestures that Vaelin didn't understand. He and Andrad slipped off in the direction of the torchlight. Vaelin couldn't see what happened, but she watched as the torchlight was extinguished without a sound. Jovadao came jogging back around the corner, coiling up his lancorda, then gestured them all forward into the larger tunnel.
"Okay. Demia's favorite interrogation room is above us. She's usually only in there during the day --- she prefers daylight, so she can see the details of her 'work'. Let's spread out and find the resonances. Vaelin, stay here and keep watch."
Vaelin didn't know what a resonance was, so she simply nodded and turned to face back toward the darkness. The shavaliae fanned out behind her and began lightly tapping on the wall and ceiling with the butts of their knives and pressing their hands and ears to the tunnel surface.
This went on for some time, long enough that Vaelin began to get nervous. What if another set of guards came to relieve the ones Jovadao had dispatched? Would she be expected to deal with them? Or would the guards simply sound an alarm, ending their whole mission before it even got started?
In the end, it was a non-issue. The shavaliae finished whatever it was they were doing and called Vaelin back to join them. Gadarien tugged her sleeve and moved her off to one side of the rough circle the Cantarians had formed.
"Everyone ready? On my count," Jovadao said. He counted down from five. At the end of his count, he began singing a single low note. The other shavaliae joined in, one at a time. As soon as the second one began singing, Vaelin developed a headache that seemed to originate almost in her jaw. The third one joined in, and she began to feel a bit nauseous. Gadarien was the last to join in the singing, and as he did, all four shavaliae placed their hands on various points on the wall and ceiling. The rock began to vibrate, small pebbles and dust dropping off and bouncing along the tunnel. Vaelin fought off the urge to throw up. 
The tunnel shook visibly as the voices of the shavaliae grew louder. Jovadao raised one hand and the singing grew louder still. Vaelin covered her ears and crouched down. Jovadao rapped the butt of his knife sharply on the ceiling, then stepped back quickly. Cracks radiated out from the point where he struck. Cracks also began to appear where each of the others had their hands, growing outward in spirals. The spirals all seemed to connect and form smaller spirals, repeating themselves in smaller and smaller scale. Finally, all at once, a section of the tunnel collapsed inward with a loud rumble and a cloud of dust. It seemed to Vaelin that there was no way that someone wouldn't have heard the noise.
The singing stopped. Vaelin peered through the dust, coughing slightly. The rubble had fallen to form a sort of ramp leading up into the room above. Jovadao scrambled up the slope, and the rest followed.
The room within was mostly dark, but at the far end was a large metal ring, illuminated by several braziers arranged around it. The ring was attached at two points along its edge to a horizontal axle, so it could be rotated vertically. It had a number of eyelets around its inner surface --- twelve, not surprisingly --- and each of these held a thin rope. At the other end of the ropes was Adranaya.
She was naked, suspended from the ring by ropes tied tightly around various parts of her body, as though she were a drumhead ready to be struck. Even through the distance and gloom, Vaelin could see the glint of aculae in rows across her. 
"Come on," Gadarien cried. He sprinted across the room. The rest of them followed. Jovadao lagged behind a bit, waiting for the doors on the other side of the room to open, which they did almost immediately. Two guards stood gaping at the hole in the floor. Jovadao's blade found the throat of the first one before he even registered the presence of intruders. The second had time for a strangled shout before Jovadao's thrown knife penetrated his eye socket.
Gadarien was already sawing away at the ropes. The other two shavaliae joined in while Vaelin supported Adranaya's weight from behind. Adranaya's face was contorted in what looked like alternating waves of pleasure and horror. Her mouth was held open by an iron ring that fit behind her teeth; Vaelin gently reached into her mouth and removed it, but Adranaya didn't even seem to notice. Her eyes were half open, staring straight ahead, and she was making a low humming, moaning sound.
"Onda, Adra, what did they do to you?" Vaelin said softly.
Gadarien cut the last of the ropes and pulled out a soft cloak. He wrapped Adranaya in it and held her to his chest, crooning something softly in Cantarian. Vaelin felt soothed by the sound of it, as though it were cool water on a hot day.
Gadarien's song was interrupted by the sound of laughter from the opposite side of the room.
"I see you've decided to show your true colors, Jovadao. I always said you were a traitor, but Darano wouldn't listen to me," said Demeia, her tone conversational. She was accompanied by six of the Umbratari, all armed with flectari.
"I was never a traitor," said Jovadao. "Even when I pretended to love you. I was always true in my heart."
Pretended to love her? What was he talking about?
Demeia laughed again, although her laugh now had a bitter edge. "I'm sure I'll have the opportunity to examine your heart in great detail, after I tear it from your ribcage. Tell me, how did it feel to kill your own tribe? I've often wondered what that must have been like."
"Maybe you'll be lucky enough to watch me kill your brother," Jovadao snarled. He leapt forward, his lancorda whirling. His skin was already aglow as the teluri sprinted forward to meet him.
Two of the guards fell to Jovadao before they even had time to take up positions around him. Others soon stepped up to take their places, and the fighting began in earnest. Andrad and Fuari ran over and engaged some of the other guards who were attempting to encircle Jovadao. Vaelin guarded Gadarien's back with her flectarus as he picked his way over the rubble, carrying Adranaya in his arms.
The shavaliae fought a savage retreat, blades whirling through the air. Fuari fell to a combined attack by two of the guards, but managed to kill one in the process. Andrad was slain by Demeia herself, even as Jovadao sliced through another guard's abdomen, stepped around him, and stabbed him through the ear, all in one fluid motion. Jovadao didn't even look at the guard as he fell, reserving his glare for Demeia.
Demeia and Jovadao circled each other warily, Demia's flectarus weaving like a glowing fishtail, Jovadao's lancorda spinning from both his hands like twin fireflies. 
The last remaining guard rushed in behind Jovadao in an attempt to surprise him, and, without looking, Jovadao shot his lancorda out and back. The blade pierced the guard's chest, but, as he fell, he managed to jerk the rope downward, pulling Jovadao off balance and exposing him to Demia's whip-fast strike. The flectarus bit deeply into Jovadao's thigh and he cried out, stumbling. Demeia smiled, her long features looking twisted and grotesque in the light of the braziers. Jovadao shot his weapon toward Demia's face, but he was still off-balance, and Demeia gracefully side-stepped the strike. She caught the rope and yanked it forward, forcing Jovadao to let go of the lancorda. Demeia raised her flectarus for the killing blow, staring down at Jovadao with a expression that almost looked like sadness.
"Run," Jovadao gasped.
They ran.

The light of Vaelin's lantern flickered crazily across the dark tunnel walls. Gadarien had shifted Adranaya to his shoulders, and somehow was managing to run at almost full speed despite the extra weight. But Vaelin knew he wouldn't be able to keep it up for long. They had to find a place to hide.
Gadarien stopped for a moment, breathing hard. "The Kharsium," he gasped. "Two blocks away. Up this tunnel, then left, and there's a ladder."
They headed toward it, Vaelin leading, Gadarien doggedly following. Behind them, they could hear the clanking sounds of armed pursuit echoing through the tunnel.
Gadarien stopped at a rough wooden ladder and, together, he and Vaelin managed to pull Adranaya up into the alley above the tunnel exit. They closed the tunnel covering. 
"Adra, I need to fold your knees behind you," Gadarien said. Adranaya didn't respond, but she was known for her flexibility, and didn't object when Gadarien moved her legs so that her heels were behind her buttocks. He wrapped her up with the cloak in that position, and, without her legs sticking out, she looked like an anonymous bundle of goods. Gadarien picked her up once more.
They rounded the corner of the alley and entered the Kharsium. Even at night, this part of the city was alive with commerce. Merchants bustled back and forth, bearing bundles in their arms or on top of their heads, or leading donkeys heavily laden with goods. Torchlight shone from a hundred braziers, and the rich smell of spices and cooking food filled the air. The sounds of a dulcimer wavered in and out of hearing. A few people gave them curious glances as they slowed to a quick walk, but they were mostly ignored, even by the bored, underpaid guards who lounged around the outskirts of the square.
They were all the way across the first large courtyard before the Umbratari entered the opposite corner. Vaelin saw them first, and she grabbed Gadarien by the arm and pulled him down behind some barrels. The guards began accosting shoppers and merchants. Vaelin didn't wait to see if they were pointed out.
"Come on," she said, pulling Gadarien deeper into the maze of shops and vendors. It was darker underneath the awnings, and the dim light of braziers gave them a further level of anonymity. They forced themselves to maintain a moderate pace.
"Come inside, come, come!" said a voice. They turned to find a Cantarian wine merchant in a greasy smock, his thick black hair oiled back from a pockmarked forehead. He smiled unctuously at Vaelin. "You need drink, I can tell." He grabbed her by the elbow and tried to pull her into his shop.
"I have an idea," Vaelin said to Gadarien in a low voice. She let herself be led inside. 
The shop was a single room, with only one actual wall. The other walls were simple flaps of cloth draped over a wooden frame. The shop was attached like a barnacle to the outside of some more permanent building, which was made of crumbling, mossy stone. There were a number of large barrels stacked up against the stonework, some stoppered and some obviously empty. Shelves full of bottles and glasses lined an an adjacent cloth wall, and a wooden bar stood in front of these.
"What's in that bottle?" Vaelin said, pointing to one high up on the shelf.
The merchant turned to look, and as soon as he did, Vaelin launched herself at his back, wrapping one arm around his neck and feeding her hand through the crook of her other elbow. She kicked both his legs out and took him to the ground, pulling her shoulder blades together and flexing her arm. The man struggled for a few moments, then went limp. Vaelin held the choke for a while longer, putting the man thoroughly to sleep, then dragged him behind the bar, pulling his apron off of him as she did. 
"Over there," she said, indicating the barrels. Together, she and Gadarien pried open a barrel lid and slid Adranaya's limp form into it, then pulled it shut. 
She handed the apron to Gadarien, who took it without a word. "Be aggressive. Actually, be annoying. That should be easy enough for you," she said. Gadarien smirked. She reached up with the merchant's cloth and wiped some of the lampblack off his face, making him look merely dirty rather than stealthy. Then they pulled open another barrel and she clambered inside, pulling the lid tight behind her. She peered out through the bung hole.
A few minutes later, they heard guards questioning the shopkeeper next door, who answered in a pleading voice, not wanting trouble. The questioning stopped and one of the guards stepped into the wine shop.
Gadarien sidled up with an oily grin. "Come inside, come, come!" He grasped the guard's elbow and attempted to pull him into the shop.
"Get off!" said the guard, shoving Gadarien in the chest. "Filthy cantie. Have you seen some fugitives running through here? A young man and two girls, one of them probably being carried?"
"Yes?" said Gadarien, his accent thick. "You want a wine to carry? You want girls? Have red wine, have yellow wine. Have brown girls!" He turned and began reaching for some bottles.
The guard sneered in disgust, made a dismissive gesture, and left. Vaelin waited a few minutes before she crawled back out of the barrel.
They made their way back to the safe house through a thick fog, which turned the street torches into floating islands of light. Vaelin offered to help carry Adranaya, but Gadarien wouldn't hear of it. They walked as calmly as they could manage, Gadarien continuing his soothing melody.
Ruelso was not happy to see them when they arrived. "Where is Jovadao? And Fuari? Andrad?" Gadarien just shook his head.
"None of them?" Ruelso whispered.
"Fuari and Andrad are dead. Jovadao was captured," said Vaelin.
Ruelso sat down, disbelieving, his face pale. "Then we are doomed. We have to leave, right now."
"We have to get these aculae out of her," Gadarien said, looking down at Adranaya. They had set her down on a pallet against one wall and peeled away the dark cloak. Her eyes were open, staring at nothing. Removing the aculae would be difficult --- only the telurix who had put them in would be able to slide them out without damaging the surrounding tissue. Fortunately, these were only temporary aculae, designed to be moved and reused multiple times, so they weren't embedded as tightly as normal. Still, it would be traumatic.
"I'll do it," Vaelin said.
"We won't wait for you," said Ruelso. "We've lost enough already. I am only sparing your lives because I don't have time to kill you."
"We need supplies," said Gadarien.
Ruelso gave him a flat stare. "Help yourself," he said, pointing to the stores at the back of the room. 
Gadarien began packing up supplies for their own journey out of Thelenza, and Vaelin got started on the aculae. Getting into trance state was tremendously difficult; she stopped and restarted three separate times, growing increasingly exasperated at the noise and bustle going on around her. Finally, though, she managed to get a grip on herself and slip down into the calm space she needed.
She had to concentrate harder than she ever had to soften the cilia, but, because of the flimsiness of these particular aculae, she found she could finesse them out of Adranaya's skin without too much damage. Adranaya moaned a little with each one. Vaelin started to sweat with the effort, and after the tenth aculus came out, her hands had begun trembling. 
"Steady," Gadarien said. He crouched by Vaelin's side as she worked, laying one comforting hand on Adranaya's abdomen.
"I'm trying."
"How much longer do you need?"
"Another ten minutes and I should have them all out. I don't know if she'll be able to walk, though."
"I can walk," said Adranaya, startling them both. Her eyes were still closed and her voice was soft, but she sounded determined.
"Adra," breathed Gadarien. "I thought you were gone." His eyes were shining with tears. He began humming his comforting melody once again, and Adranaya grasped his hand in hers. She seemed to lapse back into sleep soon after.
Vaelin continued working. Finally, she removed the very last aculus in Adranaya's foot, and Adranaya's eyes opened. "Hey, Vae."
"Hey," Vaelin said, smiling, her own eyes tearing up.
"Where are we?"
"A safe house," Gadarien said. "Don't worry about that. We're getting out of here as soon as we can, anyway."
"Where are we going to go?" Vaelin said. Now that the immediate task was done, the familiar fear began to grow. The whole of the Teluric Guard would be searching for them. How were they even going to get out of Thelenza? And what were they going to do after that?
Gadarien looked down at his hands, then looked up at her. "I was thinking Tenoava."
"In Cantaria? Isn't that a really long way from here? How will we make it?"
"I don't know. We'll make it. We have no choice."
Against her will, Vaelin felt her body begin trembling, and her chin started to quiver. "Gadarien, what are we going to do?" she said. She heard her own voice come out and wished she didn't sound so much like a child.
Gadarien looked up, his expression fierce. "We're going to take the fight to the Umbrata. We're going to avenge Adranaya, and we're going to take the Nasura down."
The audacity of Gadarien's words sent a thrill through her. "What? How?"
"We're going to join the shavaliae. And use what we've learned at the Madrium against the Nasura."
And in a single moment, her fear gave way to something else --- something equally forceful, but fundamentally different. A feeling of strength, a feeling that she actually could do something. It was a big thought, almost too big for her mind to handle, but she grasped at it like a drowning woman, embracing it with her whole self. She had had enough of being afraid. It was time to act.
"Are you in?" said Gadarien, his look intense.
She took his outstretched hand. "Yes."

Among the materiel that was available at the safe house were a number of grey habits, complete with veils made of glass beads. These were the traditional costume of the Sisters of The Wind, the monastic Ventacan religious order that practiced chastity and quietude. It was a good disguise --- the glass beads would obscure their faces while allowing them plenty of visibility. Gadarien found three habits that fit, then, using one of the sharp Cantarian knives, quickly sheared all their hair short. A feeling of loss swept through Vaelin as he did so, but she kept it to herself. They had bigger problems to worry about than her hair.
Fortunately, Gadarien didn't have an appreciable beard to begin with, so they didn't have to worry about that. Gadarien found a pair of water skins, filled them, tied them together with a piece of string, and draped them over his neck to form ponderous breasts under his habit. 
"You look ridiculous," Vaelin said.
"From a distance, it should keep people from questioning us."
"You'd better hope it's from a distance. No one is going to buy that up close."
"You never know. I've been told I'm a very pretty man."
They set out immediately, blending in with the early morning traffic along the Vaiumbratal. The ever-present cloud layer was thin today, letting in a few shifting patches of pale blue. The three of them moved at a leisurely pace, for Adranaya's sake, and Vaelin found herself fighting the urge to hurry.
"Are you okay? How are you feeling?" she asked Adranaya.
"I feel fine. I was Healed. Repeatedly," Adranaya said in a hollow voice.
Vaelin didn't know what to say, so she just squeezed Adra's shoulder.
"No, no, don't do that," Gadarien said quietly. "The Sisters don't touch each other." Vaelin removed her hand, chastised. She would have to be more careful.
The city gates didn't seem to have any more guards than usual, nor did there appear to be any special search going on. Vaelin found this strange --- it was as if the authorities didn't care whether their fugitives escaped. There had been no further signs of pursuit since they left the bazaar. In retrospect, their escape had been strangely easy, like the guards just weren't trying that hard, which was worrying in its own way.
They passed through the gate that led toward Doriola, and into the broad tunnel that would take them beyond the Stormwall. This route would carry them through Ilos and on to Rilao, at which point they'd need to take another, cruder, path north to Tenoava. If they were going to get caught or ambushed, the tunnel would be an excellent place for it to happen. Vaelin's habit was soaked with sweat before they had even gone a hundred paces in, drawing some strange looks from passersby.
"You need to relax," Gadarien said quietly.
"How the hell am I supposed to do that?" Vaelin said, her teeth gritted.
"Well, think of it this way. There's only one thing you can do right now to help our situation, and that's to relax. That's it. There's nothing else you can do, so why spend energy worrying about it?" His voice was low and soothing, and Vaelin found herself becoming calmer as he spoke. She realized that he was actually working some kind of spell on her, but she was grateful all the same.
The journey through the tunnels took a day and a half. They stuck to the main thoroughfare for the entire first day, then branched off into a bewildering series of smaller tunnels, which Gadarien was somehow able to navigate. At several points, narrow tunnels branched off into torchlit rooms. Some were empty, and some were filled with Cantarians going about their daily business --- cooking, cleaning, washing clothes. Vaelin had no idea where they got the water. Perhaps there was an underground stream. The Sisters weren't common in these tunnels, and the three of them were looked at askance a number of times, but no one spoke to them.
Finally they came to a steep, narrow stair that led up and out into the open air. Vaelin breathed deep, savoring the fresh breeze. She turned and craned her neck to look all the way up the rumbling Stormwall, pulling aside her veil. The Stormwall didn't have a visible top, but gradually faded into the clouds above, its rotation appearing slow and stately from this distance. She thought about the Vorsari and shuddered, glad to be out of the tunnels and out of Thelenza.
A narrow path led from their tunnel exit to the larger Doriola road, which was crowded with people, ox carts, wagons, and pack animals. They walked for days, passing through small villages that reminded Vaelin a bit of Baranaath. The towns to the north of Thelenza didn't seem as prosperous as those she had visited with the caravan on the way in, and the population was different as well, increasingly Cantarian in makeup. There were sick and starving people laboring at various menial tasks, or just sitting disconsolately by the side of the road, hands outstretched. For the first time since leaving Baranaath, she saw a dead dog festering in the mud, surrounded by a cloud of blueflies. 
 The traffic gradually thinned out as each town absorbed its share of travelers. Eventually they were alone on the road, grassy pastures and woodlands stretching away to either side. The land was verdant and the road was a little muddy, but not unpleasant to walk, and Vaelin began to feel a little better. 
Gadarien had begun teaching her Cantarian at the start of the journey, and her lessons were progressing well. The musical aspect of the language had given her trouble at first, but she now had a basic grasp of how the different tones shaped the meanings of words and sentences. She was a bit dubious, though, about the usefulness of phrases such as "Please bring me my handbag" and "The white cat is in the road".
On the third day of travel, Vaelin remembered something that had been on her mind. "How did you and Jovadao communicate with each other while you were in the Madrium? The Nasura knew you were both Cantarian. They must have been watching you."
Gadarien smiled quickly, then looked down, as though contemplating the soil. "We have a way. A secret way. I'm not sure I should tell you."
Vaelin gave him a venomous look, and he laughed, putting his hands up in the air. "Okay, okay."
"No more secrets," she said.
"Fine. It's called dualeia. It's the art of speaking with music."
"Like singing?"
"No. Listen to me speak. If I say a sentence, it has a certain melody to it. Every word has a pitch." He hummed a snatch of melody, and she heard immediately that it was the same melody as the words he had just spoken, but without the words themselves. "You hear it?"
"Yeah, I do."
"In Cantaria, we have a whole language based on melody. It's not really used anymore, but in ancient days, it was our primary language. Now, though, only a few people remember it. By changing the melody behind the words, we can attach another meaning that's entirely separate from what the words are saying."
Vaelin thought about this. "So, you sing while you're talking? Doesn't that sound strange?"
"It's very subtle. Unless you're listening for it --- and have years of training --- you wouldn't notice. It's more in the differences between notes than the notes themselves. For example, while I was saying that last sentence, I also sang something very insulting about your eating habits."
"Hmm. Can you tell what I'm thinking from my melody?"
"No. Although there have always been rumors about people who could do that."
"Good. You don't want to know what I'm thinking about you right now. Asshole."
They laughed, and then both glanced guiltily at Adranaya, who, as usual now, didn't seem to be listening. It didn't feel right to laugh in her presence. It was like laughing at a funeral.
Vaelin changed the subject. "So, the shavaliae --- are they really as brutal as the Madrium said?"
"I wouldn't call them 'brutal'. At least not any more brutal than the Nasura." He paused. "They are --- we are --- ruthless, though. I'll admit that. We do what has to be done. But a lot of what they taught us at the Madrium was just wrong. About shavalia, but about Cantao in general, too."
"Such as?"
"Well, for one thing, not all shavaliae are in it for the same reasons. The Madrium made it sound like we're all religious zealots, like we all want to bring about the Fineia and we don't care who dies on the way there. But I'm not like that, and most of the shavaliae I know aren't. We just love our country, and we're tired of seeing it under the heel of the Nasura. We're tired of them sucking wealth out of our land like the leeches they are."
"I can understand that," Vaelin said carefully. "But what about the hostages? Do you really kill children?"
Gadarien was silent for a long moment. "There were a few incidents. Some people got out of control. But they were isolated."
"I still don't get it. What do the shavalie actually want?"
"It's not about what we want. It's about what happened to us. If someone came into your country and started killing people, what would you do? Sit on your hands? Wouldn't you defend your home?"
"Baranaath?" She laughed. "Good fucking riddance."
"Okay, sure. But let's say you actually liked your home. What if you had a family, and someone killed them? What then? Would you react, or would you just roll over?"
She wasn't sure how she felt about this. On one hand, she had lived with rage for so long that it was like a part of her body, some vital organ that she could feel pulsing inside her. She wouldn't know how to live without it. A part of that rage was reserved for the Nasura, who were ultimately responsible for the living conditions in Aabsaan, and, by extension, her own sad upbringing. But that rage didn't justify killing innocents, even if it was for the sake of social change. Did it?
"These sound like dangerous people, Gada." He said nothing. "Are you dangerous? Should I be scared of you?"
"The Nasura is dangerous, and they're coming after us. So yeah, you'd better hope I'm dangerous," he said. "But I would never hurt you."
"Even if it was for your country?"
He chuckled. "Why? Are you plotting against Cantaria or something?"
"Well, no. But when I was training to be a Telurix, I would eventually have ended up working for the Nasura. Would you have been my enemy then?"
"I wouldn't have let it get to that point. I was planning to recruit you."
"Oh, you think I would be recruited that easily? You think that you whistle, and I jump?"
Gadarien just grinned smugly.
Vaelin grinned back and punched him in the shoulder. But then, once again, she glanced at Adranaya, who was walking slightly apart from them, and her grin faded.
"Is she going to be all right?"
Gadarien glanced at her. "I don't know," he said softly. "People have come back from being Healed, but it takes time. Time we might not have."
Adranaya looked over at them, and Vaelin smiled at her. Adranaya smiled back, but it looked like just a reflex --- Vaelin could tell her heart wasn't in it. 
Unbidden, the thought entered Vaelin's head --- again --- that this was all her own fault. She had stolen the scroll. If it weren't for her, Adranaya wouldn't have suffered what she did. The guilt was a visceral sensation, a knife in the guts that never stopped twisting.
She turned back to Gadarien. "Why don't you teach us some Cantarian songs? We don't have anything else to do."
He raised his eyebrows in surprise. "All right." He began singing immediately, as though he had been waiting for an opportunity, and just needed someone to ask him for the favor.

Compared to Thelenza, Ilos was quite small, although it still dwarfed Aabsaan or any of the other Baranaathi towns Vaelin had been to. It had a reputation for being conservative, so they resolved to be as circumspect as they could manage in their behavior. Not that she felt very much like clowning around.
They found a cheap inn on the outskirts of town, the kind of place that tested your coins with a bite and didn't ask too many questions. Vaelin did all the talking, while Gadarien and Adranaya kept their veils up and pretended to have taken vows of silence. Vaelin ordered a single room for the three of them, away from noise and other guests, which made sense for three nuns.
They went downstairs for supper and sat down at a rough wooden table. The innkeeper brought them some bread and water. Vaelin badly wanted some ale, but of course she couldn't be seen ordering that.
A drunken man stumbled over to their table and sat down at the end of the bench.
"Onda, not again," said Vaelin. 
The drunk turned to Gadarien. "Hello, there, beautiful," he slurred. "What's a nice girl like you doing here?"
"Um... she's taken a vow of silence. She can't talk to you."
The man looked Gadarien up and down, an appreciative smile on his face. Vaelin could swear she saw Gadarien's face flush through his veil. She stifled an insane giggle, then grew annoyed.
"That's a shame," the man said. "What a waste of a beautiful lady." He got up and wandered off, looking for more available prey.
"You hear that, Gada? I guess you are the pretty one," Vaelin whispered.
"Well, I always thought so," he whispered. 
Adranaya just stared down at her food.

The back road heading north out of Ilos was immediately rougher, with long stretches of mud that sucked at their feet, forcing them to slow their pace considerably. The road was also nearly deserted; this was not a route that was often used, especially not since the war. In places, the vegetation had overtaken the road, and they had to climb over or through it. There was an ever-present fine mist, which gathered on the leaves and made their skin feel clammy under their habits.
As they neared the river basin, they were plagued with biting gnats that whined around their ears and eyes. Vaelin tried lowering her veil, but it only made the problem worse; the bugs somehow managed to get trapped underneath it, buzzing straight up her nose. She pushed the hood back and sighed, waving them away.
The mood of the entire group soured. The plants themselves seemed to go from being just alive to being oppressively alive, as though they were strangling the land they grew from. The path descended into shadow, between trees with thick vines, where lurid flowers bloomed.
Soon they could hear a hissing sound, which slowly, over the course of several hours, grew louder and louder until it was a roar.
"What is that? Is that the river?" said Vaelin.
"Yes, the Falpassoa. It's pretty big."
The extent of Gadarien's understatement was apparent a half hour later, when they got their first glimpse of the river valley. Steep, rocky slopes lead down from either side into a broad floodplain, choked with mud and tall river reeds. The river itself was a swift brown smear through the center of the valley, with mist rainbows hovering above it. Where the road intersected the river, a long, narrow, strangely twisted bridge leapt across the span, broad wooden support beams creating white foam where they cut into the water. 
Once they got a bit closer, she saw that the bridge was not made of wooden planks at all, but the roots of huge stonewood trees on either side. The roots had been trained to intertwine along the span, dropping tendrils down into the water. Over the course of hundreds of years, Gadarien explained, they had gradually thickened to form beams and struts. The Cantarians had been custodians of the bridge since it was built; most of their work now was just pruning away extra shoots so that it didn't become a dam. It was uneven and quite narrow in the middle, barely big enough for two people to stand abreast, making it unsuitable for anything but foot traffic.
They picked their way down the slope, slipping on patches of muddy scree where the path turned into steep switchbacks. There was no sign of other people, although the bridge appeared to be well-maintained. The clouds hung low in the sky, like a thick blanket holding in the heat. Above the roar of the river, there was a high-pitched hum of cicadas.
They were almost to the bridge when the attack came. The first of the ohratta reared up out of the mud in front of Vaelin like an arrow through the back of a shield, feathery mandibles reaching for her. It had more than twenty sets of banded legs that she could see, although at least half of the creature remained buried in the sticky mud. She instinctively leapt backward into a roll, kicking the creature in the head as she did so. It made a loud hissing sound and dropped to the ground, half-slithering, half-clambering out of its hole toward her. 	Gadarien shouted and threw his knife, impaling the ohratta's head, but another was already rearing up behind him, hissing. Vaelin yelled a warning an instant too late --- the creature was on Gadarien's back, bearing him to the ground. Then, suddenly, Adranaya was there, stabbing the beast over and over in its multi-segmented body. It died, thrashing in the mud.
Vaelin retrieved Gadarien's knife from the head of the ohratta that had attacked her. Its blood was clear and viscous, and clung to the knife blade like honey. Vaelin drew her own knife and wielded both weapons as two more of the creatures popped out of the mud and came at her. She dispatched one of them with a thrown knife to the eye. The other stopped to feast on the body of the first one, ripping into it with powerful forelegs and then sucking up pieces of the body. Vaelin felt sick just looking at it.
Four more of the creatures emerged from the mud, behind them and to both sides. Another came up just under Gadarien and bit him on the calf. He screamed in fury, kicking the creature in its feathery face with his free leg, but fell down in the process. Adranaya shoved her knife through the creature's head, and it thrashed and ripped the weapon out of her hand as it died.
"Gada!" Vaelin shouted. There were too many, and more were emerging as she watched. A dozen more were pouring out of the hillside, slithering down the slope like raindrops down a window. She was suddenly certain that they were all about to die, and die horribly.
Then, from somewhere, javelins began to thunk into the ohratta. The creatures hissed and squirmed as the stonewood sank into them, thrashing around like ropes in a gale. The javelins struck with uncanny accuracy, impaling many of the creatures through the head. Those that were struck but didn't die withdrew into their holes, which quickly vanished, the wet mud closing over them. The three humans looked around in confusion.
There were still dozens of ohratta squirming down the hill toward them. From both sides of the river, emerging like the ohratta themselves, Cantarian men stood up, holding quivers full of javelins and forearm-length, curved lengths of wood. A group of five fanned out across the top of a rocky hill above the ohratta and began singing. They were far enough away that the chord they created was a bit faint, but it still struck Vaelin like a punch in the gut, and gave her an immediate headache. The singing only lasted a few seconds before, as one, the Cantarians leapt into the air and brought their wooden sticks down hard on the ground in front of them. The hillside collapsed, sending a cascade of rocks and mud to crush the ohratta below, burying them or smashing them apart. Vaelin had to dodge out of the way herself as a small boulder bounced past her head.
The sound of cicadas filled the air again as the Cantarians finished off the last of the creatures with their javelins. They used their wooden clubs like extra forearms, whipping the javelins off the tip with great force. 
Finished with their slaughter, the Cantarians stood up straight, staring quietly, javelins nocked and resting lightly on their shoulders. Gadarien hopped over one-legged to stand next to Vaelin and Adranaya, his habit soaked with blood.
One of the Cantarians handed his weapons off to the man next to him and stalked forward. He was a lean man, with short, curly hair and thick veins standing out on his forehead above a long, curved nose. He looked angry.
"Who are you? What are you doing here?" he said in thickly-accented Ivaelic. "You're not fucking nuns, that's for sure."
Gadarien replied in Cantarian, too fast for Vaelin to follow. The man looked surprised for a moment, then regained his composure. He replied in the same language, and he and Gadarien had a short conversation. Then the man looked over Vaelin and Adranaya with his eyes narrowed.
"I'm Captain Siaba. According to your friend here, you're shavalia sympathizers. I'm not sure whether I believe him, but we'll soon find out. Come along." He turned and started walking across the bridge. Gadarien exchanged a look with Vaelin, shrugged, and began limping forward.

"The bite is painful, but not too severe," said Siaba. He was seated on a rough wooden bench in front of a table, holding a gourd in one hand and a knife in the other. Gadarien was up on the table, having his leg tended to. The leg was swollen and pink, but didn't look infected. "You might feel sick from the toxins for a day or so, but it must not have had a chance to inject you with its main poison. If it had, you'd be dead already." 
"Good," said Gadarien. "We need to move on toward Rilao, and then to Tenoava."
They were holed up inside a cleverly concealed jungle hideaway, the walls of which were crafted to be indistinguishable from the jungle around it. Vaelin hadn't even been able to see it until they were right in front of the doorway, which was, itself, only visible from a specific angle. It was a marvel of engineering, using only simple materials.
One of the shavaliae, a stocky, hairy man named Oarrabo, stood up. He had a dark look in his eyes. "Wait a minute," he said, holding up one hand. "Why are we helping these foreigners? How do we know they are who they say they are?" He turned to Gadarien. "You could be Ventacan spies, for all we know."
Gadarien looked at him, then said something carefully in Cantarian. The man blinked, looking confused. "Is that supposed to be some kind of passphrase?" he said in Ivaelic.
"Yes," Gadarien said, confounded. "You don't know that one?"
Oarrabo shook his head slowly. "No. But I know another way to find out who you are," he said. He drew his knife, a nasty smile on his face.
Gadarien cursed and hopped off the table.
"Whoa, hold on. There's got to be some other way we can convince you," Vaelin said hurriedly, stepping in front of Gadarien. "Don't you you know Jovadao? We're friends of his."
He heard Gadarien's indrawn breath behind her and knew she had made a mistake. The look on the faces of the Cantarians hardened even further.
"I don't know any Jovadao," Captain Siaba said. He took a sip of whatever was in his gourd before continuing. "Except for the traitor. The one who betrayed his homeland, who is responsible for the slaughter and torture of hundreds of his own people. You mean that Jovadao?"
Vaelin said nothing. She swallowed.
"I think we would all be a lot safer," said Oarrabo, "if we questioned them my way. The sharp way."
There was a long moment of tense silence. Then, suddenly, the silence was broken by a harsh laugh. Startled, Vaelin looked around for a second before realizing that it was coming from Adranaya.
"There is nothing you can do to break me. I've been Healed," she said. A mad giggle escaped her lips, and then she started laughing again.
Siaba and Oarrabo exchanged a look. "What is she talking about? Is this true? How? Why?" asked Siaba.
"She was accused of stealing a scroll from the Madrium," Gadarien explained. "The Yewiya took her and... Healed her. With the help of a shavalia cell in Thelenza, we rescued her, at the cost of several lives. Jovadao wasn't what he seemed --- he was a double agent all along. I was supposed to penetrate the Madrium and become a sleeper agent, with his help. That whole plan was blown, so now we're on our way to Tenoava to rendezvous with my handler and get a new assignment."
Adranaya had stopped laughing and now sat staring into space. Captain Siaba knelt in front of her and caught her gaze.
"If you were really Healed, you will know the answer to this question. What is the worst thing about it? The most terrible thing?"
Adranaya looked into his eyes, held his gaze for a long moment. She opened her mouth once, then closed it, then licked her dry lips. "The pleasure," she whispered, finally.
Siaba paled visibly. He shook his head as though to clear it of something, then slowly stood up, apparently coming to a decision. Oarrabo still looked suspicious, but Siaba nodded at Gadarien. "What do you need from me?"

# Chapter 11 #

Rilao was a city very much unlike Thelenza. Where Thelenza was grey and dreary, Rilao was bright and colorful. It had no Stormwall, but it did have a formidable wall of its own: two solid rows of stonewood trees, wrapping sinuously around the city's three major hills. Like the bridge, the trees had been gradually woven together over the course of centuries, until they formed an impenetrable living defense. Between the stonewood branches, the Cantarians had grown vines with long, wicked thorns and drooping red flowers, said to be deadly poisonous.  The only visible stonework was an archway and tower that sat above the city gates, decorated with iridescent tile. 
As they drew closer, the tiles resolved into circular animal-based motifs, very unlike the harsh geometries of Thelenza's stonework. In the distance, ziggurats sat on top of each hilltop, also tiled with the iridescent stone. The ziggurats looked like they were solid stonework, but Siaba said that almost everything they saw was actually made of wood. Lines of blueish smoke rose from hundreds of chimneys, and the buzzing sound of the city wafted toward them. Overall, the city gave the impression of having grown out of the forest, like some massive and complex organism.
The heat hung in the air along with a haze that made distant objects look purple and coated everything with a sheen of moisture. A few bright red and blue birds flitted by. Vaelin was sweating through her clothes, and Adranaya and Gadarien had both rolled up their sleeves as high as they would go. 
Vaelin had still not revealed that she had taken the scroll. The weight of that secret built within her, like stones piled on a kettle lid. With each passing moment, it seemed harder and harder to reveal what she had done, and yet the pressure to confess grew stronger. She kept casting guilty glances at Adranya, as though she would find some answer there.
They passed through the city gates, which were guarded by Ventacan soldiers. The Nasura's power was evident, visible in the faces and attitudes of the Cantarians passing through. Unlike Baranaath, Cantaria was controlled by Ventacan governors who had been brought in from Ivaelia, rather than by local elites. The governors brought troops with them, and the troops brought their rage and their lust. The downcast eyes of the Cantarian merchants and citizens as they shuffled beneath the gates was evidence enough of that. 
Siaba fabricated some transparent lie about what their business in the city was, and Vaelin thought she saw him slip a couple pieces of silver to one of the guards. Apparently, Ventacan moral codes were a little loose among the guards here, no matter how harsh they were toward the citizenry.
The party made their way through a colorful street market. Vendors were selling live songbirds, their plumage a riot of hues shifting against the bamboo cages. Baskets of fresh fruit and exotic flowers filled the air with a sweet scent. A few Ventacan guards circulated throughout the market, glaring down their noses at the Cantarians. Vaelin watched a merchant hand one of them a small, heavy-looking satchel. The guard looked inside the bag, then cuffed the terrified merchant on the back of his head. The merchant counted out more money and handed it to the guard. He and his companions ambled away, chuckling, while the merchant looked down at the ground, rubbing his head.
They continued past the market into a winding side street cluttered with vendors pushing carts. Two men passed by carrying an entire tree on their shoulders, roots and all. Children and animals careened around them, often getting underfoot.
"Be careful of those children. Some of them are cutpurses," Siaba said. Vaelin clutched her satchel closer to her body and eyed the children suspiciously.
They ducked into a quiet courtyard, then ascended some rickety wooden stairs to an apartment on the third floor of an old building. The apartment appeared to be living quarters for a number of Cantarian candle peddlers, but they moved a rug aside to reveal a trap door, which opened onto a narrow staircase.
"After you," Siaba said.
Vaelin couldn't see what was at the bottom of the stairs, but she could smell it: blood. She looked at Gadarien. He calmly started descending the stairs, and, after a moment, Vaelin and Adranaya followed.
At the bottom of the stairway was a long, low chamber, which must have been squeezed into the building between the other apartments, so that it could remain hidden. The room was partially filled with cots, and on those cots were a number of men wrapped in bloody bandages. Several of them appeared to be near death; one was moaning a single word over and over.
"What's he saying?" Vaelin asked.
"He's calling for his mother," Gadarien said.
"You're wondering why I brought you here," Siaba said, descending the last few steps. "I wanted you to see this. To see what we have been going through, while you've been enjoying a luxurious life in Thelenza. To see how dangerous it is to oppose the Umbrata."
Gadarien bristled, but Vaelin cut in quickly before he could say anything rash. "I think we have a pretty good idea of that already," Vaelin said, glancing at Adranaya.
"These men have sacrificed everything trying to get information, or to sabotage the Nasura here in Rilao. They've devoted their lives to the shavalia cause." His voice changed, becoming strangely flat. "And, of course, to Habsa Gavasie."
"Gavasie?" Gadarien said. He looked surprised. "What do you mean? What happened to Rijandoa?"
Siaba exchanged a look with his men. "You've been away for a long time, my friend. Rijandoa is out, has been for over a year. There were purges. Habsa Gavasie is the High Listener now."
Gadarien scratched his chin. "Hmm. That might put a wrinkle in things for us."
"Why's that?" said Vaelin.
"Rijandoa was the master planner for my mission, and also the one who placed Jovadao. Gavasie and I trained together a few years ago. He was just another operative then. He and I didn't quite see things the same way."
"How so?"
"He's one of the newer breed. He's very extreme in his views. Rijandoa was a nationalist, like me."
Siaba smiled uncertainly, looking around at the other men. He paused, as though not sure what to say. Then he appeared to make up his mind, and looked Gadarien in the eye. "I'm glad to hear you say that. Some of us don't quite believe in Gavasie's reforms."
"I knew that already," said Gadarien.
Siaba looked concerned. "How?"
"You're not an asshole," said Gadarien. The shavaliae laughed, and some of the tension in the room seemed to dissipate.
"Well, if you're heading to Tenoava, you had better be careful. It's not the same as when you left. The Harmonists have taken over --- the true believers. They think the Madness is returning, and that the Stain will cover all of Telua. And, even worse, they actually want to make it happen. Soon, if they can. They may not be too thrilled to see someone who was involved with Rijandoa --- a man they executed because he wasn't devout enough. Especially if the mission collapsed and compromised our assets. Are you sure you want to go there?"
Gadarien thought about this, rubbing his jaw and pacing. "Well, I don't agree with their views, to put it mildly. It will be risky. But if it means an end to the Nasura's rule and a return of Cantarian sovereignty, then yes, I think I have to. I can't speak for the others, though," he said, looking at Vaelin and Adranaya.
"You know I'm in," said Vaelin. Adranaya simply nodded, her eyes like onyx.
"Good," said Siaba. "I have business in Tenoava in any case. I will guide you there. We can leave tomorrow."

The journey from Rilao to Tenoava took over a week. The forest grew more and more dense as they hacked their way along a seldom-used trail. Jungle gave way gradually to murky swampland, where tendrils of raw aestus swirled through dense foliage, lighting the leaves faintly from below. Beards of glowing blue moss hung from the trees, trailing all the way down from the canopy. In several places, the path was made up of wooden planks set on top of stone pilings; the ground was too watery to navigate otherwise.
There were also ruins half-submerged in the swamp. Most were just overgrown stone buildings, which Vaelin would have mistaken for small hills if Siaba hadn't told her what they were. In one spot, though, they came upon the remains of a massive, curving wall covered in moss. At the base of the structure, where part of it stuck up out of the mud, were huge support columns made of the same perfectly smooth material. The stone, or whatever it was made of, bore no decoration apart from a few sparse, straight-lined icons embossed in its side. Far away, through the trees, Vaelin could just make out another of the giant structures, curving the opposite way, and what looked like some kind of stairs embedded in its face. Siaba had no explanation for the structure, although it was clearly some kind of amphitheater. It had just always been there.
On the final day of their journey, the canopy above them suddenly ended and the swamp became a long field of black, broken tree stumps and felled logs. The sun reflected harshly off the exposed water. The mud here was even deeper, sucking at their feet, and if it weren't for the causeway, it would have been totally impassable. The thick birdsong that had accompanied them the whole way from Rilao was notably absent. The whole area gave off a stench of rot.
"This is what happened the last time the Nasura tried to take Tenoava," Siaba said.
Vaelin knew a little about the war; they had studied it at the Madrium. Of course, that version of history had borne a distinct pro-Nasura slant. Although she knew that many of the battles had been fought in Cantaria, she had never seen mention of this kind of devastation. She wondered what could have happened that would have destroyed all life here for so long --- even areas that had been burned to the ground would eventually grow back, but here, the ground itself had been defiled beyond redemption.
They continued across the blasted landscape for several hours, the sun glaring down on them, before reaching the outskirts of Tenoava. Unlike Rilao and Thelenza, Tenoava lacked a defensive wall. The swamp itself provided adequate defense, aside from which it would have been difficult to erect a wall on the swampy ground. Instead, Tenoava's squat tenements rose behind a simple wooden picket which defended the narrow strip of earth surrounding the causeway. There were no guards at the gate, a fact which Vaelin commented upon.
"We were being watched the whole way in. If we had looked threatening enough, there would have been a response, believe me," said Siaba.
They walked through the streets of the city, which sprawled outward for miles in several directions, like a pile of bricks thrown by an angry child. Many buildings were low and mean, made of rough timbers. They looked as though they had been constructed recently and in a hurry. Others were dilapidated, with plaster peeling off of old, sand-colored brickwork. A number of lots along the street were empty, choked with weeds and burnt chunks of timber. Feral cats stalked through the grass, watching them warily as they passed.
After Thelenza and Rilao, Tenoava seemed underpopulated, and the people who were there looked hostile. The women all wore checkered scarves, of various hues, around the lower halves of their faces and necks, despite the heat. The men wore thick beards, but were nearly clean-shaven around the mouth and nose. Many of the men appeared to have throat tattoos as well, like some of the shavaliae she had met, but the tattoos were largely covered by the beards, which, in Vaelin's view, seemed to defeat the purpose.
"Where are we going?" she whispered to Gadarien.
"I'm not sure, but I'm guessing the Sagradhao. It's one of our high temples, and it's where Habsa Gavasie will have his seat."
"What are they going to do with us when we get there?"
"Well, whatever happens, let me do the talking. You don't know these people like I do. They're very touchy about certain things. Especially from a woman."
"What's that got to do with anything?" Vaelin said, indignant.
"For me, nothing. For the orthodox, women are only supposed to raise their voices in prayersong. Women have purer voices than men, so it's an act of impurity to sully them with mundane things," Gadarien said. Vaelin detected a note of sarcasm. "That's why they wear the scarves around their mouths and necks, to protect their delicate voices. Although, of course, that means they also don't get to talk."
"That's ridiculous," said Vaelin.
"And this is exactly why you shouldn't do the talking. You'll speak your mind, and they won't like that."
Vaelin crossed her arms and scowled. His advice made sense, but she didn't have to like it.
The Sagradhao turned out to be one of the few large, multi-story structures in the city. It was white and circular, with multiple sweeping tiers leading up to a pointed dome. A tall spire, with white prongs branching off in multiple directions, sat atop the dome. It looked a bit like a grim representation of a tree. The stone walls were inlaid with the same iridescent tile that had been so prevalent in Rilao. It would have looked more impressive if it had been clean, but the whole building was covered with grey water stains and looked like it needed a good scrubbing. Something about the sight made Vaelin very uncomfortable. She wanted to run up the steps and start scrubbing the building clean herself.
This building, unlike the city gates, was bristling with armed men, all of whom sported the neck beards Vaelin had noticed earlier. Siaba uttered some passphrase and the scowling guards let them through, but first they issued checkered scarves to Vaelin and Adranaya. Gadarien's lack of beard was, apparently, acceptable protocol.
"Do I really have to wear this?" Vaelin said under her breath, fastening the scarf behind her head. After expending so much energy learning how to express herself at the Madrium, silencing herself didn't sit well with her at all. Adranaya seemed indifferent to the whole thing. Gadarien just put two fingers to his lips, saying nothing.
They passed through several chambers, moving along the rim of the building rather than heading straight toward the center. The rooms were modest compared to the opulence of the Nasurium, but still richly appointed, with ornate stone and woodwork carvings in animal motifs, similar to sparse stonework in Rilao. The floors were decorated with evenly-spaced circular carpets. There wasn't much syrillium to be seen, especially compared to the Madrium, but there was gold and silver leaf alongside the brightly-colored paint.
"Whatever happens," Gadarien whispered to Vaelin, "don't lie to Gavasie. He's an Auratao, like Jovadao. He can't tell what you're thinking, but he can tell whether you're being dishonest."
At last, they rounded a corner and faced a pair of ornate wooden doors, painted in silver leaf and inlaid with shining hardwood. They were told to wait for a few minutes, then the doors slid open.
"The Ouvintero will hear you now," said the guard.
The room, like the building, was circular. The walls reached all the way to the top of the structure, where the huge dome squatted, painted in silver leaf and surrounded by high windows in stained glass. All around the walls, marble-railed balconies looked down on the interior, but all of them, like the room itself, were empty. A figure stood alone at the exact center, multiple shadows stretching away from him across the empty pews.
"So," the man said, "You were friends of Jovadao." He turned to face them. "Is that reason to trust you, or reason to distrust you, do you think?" He had a kind, scholarly voice, and an appearance to match: thick black beard down to the middle of his chest, long white garments, and a white skullcap perched on his head. Behind his beard, tattoos stretched up to the area behind his ears. He looked quite young; Vaelin had been expecting someone older. Even though he spoke softly, his voice carried all the way from the center of the chamber. He spoke in Ivaelic, presumably for the benefit of Vaelin and Adranaya and, surprisingly, he had almost no accent.
"I wouldn't say we were friends," Gadarien replied. "Our missions overlapped, that's all."
"So you were both deployed under my predecessor. In that case, might I assume that you share his beliefs?"
"That depends. Which beliefs are we talking about?"
"Well, it's really more a lack of belief that I'm concerned with. You are a nationalist, are you not? One who does not share our ideas about what this world is destined to become?"
"I am Cantarian. I believe in the songlines, and the Singers who made them."
"That's nice, but it's not what I asked. Do you believe that the Chord of Heaven will be sung in our lifetime? And are you committed to bringing that about? You see," said the Ouvintero with a kindly smile, "I am trying to decide whether to have you executed or not."
Vaelin mouth dropped open beneath her scarf. Executed? That wasn't an outcome she had even considered.
"If you execute us," Gadarien said, "you won't be able to use us to fight the Nasura. We've just spent the last two years training at the Madrium --- we know some of their secrets, and we have some of their skills."
"Oh, so you have a plan? I would love to hear it."
Gadarien and Vaelin looked at each other. "Well," said Gadarien, "not a plan, exactly."
Gavasie looked disappointed. "Then what are you doing here? Why are these two girls here with you?"
"We came to volunteer," said Vaelin. "We can fight."
"I understand one of you has been Healed," he said, looking at Adranaya. "I am truly sorry for that. But please understand, in Cantaria, our women do not fight." He sighed. "It is not my preference to have unbelievers under my roof. But you seem sincere. I cannot put you in a position of trust, but I will allow you to stay, for now.
"You two girls, however, will have to be reeducated."

Their "reeducation" turned out to be somewhat similar to being back at the Madrium, with the major exception that all of the other students were children. Some of the children spoke a bit of Ivaelic, but the teacher was fluent. Apparently, the Ouvintero thought Vaelin and Adranaya were ignorant enough in Cantao that they needed to be educated from the ground up. And, from what she had learned in their classes so far, the man had been right.
Most of what had been taught about Cantao in the Madrium had been laughably false. For example, the Madrium taught that the Cantosim worshipped the meridians of aestus that crisscrossed Telua, that these represented some sort of god. It was true that the songlines, as the Cantosim called them, were considered holy. However, they were not gods in themselves. They were the creations of the Singers, who had sung them as they walked across the land, creating it in the process, and as such were merely artifacts of divinity, not divine in themselves. That such a basic tenet of Cantao could have been taught incorrectly at the Madrium pointed to a deliberate campaign of misinformation, rather than a simple mistake.
This was only one of a number of falsehoods perpetuated by the Nasura. The war between Ivaelia and Vhar, which had transformed parts of Cantaria into a wasteland for decades after, was not a defensive action on Ivaelia's part. Or at least not according to the Cantarians. It had been Cantaria's misfortune to side with Vhar, and when Vhar withdrew her support, Cantaria was left to face Ivaelia alone; the Nasura had been waiting, like a carrion bird, to swoop in and seize what they could. Which meant Rilao, and all of southern Cantaria. Vaelin found the revisionist history enthralling, like a naughty book she wasn't supposed to read.
Of course, there were some things the Nasura had gotten right about Cantaria --- the prohibition against women taking part in political discussions, for example. This definitely did not sit right with Vaelin, and merely added to her general frustration at being stuck where they were. Adranaya didn't really seem to care, but she didn't seem to care about anything anymore. She spent most of the time in their classes just staring off into the middle distance.
The hardest thing for Vaelin to swallow, though, was being laughed at by children for her ignorance. She knew that it was through no fault of her own, and she knew that they were just children, but it stung all the same. It reminded her too much of her own childhood, and the barbed words that had often blown her way.
One day, the teacher asked a question in Cantarian, too quickly for Vaelin to catch, something about the Voices of Heaven and the Echo, whatever those were. Vaelin didn't quite understand it, but one of the children in the class, Taoso, raised his hand. He was an impetuous boy, given to mischief. Vaelin had liked him immediately. 
The teacher called on Taoso and he stood, then said something else Vaelin didn't catch. All the other children laughed uproariously, and Taoso grinned. The teacher looked furious and called the boy outside the classroom. The two of them came back in a few minutes later, the boy in tears.
"Excuse me," said Vaelin, rising from her seat. The teacher gave her an arched eyebrow. "What was that all about?"
"He was impertinent," the teacher replied. 
"I was always taught that impertinence was a sign of intelligence," Vaelin said. 
"I don't care what you were taught," said the teacher. "Sit down, or you'll get the same treatment, no matter how old you are."
Vaelin crossed her arms and sat back down. Taoso looked at Vaelin, sniffling. She winked at him, and he smiled through his tears.

From the high balcony atop the towering Umbratorium, Darano Sanavale, The Umbrata, surveyed his city. Night was falling. Twelve lines of syrillium stretched from a central dodecagon in the floor behind him, flowing over the balcony's edge and down the ribs of the tower, their glow just beginning to be visible. Torches and lanterns were being lit throughout the city, and a soft orange light began to suffuse the misty air. The nights were growing warmer. Soon it would be time for war.
"Quite a view, wouldn't you say, Ambassador?" the Umbrata said, turning to the figure behind him.
"Stunning, Your Purity," said Belosveka, coming to join the Umbrata at the molded silver railing, which seemed to drip and flow like water down the side of the building. The drop itself was, Darano knew, highly intimidating, but Belosveka had never seemed fazed by it. In fact, he had yet to see the Vharian sweat under any circumstances. Which was probably why he was the ambassador.
The Umbrata turned back to the view. "Each of those lights represents one of my citizens. One of my responsibilities. Any father would descend to violence to protect his children, would he not?"
"Indeed, Your Purity. No one would deny this."
"I'm glad you agree. When my parents were assassinated by Cantarian agents, I vowed to protect this city, and all of Ivaelia, from the scourge of shavalism." He paused a moment, feeling a sudden pang of deep sadness, both for the original tragedy, and from the resulting tragedies that had unfolded from it, like devils spinning off of the Stormwall. So many lives lost. So much destroyed. And now it would have to happen again, on an even grander scale. 
There was much to admire in Cantarian culture, the rich history of a storied civilization very much the rival of Ivaelia. It was simply tragic that, since the war, the shavalie had emerged as the dominant voice of that culture, necessitating a thorough scourging. Much that was of great worth would perish in this endeavor, and the Umbrata mourned this loss. But it could not be helped.
Belosveka was waiting patiently for him to continue. "Unfortunately, the terms of the peace accords prevented me from taking proactive measures, which might have spared us this current unpleasantness. But now we find ourselves with an opportunity --- at last we have political support for a proper cleansing. At last we can get our house in order. One must be proactive if one is to serve one's people, is that not so?"
"I have always felt that way, Your Purity."
"In that case, might I assume that Vhar will keep her silence when we strike against those who have threatened our security? Or will you support the Cantarians against us, as you have in the past?"
A ghost of a smile touched the big Vharian's lips, then vanished. "You are direct as always, Your Purity. I am afraid, however, that my instructions in this matter have not been so direct. We did not anticipate a sudden or dramatic action; we had assumed that the fight against the insurgency would remain a matter of policing. I will need time to discuss our official policy with the Tsarosha."
Darano smiled. The man was vexing, but a deft hand at diplomacy, and the Umbrata had always admired those who displayed excellence, even if they did not do what he wanted. "And you, my friend, are as indirect as always. Well, I can see I'll get no answers out of you this evening. Let us enjoy ourselves instead." Perhaps the social angle would knock the man off his game; Darano knew Belosveka found the social customs of Ventacan aristocracy somewhat distasteful. He walked back inside, Belosveka trailing him. "My sister has already gotten the jump on us."
Demeia grinned, lifting her cup. She was seated on a low silken couch, a plate of berries to her left. To her right, a naked Cantarian adolescent knelt with his head at her feet, bearing dark red, raised lines in a strange pattern across his body. Demeia sometimes liked to leave her subjects incompletely Healed, so she could be reminded of what she had done to them.
"Turn around, my dear," said Demeia. The boy looked up at him, terror on his face. She swirled her finger around in the air impatiently. The boy crawled around so that his buttocks faced toward Demeia. "That's better. I was tired of looking at your face," she said, chuckling. "Would you like one, Belo? We have no shortage."
There was an almost imperceptible pause, long enough to be noticed, but too short to be rude. "Thank you, my lady, but I am content with my ale."
"Suit yourself."
"Where did you get this one, Demeia?" said the Umbrata.
"He's the son of that cantie who refused to be Raised. Can't remember his name. You know the one."
The Umbrata frowned. "The son of a traitor is not necessarily a traitor."
"Oh, relax, he's just a cantie. I'm going to return him. We just had a bit of fun, didn't we?" Demeia said. She slapped the boy on the back of his thigh and he jumped, but made no sound. "He's learning."
The Umbrata shrugged. He had enough to manage without trying to rein in all of his sister's impulses, and at least this kept her entertained enough for her not to meddle in more important matters. He turned back to Belosveka with an apologetic smile. "Another ale?"
Belosveka's reply was interrupted by a knock at the door. "Enter," said the Umbrata.
An officer of the Teluric Guard opened the door and saluted. "Your Purity. All of the southern quarter of the Kharsium has been burned."
"Ah." He glanced sidelong at Belosveka. The man would obviously see through the pretext, but would he say anything about it? It didn't make much difference, in the end, but Darano was curious. "Were there many Cantarians there at the time?"
"The usual number, my lord. The quarter was not evacuated."
"Indeed. And the insurgents?"
"We were able to root out one of their safe houses, but there weren't very many of them left. Those that were there took their own lives before we could capture them. I apologize, Your Purity."
"It's of no consequence. Jovadao has given us all the information we need. You are dismissed, Captain."
The soldier bowed and exited. "The Kharsium has been burned down?" Belosveka asked. "Are you not alarmed by this?"
The Umbrata smiled. A little joke between them, then: the idea of being alarmed by something he himself had ordered, which they both knew perfectly well. Such ironies were what kept diplomacy from being a bore. "Just another example of what these extremists are willing to do. This is merely the latest of the atrocities committed in the name of Cantao. They have killed thousands of our citizens, and we must respond. Fortunately," he said, settling back on the padded couch next to Demeia, "with the information Jovadao has given us, we are in an excellent position to take decisive action."
"What kind of action, my lord?"
And here was the real test --- would the Vharians attempt to warn Cantaria of the impending attack? Even if they did, it would be too late, but Belosveka couldn't know that all the preparations had already been made. Darano decided to tell him about the plan, minus the actual timing. Then perhaps they could capture a Vharian messenger or two and Heal them, to see if Belosveka had betrayed Ivaelia after all. In the meantime, a false show of trust might push the Vharian to open up a bit. Nothing to lose, really. "Rilao must be dealt with first --- we have nominal control over the city, but its heart is still Cantarian.  We need only a month to gather our forces. Once we have taught Rilao a lesson in who is the true power in this region, we shall turn toward Tenoava, and root these shavaliae out at last.
"We are going to war, Ambassador."

The Teluric Guard crested the hill, and the ford that was not a ford was spread out below them. The Umbrata was riding near the front, since there was little chance of ambush. Being out under the open sky, beyond the Stormwall, was truly freeing, like standing naked on the balcony during a storm. There were times when the crown felt more like a shackle, and those times had been coming more and more frequently of late. He took his responsibility toward his people with deadly seriousness, and it galled him that some people didn't seem to understand this, didn't see the burden he placed on himself. He could just as easily be a playboy, like his brother. But he had chosen the righteous path, the path of true leadership. Under his benevolence, Ivaelia would be restored to her rightful glory. The shavalie filth was all that stood in the way.
He paused on an outcrop of rock. One of his generals, a blessedly taciturn man, rode up beside him and they sat together, surveying the river. The area was not a natural place for a crossing, and there usually wasn't one here. But the shavaliae had manipulated the rocks to create a secret ford, through the strategic use of landslides and rockfalls. It was quite impressive, really. In a month, they would move it again, so that no one but they would be able to cross the river in secret. No one, that is, who didn't have Jovadao in custody.
"How long will it take to cross?" Darano asked.
"The rest of the day, Your Purity. We expect to have a perimeter set up on the far side of the river within the hour, and a full camp by nightfall. We found a small party of Cantarian scouts across the river and took them by surprise; none escaped."
"Good. Then we should be on track to reach Rilao within five days, correct?"
"Yes, Your Purity. Do you have any new orders? Does the plan remain the same?"
The Umbrata nodded. "Yes. We cannot hope to defeat them in the swamps around Tenoava. We must draw them out."
This had been a long time coming. It would feel good to exercise his full power, to see the might of the Nasura unleashed on a city once again, after so many years on the leash. It was tragic that so many would have to die, but one could not hold back the tide of history. As he rode back along the ranks of soldiers, he felt himself getting more and more excited by the prospect. A Vortex would be just the thing, he decided, as much for the image it created as for its destructive force. For once, there were no political realities to hold him back from what had to be done. This time, Rilao would burn.

"So, how are you enjoying your studies?" Gavasie said, turning from the plants he was tending. The three of them stood in the Ouvintero's ornamental garden, in a courtyard behind the Sagradhao. It was a beautiful place, with several tiled fountains providing a relaxing soundscape. The air was filled with a spicy scent from some lovely, but poisonous, flowering trees around the perimeter. Shafts of light caught the floating pollen, which sparkled in the air like gold dust.
"They're... different," Vaelin said. Adranaya, as usual, said nothing.
"Hmm. Well, I hope they are changing your perspective on our society. I would hate to have you think ill of us. Oh, by the way, I have decided not to execute you for the time being."
Vaelin and Adranaya shared a look. The casualness of his statement somehow made Vaelin feel even less relaxed. "Thank you, my lord," she said, bowing.
"I am not a lord, there is no need to bow. For future reference, the proper title is High Listener. That's what Ouvintero means in Cantarian."
"I will remember that, High Listener."
"And what are your feelings about the Nasura, now that you have learned the truth about the massacres and atrocities they have perpetrated against the Cantosim over the years?"
Vaelin wasn't entirely convinced that what she'd learned in the Cantarian classroom was the "truth", but it certainly contradicted the Ventacan version of history. According to the Cantarians, they had spent the last twenty years in a state of relentless oppression. The shavaliae weren't terrorists, they were freedom fighters. And in their version of history, both the terrorist acts and the reprisals were mostly instigated by the Nasura, fake events meant to justify the endless crushing of Cantarian culture. In Vaelin's limited experience, things were rarely so simple. The truth was usually somewhere in between.
Vaelin was spared the necessity of a reply when a messenger burst into the garden, out of breath. He saluted the Ouvintero, then relayed a message that was obviously distressing. Vaelin was able to pick out the word "Rilao", and the words for "killed" and "burned", which both featured prominently in Cantarian historical literature. Gavasie's face went from a mere frown to apoplectic rage as the messenger spoke. Vaelin distinctly heard the word "Jovadao" as they conversed. Finally, the messenger saluted again and left, and Gavasie turned toward the two foreigners.
"Rilao has been sacked," he said, his voice dangerously calm. He sounded like he was discussing an irrelevant treaty from a hundred years past, but a vein pulsed on his forehead and his neck muscles stood out. Vaelin immediately felt like she was sinking into the ground, a cold sweat breaking out on her back. "The Ventacans have slaughtered one in twelve of the citizens, including children. They have also killed every man or boy of fighting age that they could find, and raped many of our women. They used an Infernal Vortex against a populated area. And do you know how they were able to take Rilao by surprise?"
Vaelin swallowed. She tried to speak, but her throat was too dry. "No, High Listener," she finally managed to croak.
"We believe it was intelligence provided by your friend Jovadao. He is, apparently, still alive, despite what you told us. The Ventacans forded the river in secret, then descended on Rilao before we even knew they were coming. If not for Jovadao's knowledge, they would have had to ford the river elsewhere. Where we might have been warned."
Overcoming her fear for herself and her companions, Vaelin began to process what he was saying. The entire city of Rilao, burned? She had just been there. The place had been so full of life, the opposite of Baranaath or Tenoava. How could it have fallen so quickly? How many of the thousands of breathing, sweating people she had seen were now dead, burned beyond recognition?
A few moments after Gavasie had finished speaking, a contingent of guards with heavy beards filed into the garden and immediately seized Vaelin and Adranaya by the arms. 
"No, wait," Vaelin said. She instinctively tried to worm out of their grasp, and was rewarded with a swift punch to the solar plexus, knocking the wind out of her. Adranaya looked sad, but unsurprised, as though she had been waiting for something like this to happen.
"I have reconsidered my decision about you," Gavasie said. "You will have a few days left to live while I decide a suitably demonstrative means of executing you. I suggest you take the time to reflect upon your sins and the sins of your peoples, and to purify your souls before the Singers." He said something to the guards, and they dragged the two girls out of the garden.

Vaelin's cell was built into a small cave, complete with a rivulet of water running down the back wall and a slippery sheet of algae on the floor. Despite the heat outside, the cave was damp and cold. They had stripped her of her satchel, but thankfully not her clothes. A thick wooden door blocked out all light except for a pinhole at the edge of the food slot. Her eyes had adjusted to the gloom, but the light was still so dim that she could barely see.
In the two days she had been locked in the cave, she had moved beyond shock and despair to a kind of numb resignation. She was going to die, and yet her predominant mental state was boredom and resentment. She was being cheated of a long life, for crimes she didn't commit. Of course, if she hadn't taken the scroll, none of this would have happened, so maybe she did carry some of the blame. She was, after all, still the same farkha thief she had always been, and deep down she had always known that any brief happiness she found would be ephemeral. But execution? And for all of them? Adranaya, especially, didn't deserve such treatment. Vaelin didn't know what method the Cantarians would use to kill them, but it was sure to be drawn-out and horrifying.
She assumed Gadarien would be executed as well, given the depth of the Ouvintero's rage. She still hadn't sorted out her feelings for him. A part of her still loved him desperately, but another part actually wanted to see him dead. It was all so confusing. Not that it would matter for much longer. At the moment, she really just wanted something to comfort her and take her mind off things. She would have killed for a puff, but her pipe and pouch of minuaj was in her satchel with the rest of her belongings.
She was used to being in difficult situations, but never before had she felt so completely trapped, so bereft of options. She had no idea how to escape and didn't know where she would go if she did, since she was surrounded by miles of hostile swampland. And begging for her life seemed futile. The Ouvintero was clearly not a man who would be persuaded by her heartfelt tears. 
Somehow, she had to make herself, Gadarien, and Adranaya seem like valuable resources to the shavalie. Gavasie would have to feel that he was giving something up by executing them. But what could they offer him? It was true that they had some specialized knowledge and skills, but that wouldn't be of much use to someone with an entire army at their disposal. Especially an army that was not trained in teluro, and therefore couldn't be used directly by a telurix.
There was one shell she had to play, and that was the Scroll of Maidara. Her journal still contained the copy she had made, in her private code. It would seem like gibberish or bad poetry to anyone who wasn't already familiar with the contents, but she had studied it and knew most of the steps. But the scroll would be a difficult tool to wield. The technique described within, while incredibly dangerous to perform, also promised incredible power, but without an accurate teluric map, they didn't even know where to find an untapped silanus. And even if they did, it would be terribly dangerous to get there without the map. By itself, the scroll was useless.
The ideas had gone around and around in her head until she brushed against the edges of insanity. She was both on edge and exhausted, unable to really sleep, but also restless and itching to get out into the open. Finally, after pacing endlessly, going through old qhurasothi forms, and doing some cramped calisthenics, she propped herself up against the driest of the walls and dropped into an uneasy half-sleep.
She was awoken by the sound of someone fiddling around with the slot in the door. It was obviously not a guard, because the guards simply slid the slot open, took her old bowl, shoved a bowl of food though, and closed it again.
She crawled over to the slot and looked through. On the other side, Taoso, the boy she had befriended, looked back at her curiously.
"Are you devil?" he said, in halting Ivaelic. She could barely make out what he was saying.
"No," she said in Cantarian. "Just a girl."
Taoso smiled and nodded, continuing in Ivaelic. "I thought you were not devil."
"Where is the man?"
"The man is asleeping." Judging by the light, it was probably late afternoon or early evening, and the guard was most likely taking his nap. It was a common practice among Cantarians to nap after a midday meal, although obviously the guard should not have been doing it.
"Guard is sleeping," she repeated, in Cantarian. It was funny to be having a conversation where both parties were speaking languages they didn't actually speak. She chuckled to herself. Then she realized that she must look completely insane to the boy, and for some reason the thought of her own mad image made her laugh more. Watching her, Taoso laughed, too, a carefree child's laugh. 
Then a thought occurred to her. "Taoso, do you see my bag? Is it out there?"
"Yes, bag is on floor."
"Taoso," Vaelin said, "please bring me my handbag." For once, her Cantarian was flawless.
Taoso smiled and disappeared from view, but left the feeding slot open. She heard nothing for a time, and started to worry that the boy had gotten scared and left. Or perhaps he had been caught by the guard. But then his face reappeared.
"Bag," he said, handing it through the slot. Vaelin mouthed a silent prayer of thanks to the Luminae, or whoever was actually watching over her.
"Thank you, Taoso," she said. Then, switching to Ivaelic, "I owe you one."
"One?"
"Never mind. Thank you."
There was a jangling sound of keys, and Taoso looked alarmed. He smiled again, furtively, and closed the slot. She hoped he didn't get caught, both for his sake and for her own. If they caught him, not only would she be responsible for whatever terrible things they did to him, but they would also take away her satchel again. And probably throw in some terrible things for her as well.
She waited for a few minutes, but heard nothing from outside. A half-hour later, she had still heard nothing, so she figured it was safe. In the dim light near the door, she rummaged through her meager possessions, looking for her minuaj pouch and pipe. It would be a little tricky to get a flame going in the damp, but definitely worth it.
Her fingers brushed across something hard and tubular and she frowned. She pulled it out, and it took her a few moments to remember that she still had Fihro. In the absence of food, he had created a new cocoon around himself, which was glowing very faintly, indicating that he was still alive. She smiled as she turned the cocoon around in her fingers a few times, then put it gently back in the bag. Perhaps Fihro would actually outlive her. Her only legacy.
She found her minuaj and loaded up a pipe, then lit it with her flint. The smoke in her lungs was harsh, but the icy feeling that crept up the back of her head a moment later felt heavenly. She leaned back against the wall by the door and breathed deeply. Everything was not fine. Things were not going to be okay. But with the minuaj in her system, her worries receded a little bit, to the point where she could almost forget about them.
She idly felt through the rest of her satchel's contents as she smoked. Her money had been taken, which she shrugged off. It wasn't like she was going to need it. Her fingers closed around her mother's amulet, and she wondered why it hadn't been taken as well. Whoever had taken the money must have assumed that the amulet was just a piece of glass. It had a transparency uncommon in syrillium, so it was an understandable mistake. That kind of crystal clarity was very difficult to achieve. She pulled it out and held it up to the pinhole of light.
Then she glanced at the floor.
On the ground, a faint but clearly discernible map of Telua was spread out in light and shadow. It was a bit blurry, but as Vaelin moved the amulet further away from the light source and changed the angle, the map resolved into crisp focus. As she watched, various parts of the map slowly moved, like shadows of water dripping down glass. A chill went up her spine as she realized what she was looking at. The moving parts were meridians and silani.
She held in her hand the Teluric Map.
She leaned back against the wall, her heart pounding. This was it. A way out. And she had possessed it all this time. Now all she had to do was muster the courage to actually go through with the idea. The Scroll of Maidara promised a good chance of death, or something even worse, to anyone who attempted the techniques written there. But what did she have to lose?
She sat studying the map for a time, thinking through what she was going to do and say. Then she gathered up the dregs of her courage and began pounding on the door.

Habsa Gavasie did not look pleased to see them. Vaelin, having no idea what time it was when she discovered the map, had accidentally made her play at night, while Gavasie was eating dinner. Fortunately or unfortunately, the Ouvintero was planning the defense of Tenoava while he ate, and for some reason he had agreed to listen to Vaelin's plan, first dismissing the generals gathered in the dining chamber.
Gavasie paced back and forth across the candlelit room, uncharacteristically agitated. Gadarien stood blinking in the light; apparently he had been awoken and brought in. For whatever reason, Adranaya was not present.
"If you're wondering why I bothered letting you come before me, you might as well know that it's out of desperation," said Gavasie. "The Ventacans are coming for us, and we have no chance against them. Most of our actions to date have had the express purpose of disguising our true capability, which is no where near up to the task. We are short on men, short on weapons, and short on experienced officers. So I hope your plan is as good as you claim, or your execution may be sooner and messier than you had anticipated."
Vaelin felt a lump in her throat, tried to ignore it, failed, and swallowed. "I believe my plan could provide a way to save Cantaria. It's risky, but it could work." She paused, trying not to look at Gadarien. She had hoped that he wouldn't be here, but she had no choice but to move forward, no matter her misgivings.
Gavasie stopped pacing, sighed, and sat down. "Well?"
She took a deep breath and looked at Gavasie. "I have a few things in my possession that could turn the tide against the Nasura. When we were students at the Madrium, I stole something from one of the archives there." Vaelin glanced nervously at Gadarien. He looked confused. "It was the Scroll of Maidara. Have you heard of it?"
Gavasie shook his head. Vaelin glanced at Gadarien again. His face had turned white. Vaelin continued hurriedly. "It's an ancient scroll, from before The Sleep. It describes a method of creating a coro --- a special formation of teluri that allows the members to channel many times more aestus than a telurix can normally channel. In essence, it takes three or more normal teluri and creates one super-telurix, with incredible power.
"This means that, if they were properly situated at the right silanus, along the right meridian, they could channel that power down the meridian and destroy the power structure of an opposing army. You just have to know where to find the silanus, which you can do with a Teluric Map. It's extremely dangerous to create the coro, but I believe the three of us could pull it off without dying. Maybe."
"Right," said Gavasie, sitting back in his chair. "Well, that's a fine plan. Or it would be a fine plan, if we had a Teluric Map. Last I heard, they had all been lost years ago. Maybe there are some hidden away in Hoshin or Old Tisuul somewhere, but I don't see one lying around here. Do you?"
Vaelin smiled. "Funny you should mention that." 

# Chapter 12 #

A day later, Vaelin was sweating. The wet jungle heat pressed down on her like thick woolen sparring pads. It almost made her long for the cool dampness of her cave cell. In the few times she had seen Gadarien since she had admitted stealing the scroll, he had not spoken a word to her. But he didn't need to. She knew exactly what he was thinking.
To keep her mind off of that problem, she tried to focus on planning their attack on the Nasura. According to the Scroll of Maidara, attempting to create a coro with anything other than purest virgin syrillium --- preferably harvested by the telurix's own hand --- was certain death. Fortunately, she had Fihro. She had already done the preliminary work of setting up a habitat for him, but there was only so much syrillium he could produce by himself. Given the right conditions, Vaelin calculated that a week of production ought to be just enough, assuming her interpretation of the Scroll was accurate. In addition to a full complement of aculae for each participant in the ceremony, the Scroll also required the creation of a special aculus-like device called a Siphon. The instructions were beyond vague. She hoped she would be able to figure it out, because if she got it wrong, it would be yet another path to a painful death.
And, of course, that wasn't the only issue with the scroll. There was also the part that she was keeping to herself, that she couldn't admit to anyone just yet. She could only hope that, when the time came, she'd be able to convince the others to go along with it. She was certain that, if she tried to bring it up now, the whole plan would fall apart before it even got started. They had to be committed first, and then, well, she would see what happened. Or maybe she was just afraid to bring it up. Maybe she was being a coward about this, just like she was about the scroll itself.
She sighed, looking again at the texts in front of her. Her eyes were itching. Compared to the libraries at the Madrium, the selection in this library, crammed into an upstairs room at the Sagradhao, was paltry, but there were some old texts that made oblique references to the coro. Mostly these consisted of warnings to avoid the creation of a coro at all costs. Frustratingly, they were lacking in their explanation of the consequences, except for one crumbling parchment that seemed to imply some link with The Stain. Vaelin still wasn't sure what The Stain was, so the connection was pretty meaningless to her.
She wearily shoved the books aside and leaned over Fihro's enclosure. Gavasie had provided her with a small, warm chamber she could use as a nesting site, along with some wood, tree moss, water, vegetable scraps, and everything else she needed. Like most holy sites, the Sagradhao was situated above a small silanus, which was necessary for the giuji to produce syrillium. The rest was just to make the Fihro feel comfortable, so he would start producing again. Cantaria was, of course, not a natural habitat for giuji like Baranaath or Kulnarra, so making him comfortable was quite a struggle. The air currents and meridian placement had to be just right.
She was rearranging some moss when Gadarien knocked on the doorframe. He stood there, leaning against one arm, his face unreadable.
"He's ready to start producing. He just needs to feel at home," Vaelin said. Gadarien stepped inside and sat down on the floor beside her. They sat in silence for a long moment, not making eye contact. Finally, Gadarien spoke.
"Why? Why did you steal the Scroll?"
Vaelin shook her head. "I'm not sure. It was just there. It seemed like something important at the time. I wanted to get back at Maestra Haidana. I wanted to do something wrong, something rebellious. I had been playing by the rules for so long."
"The scroll was on Haidana's wall, right? How did you get into her office?"
"The door was open. Sometimes it doesn't close properly."
Gadarien sat in silence for a few moments. "I think maybe someone wanted you to take that scroll," he said.
Vaelin felt a chill along her back. "What do you mean? Who? Why?"
Gadarien shook his head. "I don't know. But it doesn't feel right. There was too much at stake for it all to have happened by chance. Someone wanted you to take the scroll, and they wanted to frame Adranaya for it."
"That's another thing that doesn't make sense. I hid the Scroll in my room, but somehow it ended up in Adranaya's room. Someone moved it. But I only had it for a few hours."
They shook his head. "Well, there's not much we can do about it now. I just wish you had told me sooner. Maybe then..."
"What? We could have stopped them from taking her?"
"No. No, I guess not." Gadarien sighed. "I just wish you had been honest with me."
Vaelin looked down. It was true, she had lied to him. Just as he had lied to her. The scale of the lie was different, but the sin was the same. "I'm sorry," she said, finally.
"I'm sorry, too. If I could go back and do things differently..." he trailed off. "Anyway, it's not your fault. You were manipulated."
"Are you going to tell Adra?"
"No. But I think you should."
Vaelin didn't want to think about it, but he was right. She needed to tell Adranaya. Now that Gadarien knew, there was no way she could live with this secret weighing her down.
"Let's talk about the plan," said Gadarien. Vaelin was glad of the change of subject. "So let's say we create this coro. Then what?"
"Then we use the Teluric Map to find a really big silanus along a meridian that leads to the Ventacan army. In theory, then, if we strike when the army is in the right position --- on top of that meridian --- we can dump a bunch of power straight into the commander. More than he can handle. Like slapping the vein above a mosquito on someone's arm."
"How do we get the Ventacan army into the right spot? We can't just ask them to march somewhere so we can destroy them."
"What if the Cantarian army lures them there? What if they expose themselves, make a juicy target that the Ventacans can't refuse?"
Gadarien stroked his chin. "You're suggesting we use the Cantarian army --- the only thing standing between the Umbrata and control of the entire region --- as bait?"
"Yes."
"Risky. Very risky. That means if we fail..." Gadarien trailed off.
"If we fail, we all die," said a third voice, making Vaelin jump.
Adranaya stood in the doorway. She was still pale, but her eyes had a furious intensity to replace the dull, glassy stare she had displayed for the last few weeks. It scared Vaelin a little. She wondered how much of their conversation Adranaya had overheard.
"But if we succeed," Adranaya said, "we could destroy the Umbrata, right?"
Vaelin looked at Gadarien, then looked back at Adranaya. "Yes. And his army."
Adranaya looked straight into Vaelin's eyes. "Then we do it."

"The Nasura has been moving their forces into Rilao, in preparation for an invasion," said Gavasie. "They intend to crush Tenoava and wipe us out for good, and they're taking no chances this time --- it'll be their entire army, not just an expeditionary force."
The Ouvintero let this statement sink in. They were in the grand hall of the Sagradhao. Large paper maps covered the central altar, and a number of other tables were set up around the perimeter. Because it was a meeting of his senior advisors, he was speaking Cantarian rather than Ivaelic. He could not be seen to prefer Ivaelic, even though the language offered some nuances that he found appealing. Speaking the tongue of the oppressor would be bad for morale. The two outsiders would just have to follow along as well as they could.
"These three have come to me with a plan, which I think we should consider," said the Ouvintero, waving Gadarien forward.
"Most of you are familiar with our plan to seize control of the Ventacan army by creating a coro," Gadarien said. "It's an ancient technique --- dangerous, but, we believe, possible. We've studied the Teluric Map and found a huge silanus --- an Apogee --- on top of a mountain, near the border with Vhar, here." He pointed to the spot on the map. "A large meridian runs straight down from that silanus to Lathora Valley, just north of Rilao.
"Our plan is for the three of us to go the Apogee while your army marches on Rilao. Once we are both in place, at a prearranged time, you enter the valley, luring the Ventacan army down to attack you. Then we destroy the Umbrata."
One of the generals, Xibeo, laughed. He was a a thick man with a thicker beard, but the look in his eyes was hard. "I know that valley. I've been there. Marching into there would be suicide."
"Yes, that's kind of the point," said Gadarien. "It has to look like a strategic mistake, which the Ventacans won't be able to resist. The more disorganized your army looks, the better."
"Well, that shouldn't be a problem," said Xibeo. Some of the other generals chuckled wryly.
"All you have to do, general, is position your forces in the right place at the right time," said Gadarien. "Of course, the men can't know about the plan. It has to look like we're attacking in earnest, or the Ventacans won't pounce."
Xibeo thought for a moment, then spoke softly, as though talking to himself. "This doesn't make sense. We would dare to sacrifice our army, based on the theories of these three children? Such a great risk should not be undertaken so lightly." He stood. "No. I will not throw away the lives of my men. If they are to die, they will die for a reason, not the whims of an outsider." He glanced at Vaelin, then looked around the room in challenge. No one said anything. He snorted and walked out, taking several guards with him.
Gavasie stood. "Xibeo has spoken his mind. Those of you who agree with him are free to follow, but beware. There will be consequences." No one moved. Good.
"The plan shall proceed. The end has been foreseen. 'And the Song of Heaven shall ring forth, and the unbelievers shall be scourged, burned like dry grass from the earth. And only the stones shall remain to bear witness.'" He looked around and saw, with approval, that many of the men were nodding their heads. They knew the truth, as he knew it. This public plan would most likely fail, but it would not be in vain. It would merely be the first step on their path to glory. Gadarien's face was unreadable, but he and his team would do their part, even if it was not the part they thought it was. "Siaba, you will pick a small force of men and accompany these three to Rilao, to see them through the occupied country."
"What about Xibeo?" said one of the believers.
"Don't worry about Xibeo," said Gavasie. The girl, Vaelin, seemed troubled, but it was of little consequence. She would sing her part. As would they all.

Adranaya was sitting cross-legged on a carpet, meditating. Vaelin stood in the doorway for at least a minute, uncertainty written into every line of her body, but Adranaya didn't look up. 
"Adra. Can I talk to you about something?"
Adranaya opened her eyes slowly, blinking, and looked up at Vaelin. "Of course. Sorry, I was in a trance."
Vaelin smiled tentatively and came in. She knelt on the floor in front of Adranaya and sat back on her heels, hands in her lap, then took a deep breath.
"I have something to tell you. It's hard for me to say," she began. "It's about the scroll."
A whole range of emotions passed across Adranaya's face in the space of a few moments, too fast for Vaelin to register. Her face finally settled on a blank look.
"What about the scroll?"
Vaelin fidgeted with her hands for a few moments, then took another deep breath. "It was me. I took the scroll from Maestra Haidana's office."
Adranaya's face remained blank, but the color drained from it. She blinked rapidly. "Why?" she whispered.
"I'm not sure. It was just there, hanging on the wall, and, well, you know my history. But I don't know why I took it. I'm so, so sorry." Vaelin was tearing up by the time she finished speaking, but Adranaya's face remained impassive. "Say something. Please."
Adranaya just stared for a few moments longer. She opened her mouth once as if to say something, then closed it again. Then she spoke, her voice deep and even. "I betrayed you, too."
Vaelin wiped her nose and looked into Adranaya's eyes. "What?"
"I betrayed you. You and Gadarien both. When they Healed me, they asked me questions. Who were my friends, who had helped me hide the scroll, who I was plotting with. I sold you out, even though I didn't think you had anything to do with it." She smiled thinly. "I guess I was wrong about that."
Vaelin shook her head. "Adra, of course you did. You told them whatever they wanted to hear. How could you do anything else?"
Adranaya shook her head. "It doesn't matter. None of it matters. If you hadn't taken the scroll, they would have found some other way. Demeia even said so. She wanted to 'play' with me ever since my Challenge, she said. The scroll was just an excuse."
Vaelin stared in amazement. Gadarien was right. Someone had wanted Vaelin to take the scroll, and it was the Umbrata's brother, which meant the Umbrata himself had to be in on it as well. The implications seemed too big for her to even process. But there was another ramification: if Adranaya knew that Vaelin had been set up, then she didn't blame Vaelin for taking the scroll. 
"So," Vaelin said, after a long silence, "you forgive me?"
Adranaya smiled. "Of course."
Vaelin began to cry in earnest, and Adranaya reached out and pulled her into an embrace. Over her shoulder, Adranaya's face relaxed, and she stared unsmiling at the wall.

"Hello, devil lady," said a voice. Vaelin turned and looked down. Taoso smiled mischievously up at her through his long eyelashes. His hands were clasped behind his back.
"Hello, clever boy," Vaelin said. She crouched down so that her head was level with his. "What are you up to?"
Taoso produced a cloth-wrapped package from behind his back. "I have cake. You want?"
Vaelin grinned. "Of course I want. I'll share it with you, okay?"
Taoso nodded and took her hand, leading her to a table occupied by several other giggling Cantarian children. "All from Rilao," he said, indicating the children.
Vaelin's smile slowly dropped from her face. Rilao, the city that had been razed by the Nasura. Thousands murdered, raped, burned alive in their own homes. Did these children know about it? It seemed not, since they were as happy as they had been since she'd met them. Surely they all had families in Rilao. But if the Cantarians were keeping the attack secret from them for some reason, it was not Vaelin's place to tell them.
Taoso was looking at her, concerned. She managed to force out a smile. "All from Rilao?" she repeated. Her voice sounded weak in her ears.
"Yes!" said Taoso, proudly, sticking out his chest. "Best city! Biggest trees!" He laughed again. The other children introduced themselves to her. Several shyly asked if they could touch her hair, which she allowed. A few of them also spoke some Ivaelic, and she practiced it with them, switching to Cantarian to practice her own skills as well. Taoso unwrapped the cake, cut it with a big knife that he apparently carried around with him everywhere, and served Vaelin the biggest piece.
To her, it tasted of ashes.

Xibeo had always found the Ouvintero's taste a bit too ascetic, almost ostentatiously austere. The edicts urged temperance, chastity, and all manner of other boring lifestyle choices, but Gavasie took it a few steps too far. His living quarters, for example, were more like a prison cell than a bedroom. His "bed" was made of hardwood, with no cushioning at all. Instead of a pillow, a smooth, saddle-shaped block of wood sat at one end. His other furniture consisted of a simple wooden desk laden with books, and one chair, so that visitors to his chambers were obliged to stand, as Xibeo was doing now.
"There is a tree that grows in the jungle near Rilao," Gavasie intoned, looking up from his book and smiling thinly. "Locals there call it ujulo, or hollowbush. You know of it?"
Xibeo choked down his irritation. Of course he bloody knew of it, he had grown up in those jungles. He doubted Gavasie had ever hidden from an angry uncle inside one of the damn things, as Xibeo had, getting his hair and clothing full of the accursed burrs. But this wasn't about what was said; with Gavasie, it never was. It was, as always, about dominance. Gavasie was testing him, trying to provoke a reaction --- a reaction that Xibeo would not give him.
"I am familiar with them, Your Melodiance," Xibeo replied expressionlessly.
"Yes, of course you are. Do you know why they are hollow? It's so that they can grow. You see, they don't start out hollow; they grow like a normal tree, but with a soft interior, like a sponge. And there is a special kind of fungus that grows in the heartwood of the tree, consuming it from the inside out. As the tree rots, it produces burrs on the inside of its bark, which are only exposed once the meat of the tree has rotted away. Animals, seeking shelter, hide inside the hollow shell of the tree, and the burrs cling to their flesh. The individual tree eventually dies, but not before it has spread its seeds."
Xibeo was not sure what to make of this monologue. Was this a further test? He opted to say nothing, letting the silence stretch. A technique that Gavasie himself used extensively. Xibeo would see how Gavasie liked it.
"I have always valued your expertise on the battlefield, Xibeo," said Gavasie, between sips of tcha. "However, I am concerned about your dedication to our true cause. I have not, for instance, seen you at Harmony more than twice in the last two weeks."
"I have been busy, Your Melodiance. War is brewing." Xibeo, said thrown off by the sudden change of subject. What was this about?
"As I am aware, yes. But times of strife are times to renew our faith, not to shun it. How can we sing the divine song if we never stop to examine its harmonics?"
Xibeo stared ahead at the wall. It was bare, as were the other three walls. "I do what I do for the good of Cantaria. Is that not enough?"
The Ouvintero sighed. "You have not been listening, I am afraid. The time of prophecy is at hand, Xibeo. All the signs are there. Our enemies threaten us, 'Lo, from the swirling waters to the blackest swamps'. Three strangers have arrived from the south, 'carrying hope in their hearts'. A terrible weapon is in our grasp. The aestus is agitated all around us --- can you not feel it?"
"Weapon? What weapon?" Xibeo said, confused.
"Ah, yes, you were not privy to those conversations. A slip of the tongue on my part. Well, given your situation, I see no reason not to tell you about it now."
His situation? What was Gavasie talking about? Xibeo, a pragmatic man to a fault, preferred plain speech; the Ouvintero's flowery riddles grated on his nerves. But he said nothing.
"You have, of course, heard of the Holy Chord, yes?"
"Of course, Your Melodiance."
"And, like most people, you probably think it's merely a legend. But it is no legend. We have uncovered the secret texts, studied the harmonics within. The Chord is within our grasp."
Xibeo was stunned. The Chord was real? Surely, that would change everything. But the Ouvintero was still speaking.
"The Chord is but one part of the prophecies, but taken as a whole, you must admit that the sounds are clear. The day of days approaches."
"I know only what I hear with my own ears. I know nothing of the Chord. But these signs of prophecy have come before, Your Melodiance, and the Song of Heaven has not yet been sung."
The Ouvintero sighed. "That is your position, then? That the Song is merely some myth, or something in the distant future?"
"I do not pretend to know, Your Melodiance. I am just a soldier."
"You disappoint me. This is no time for a lack of faith, or a lack of vision." Gavasie signaled to someone outside the doorway. Xibeo had not realized there was anyone there. Three armed guards shoved their way into the room, crowding the space and surrounding Xibeo.
"What is this? What are you doing?" Xibeo growled.
"What must be done, I'm afraid. It is time for another purge. Take him," Gavasie said, and turned back to his books.

The light from the carved wooden screens was pleasantly dim, the jungle outside casting a pale greenish hue across the work table. Vaelin didn't need a lot of light to work with syrillium. She mostly worked by feel.
Fihro had produced an abundance of excellent-quality raw material, much more than Vaelin had been hoping for. She not only had enough to create aculae for the three of them, but had also been able to replace the dull practice ribs of her flectarus with truly sharp blades. She felt a great sense of gratification just holding the weapon in her hands. When she went through her forms, it seemed to slice through the air like light itself.
She was flowing slowly through a form, taking a break from the tedious work of creating aculae, when there was a knock on the doorframe. She turned to see Gadarien watching her, smiling. She wiped the sweat from her brow and invited him in.
"How are the aculae coming?"
She sat down at the workbench and waved him over. "I've got about fifty of them done so far. Should be finished with all of them by tomorrow afternoon."
He nodded and sat down. "Can I try?"
"Sure." She handed him a small piece of syrillium. "For the coro ceremony, they need to be a little different from the aculae we're used to. They're supposed to be barbed at the tips, for some reason, which will make them a real pain to remove. Assuming we're still alive at that point. Anyway, creating them isn't easy."
"Oh," Gadarien said, rolling the syrillium around in his hands. "I thought it would be like it was back at the Madrium. I was okay at that."
"Yeah, these are a lot harder. Give it a shot."
She watched him struggle with the syrillium, concentrating until sweat stood out on his forehead. The aculus he created wasn't terrible, but the barbs were too large and too brittle. He was out of breath by the time he finished.
"Why are you so good at this?" he panted. "How do you even know how to do it? It's not like we studied this."
She shrugged. "It just seems natural to me. I know what it needs to be like, and I make it that way."
He shook his head and grinned. "Well, I'm glad you're on our side."

The remains of the Rilao garrison filtered into Tenoava, fewer and fewer of them as the days went by. They were greeted with tears of joy, and of rage, and of sorrow for those who did not walk in with them, who never would again. All of the returning soldiers had a haunted look in their eyes. Even the youngest of them looked old and worn down.
Vaelin sequestered herself and studied her translation of the Scroll of Maidara. There was one last piece remaining: the Siphon. The document was either incomplete, or the original author hadn't known what needed to be done, because all it said about the Siphon was a vague description of an aculus-like device that could "find the living heart" of its subject. She had researched the topic in every book in the Sagradhao's library, but there was no further information to be found. Her hope was that, in the course of making aculae, she would somehow be struck with inspiration or find the solution in her research, but that hadn't happened yet.
She didn't have much syrillium left --- enough for a few more aculae, perhaps. The giuji queen had evidently finished whatever spurt of production she had been going through, and the syrillium had dropped to a trickle. Unsure of what to do next, Vaelin simply sat and stared at the glowing creature, watching her slowly move around her enclosure. The movements were soothing to watch, and Vaelin's eyelids started to droop.

The mountain was beyond imposing --- it was terrifyingly large, towering over the valley below like an irate father. The back of the mountain sloped down gradually into a glacier which stretched away for miles. The front side was a vertical cliff, as though the mountain had been sheared in half. Icefalls hung down to either side of the peak, glinting in the half-light.
The mountain was moving toward her, like a wave, but it wasn't as if the mountain were collapsing; rather, the entire scene seemed to be sweeping forward together, as a single piece. She was stuck in place, unable to run, unable to even look away as her doom bore down upon her. The wall of the cliff face loomed, the snow at the top blindingly white, and then the white wall crashed over her and she was obliterated. And yet somehow she remained.
She floated for a time in a white haze, unsure of where she was, or even what she was. She was no longer herself as she had been, that much was certain. Then, out of the haze, two figures slowly resolved into Gadarien and Adranaya. They were standing with their backs to her and to each other, their arms outstretched, hair waving in a wind that Vaelin could not feel. She called out to them, but they did not hear her.
Instead, she heard another voice from behind her, calling her name. She reluctantly turned her back on Gada and Adra and faced the voice, which she knew now, somehow, was that of her mother. Her mother was far, far away, a tiny speck in the swirling whiteness, but her voice sounded as close as Vaelin's own skin.
Between herself and her mother stretched a long, thin thread that glistened and shone. Syrillium. She couldn't see the far end of it, but she knew it stretched from her navel, where it was attached, to her distant mother. 
Her mother called out to her again, and she began pulling the thread. There was nothing anchoring them. They simply floated in a cloud of whiteness, so there was no way to tell whether she was pulling her mother toward herself or pulling herself toward her mother, or both at the same time.
She pulled on the thread. The thread seemed to stretch, growing thinner as it did, like a spoonful of honey. She pulled and pulled, but her mother drew no closer. Instead, the thread pooled up in her hands, growing thinner and thinner before her, until it was finally as thin as a spider's web, only visible because it reflected the light. She kept pulling, and the thread disappeared, and then so did her mother. Vaelin cried out --- 

She awoke suddenly, her head jerking upward. She wiped the drool from the side of her mouth, and looked around, blinking. It didn't look like much time had passed. She looked down at her lap, and beheld the Siphon.
It looked superficially like an aculus, in that it tapered to a needle point, but the similarity ended there. It was much bigger than an aculus --- perhaps the breadth of her hand in length --- and the shape was more like an elongated teardrop, with a small bulb at the fat end. The tapered end was so fine that she couldn't actually see where it terminated; it seemed to vanish into empty space. She experimentally tried to find the tip with her other hand, and the point was so sharp that it sank into the flesh of her thumb without her even feeling it. There was no blood when she withdrew it. But she knew there soon would be.

It was Habsa Gavasie himself who suggested that the coro ceremony be conducted in a sacred place, a place of power. The Scroll of Maidara didn't specify exactly where the ceremony should occur, but it did mention that the spell had to be cast within the penumbra of a silanus. So Gavasie suggested that they use the Foucanta.
"Foucanta" was the Cantarian word for a silanus, but the one they were headed for was the Foucanta --- a sacred location in the Cantarian faith, and considered one of the original spots where the Singers had first begun their world-creating songs. Before even heading toward the Foucanta, each of the three of them had to be ritually bathed, then led through a battery of chanting and ritual movements. By the time they finished, Vaelin was already mentally exhausted, her head spinning from dancing and inhaling rich incense.
After another brief ritual bathing of the feet, the Cantarians formed a procession with the three of them at its heart. There was, of course, a great deal of singing involved. The melodies were complex and wove around each other like snakes in a nest, making Vaelin even dizzier than she already was. There was something about the sound that made her feel simultaneously anxious and deeply at peace, which she would have thought impossible.
The procession wound its way through the deep jungle that began just behind the Sadgradhao, torches illuminating the early morning gloom. The sun rose as they made their way, casting blinding rays of rose and orange through gaps in the trees. The three of them were quiet on their journey, absorbed in their own thoughts. They all knew what was at stake, what a risk they were taking with their lives and sanity.
The entrance to the Foucanta was at the bottom of a mossy grotto deep in the woods. There was a pool of water at the bottom, and the walls surrounding it were slick with algae. The sun had fully risen by this point, but the light had not yet reached into the grotto, so the water looked almost black.
"From here, you must continue the journey on your own," Gavasie said. "Halfway down the far wall of the pool is a small cave entrance. Swim through the tunnel and it will lead into the cave. You'll need to gather a deep breath; the tunnel is short, but it's narrow and difficult to move through quickly. Don't get stuck. The ceremonial chamber is at the back of the cave. You'll find candles and flint there. Good luck."
"I'll go first," said Gadarien. "I've done it before." He stripped off his clothes, completely unabashed, gave a quick smile to Vaelin and Adranaya, and jumped into the pool. He came up with a gasp.
"That's brisk!" he said. He gave them a grin, then breathed in and out quickly a few times before taking one giant breath and disappearing beneath the water.
Vaelin and Adranaya waited a few minutes, neither of them really looking forward to diving in. Finally, Vaelin just decided to get it over with.
"Turn around, please," she told Gavasie. He obliged, signaling to his men to do the same. She stripped down, leaving only a pouch tied around her neck. She shared a glance with Adranaya, who had a slightly amused expression, then jumped into the pool.
"Brisk" was an understatement. The water was shockingly cold after the moist heat of the jungle, and her toes touched the slick mud and rocks at the bottom of the pool. It was completely dark and silent under the water. Vaelin surfaced and treaded water for a bit, collecting her nerve. Adranaya watched impassively from the rocks above.
"See you inside," Vaelin said. Adranaya didn't reply. Vaelin swam to the far edge of the pool, took a deep breath, and dove.
She found the tunnel entrance quickly enough. It was only a few feet below the surface, but the tunnel sloped sharply downward into oppressive blackness. She pulled herself along by her fingertips. It felt like she descended for a lot further than she would have described as "short", and that was only to get to the halfway point. The tunnel bent at the bottom, and she had to twist her body to get through the space. She wondered how Gadarien, with his broader shoulders, had pulled it off at all.
Her air was starting to run out, and the tunnel had gotten narrower. She pulled herself along the slope, going upward now. Her eyes were open for any sort of light as she forced down the rising sensation of panic. Panic would mean death. Still, she felt it tugging at the edges of her mind, whispering that she was not going to make it, that the tunnel was just going to get narrower and narrower until she got stuck.
She kept pulling, as steadily as she could manage. At last, the tunnel mouth opened into a larger body of water, with a subtle cold current. The water had become faintly lit --- there had to be a light of some kind. With a final twist to clear herself from narrow opening, she swam upward as fast as she could, her lungs burning, all caution forgotten, and burst out into the open air of the cave, gasping and sputtering. 
A shaft of light shone down from a hole in the top of the cave, turning the water bright blue where it struck the surface. All across the lake, eddies of aestus swirled faintly in the darkness, rising just above the water and then sinking below its skin. As she treaded water, she felt a tickling on her legs and realized that tiny, blind fish were nibbling at her. She chuckled a little at the thought of them.
She treaded water for a while, catching her breath. Toward the far end of the cave, there was a brighter glow, only visible once she worked her way around to one side of the light shaft. She swam toward the glow, her splashes echoing off the cave walls. At the back of the cave was a small sandy beach, and she saw Gadarien there,   hunched over something on the sand.
She heard a sound from behind her. It sounded like a human voice, but faint, and coming from below the surface. She turned and saw some bubbles rising from the point where the tunnel entered the cave.
Adranaya.
Vaelin quickly took a big breath, then dove back down below the surface. From inside the tunnel, she could just barely make out a pair of hands, frantically waving. She grabbed them, braced her feet against the cave wall, and hauled upward. Adranaya popped out, panic scrawled across her face, visible even in the underwater gloom. She was clearly out of air and out of energy. Vaelin exploded upward, swimming as hard as she could, and they came up together, Adranaya frantically gasping for breath and coughing up water. Gadarien was already splashing toward them. Together, they carried Adranaya across the lake to safety.
Adranaya struggled up onto the sand, still retching and coughing up water. She had scratches along her side where she had scraped the rock when Vaelin pulled her out, but was otherwise unharmed.
"You scared me there," Vaelin said.
Adranaya smiled weakly between coughs. "You think you were scared? I thought I was dead."
Once Adranaya was settled, catching her breath, Vaelin got up to explore. She was putting off the inevitable, she knew, but she just needed a little more time to prepare herself. Now that they were here, and she was going to have to tell them the truth about the ceremony, her nerves were catching up to her. She needed to be strong, to speak with confidence, and to do that, she needed to relax a bit.
 A pit dug into the sand was filled with candles, and some dry flint and steel sat nearby. Gadarien had already lit several of the candles. There were a number of clay vessels --- offerings, most likely --- scattered around the beach. An entryway at the back led to another, smaller cavern, and it was from this that the cold white glow came. It looked like a good place to gather her thoughts.
Vaelin had to stoop to get through the doorway, but she was able to stand up when she got inside. It turned out to be more of a tunnel than a cavern, with a rivulet running down the middle of the floor and sand covering the rest. The walls were lined with alcoves, and each of the alcoves held a skeleton. 
The ones up front were glowing strongly. Light seemed to emanate from somewhere inside the bones and pour out through a semi-translucent surface, as though the bones were made of frosted glass. Vaelin could feel the power stored in them. She was afraid to touch them --- it seemed like some kind of sacrilege. She had heard that the bones of powerful conduari glowed after death, and wondered if this was what her own bones would look like one day.
In general, the nearer the bones were to the tunnel entrance, the brighter they glowed, indicating that they were more recent. As the tunnel receded into darkness, the bones grew older and dimmer. Some, however, were still brighter than those near the front. The owners of these had obviously possessed great power. She held her hand near a bright skull, and the aestus swirled up from it and wrapped around her hand. She pulled her hand back, startled, but the phenomenon didn't appear to have harmed her. She tentatively reached out again, and again the aestus swirled out of the skull and around her skin, at some points sinking into her flesh. She felt a subtle tingling where it did.
"Come on, we need to get started," said Gadarien, making her jump. She headed back out into the main cavern, feeling like the skulls were watching her.

Now was the time. Vaelin had to break the news. They would either go along with it, or the whole plan would collapse, right here. Vaelin's mouth felt as dry as the canyonlands back in Baranaath, and her palms were sweating. She began to speak, but her voice came out as a croak, so she cleared her throat and began again.
"So, um, there's something I haven't told you yet," she began. "There's a step in the coro process that's a little... weird."
Gadarien and Adranaya looked at each other, then back at Vaelin. "Weird how?" Gadarien said.
"Well, you remember how I told you that, for the coro to work, the participants have to truly know each other?"
"Yeah?"
"Um. That was a bit of an understatement."
A look of annoyance flashed across Gadarien's face. "Look, just tell us whatever it is you're trying to tell us. We don't have time for this."
"Fine," said Vaelin flatly. She turned and looked Adranaya in the eye. "We have to fuck each other."
The silence in the cave was profound. Vaelin heard a subtle splash and echo as some small creature slid into the water. Gadarien and Adranaya looked almost comical, with both of their mouths agape.
Adranaya recovered first. "Holy Luminae, you're serious."
"You're telling me," said Gadarien, "that the Scroll of Maidara --- the secret of the ancients, forbidden to modern man --- is about group sex?"
"No, no, not group sex," Vaelin said, annoyed. "We just have to have 'intimate knowledge' of each other. All of us."
"That explains why the scroll was so forbidden," Gadarien said.
"What do you mean?"
"In Cantaria, we have traditions of groups of people sleeping together. Or we did, before the war. The Ventacans crushed that tradition, forcing us to be monogamous. Didn't you know about that?"
Vaelin shook her head. She had had no idea. This was not something that had been discussed during her "reeducation". No wonder the Ventacans didn't want anyone following the scroll. More than just conferring power, it conferred dissent --- it was power that didn't fit the Ventacan mold. Therefore, it had to be suppressed.
"Well, it's a good thing you two already slept together," Adranaya said suddenly.
Gadarien's looked, if possible, even more shocked. "You knew about that?"
Adranaya laughed darkly. "Well, now I do. Thank you for confirming."
Vaelin didn't know what to say. Her face grew hot with shame. The absurdity of the whole plan loomed in front of her like the wave in her dream. How had she ever thought she would be able to pull this off? It was insane. And now she was tearing apart her relationship with her only two friends in the world, and for what?
Adranaya cleared her throat. "So, only Vaelin and I need to be 'intimate' with each other now, right?"
Vaelin looked up in surprise. "Yes," she said.
"Well, we haven't got much time to waste, then," Adranaya said. Her expression was pure determination. "Gadarien, could you give us some privacy, please?"
Gadarien still looked lost and confused. He stared around at the tiny beach and the expanse of dark water. "Not really, no."
"Just go into the cave," Adranaya said. She sounded like she was talking to a child. Gadarien lifted his hands up. He looked like he was about to say something, but then dropped his hands back on his legs with a slap and closed his mouth, apparently thinking better of it. He got up and walked off, his footsteps echoing in the silence.
Vaelin and Adranaya stared at each other, neither one knowing what to say.
"Well?" said Adranaya.
Vaelin laughed nervously. "Um. I don't really know what to do."
Adranaya made an exasperated noise. "Just come over here."
Apparently, Adranaya did know what to do, and guided Vaelin's hands, and then her tongue. At first, Vaelin felt more awkward than she ever had in her life --- which, for Vaelin, was saying something significant. A part of her wanted to laugh, and her face felt hot enough to melt iron. She fumbled into it, her hands trembling. Aside from her tryst with Gadarien, sex had always been a chore for her, performed with strangers, a task to be done quickly and efficiently. It was not something to be shared with those she loved. Her body had always been a commodity, nothing more.
But then something changed. Her awkwardness slid away as she watched Adranaya's face, eyes closed, mouth open, body arching back in the candlelight. Vaelin stopped thinking so much, and began to simply feel.
 This, she realized, was a gift she could give, a gift which, apparently, Adranaya was open to receiving. She would never erase her guilt for what she had done, but maybe this small moment of pleasure would go a little way toward healing the wounds. It wasn't about Vaelin. It was about Adra. 
So Vaelin put her shame away and gave herself up, gave herself away whole. And then Adranaya returned the gift, and, beyond the guilt, beyond the shame and the awkwardness, Vaelin felt a part of herself completed, a space filled that she hadn't even known was empty. She dug her fingers into Adranaya's hair and cried out, and the candle guttered with her breath.

After they were done, they called out to Gadarien, who came out of the cave with a smug grin on his face.
"Sad you didn't get to watch?" said Adranaya. Vaelin's embarrassment returned suddenly and in force. But Adranaya didn't seem ashamed at all, and her lack of shame made Vaelin feel ashamed of being ashamed. She shook the feeling off. For what they were about to do next, she would need all her focus and will. She couldn't afford to worry about shame, not now. 
Gadarien just shook his head and chuckled. "This is not how I thought the day was going to go at all," he said.
They all laughed, perhaps a little too hard. Vaelin got up, relieved, and washed herself with the cold lake water. She felt wrung out and exhausted, but she knew the real test was yet to come.
Gadarien lit some more of the candles and placed them in a large circle on the sand, and he and Adranaya sat cross-legged inside it. Vaelin joined them in silence, and they began their meditation. Their minds needed to be completely calm for the ceremony. There was a single candle in the middle of the circle, and its smoke rose straight up in a grey line, with no wind to disturb it. It reminded Vaelin of something, but she couldn't think what. 
They meditated for an hour, drifting in their minds. There was little sound in the cave. They could hear each other breathing, and the occasional soft lapping of water against the walls as some sightless animal moved in the darkness. Their breathing slowly became synchronized, breath following breath, in and out. At the same moment, following some unspoken signal, all three of them opened their eyes.
"Who goes first?" said Gadarien. "I will, if I need to."
"No," said Vaelin. "It should be me. It's my plan, I should take the risk."
Gadarien nodded. They moved the central candle out of the way and Vaelin lay on her back in the middle of the circle. Gadarien knelt on her left and Adranaya took up position facing him. They synchronized their breathing once more, entering a light trance state.
Gadarien picked up the Siphon. It glimmered in the candlelight as he positioned it above Vaelin's chest. They made eye contact, and Vaelin nodded.
He slipped the needle deep into her heart.
She was expecting it to hurt a lot, but it only felt like pressure. As before, the point was so sharp that she couldn't even tell when it had penetrated her skin. It was only when the needle's tip was all the way to her heart itself that she began to feel a burning pain. She gritted her teeth and tried to keep her breathing calm and even.
Gadarien looked her in the eye again and waited. She took three more deep breaths, in and out. "Do it," she said, between breaths.
Gadarien leaned down and placed his lips around the end of the Siphon and began to suck gently. Nothing happened at first. Then came the agony.
It felt to Vaelin as if some kind of animal --- a wolf, perhaps --- had been set loose within her chest and was ripping out a chunk of her heart from the inside. She held in her scream for a second, but then she couldn't contain it anymore. It echoed around the cave. Gadarien stopped what he was doing and looked at her with alarm.
"Don't...stop!" Vaelin gasped. Gadarien looked at Adranaya, then, reluctantly, continued. The Siphon slowly turned red near the top as it absorbed the heart's blood. Finally, it was full, and Gadarien gingerly withdrew it. 
Vaelin rolled over and lay gasping on the ground, dry-heaving, drenched in sweat, her eyes closed and her heart pounding. But she had survived.
It was a long while before she was able to get up, and by the time she did, she was shivering and felt as though she had come down with the flu. All of her muscles ached, and her skin felt raw, like she had been lightly burned all over. The sand beneath her felt like broken glass. Her mind was racing and her nerves were aflame.  How long would she feel like this? She didn't think she could take it for too much longer.
She got up to her knees, still shaking a little, and reached into her pouch and pulled out an aculus. With trembling fingers, she managed to transfer the blood from the Siphon into the aculus, using her will to manipulate both items. She could feel the power of the silanus moving through her as she did so, flowing out of the bones of the dead, like a spring feeding a rushing creek.
Gadarien looked at her, his gaze penetrating. She managed a smile in return, although she still felt a little like throwing up.
"Turn around," she told him. He obliged, and she knelt behind him, feeling along his spine and gently probing his meridians. She found the spot she was looking for, the apex of the sumnial meridian. It was midway down his spine, right at the center of his body.
"Are you ready?" she said, just above a whisper. He took a breath, then nodded. She slid the aculus home.
A burst of white slight streamed from Vaelin's chest into Gadarien's back, like a lightning strike between their bodies. They both shouted, more in alarm than pain; the phenomenon didn't hurt, or at least it didn't hurt Vaelin. In fact, after the light burst faded and her vision returned, she felt great. All of her aches were gone, and she felt a thrill of energy coursing through her body, from her knees to the top of her head. And she could feel Gadarien in her mind, his every motion shadowed just a bit in advance, as though his thoughts were occurring in her head before they proceeded to his own.
Gadarien turned around and looked at her. His face was pale, and he had a harrowed look in his eyes, like a frightened forest creature. He didn't look like he was sharing Vaelin's feelings of exaltation. He was shivering, in fact.
"Gada? Are you all right?" she asked.
He shook his head. "No," he said. "It feels like I have a building on top of me. It's a little hard to breathe. But I'll live."
Gradually, his shaking subsided and some color returned to his face.Vaelin left the circle to wash her face in the lake, and when she returned, he declared that he was ready to move on to the next step.
He lay in the middle of the circle now, Vaelin kneeling to his right, Adranaya to his left. Vaelin warmed up the Siphon in her hands, then handed it to Adranaya. They all meditated for a few minutes.
When they were ready, Adranaya leaned forward and took a breath, her eyes half-shut. She slowly pushed the Siphon into Gadarien's chest. He made no sound until she began sucking up the blood, at which point he gritted his teeth and hissed, digging his fingers into the sand.
She completed the task and withdrew the Siphon. Gadarien gasped out a breath, and then lay there, breathing deeply, his eyes tightly shut, for several minutes.
"That was not fun," he said, finally.
"No, I can't say I recommend it," said Vaelin. She handed an aculus to Gadarien, who took it solemnly, his hands trembling, and began filling it with blood from the Siphon.
Vaelin watched in silence as Adranaya knelt before Gadarien. He found her sumnial meridian with his fingers, gently tracing them down her back, then paused there for a few heartbeats. Then he lifted the aculus, slowly. 
Adranaya stiffened as he placed the aculus in her spine, but didn't cry out or gasp as the burst of white light linked the two of them. Vaelin supposed that the unpleasantness of the coro ceremony didn't compare to what had been done to her at the Yewiatum. They both recovered quickly, since they knew better what to expect.
Finally, it was Adranaya's turn in the center of the circle. Vaelin took her place to Adranaya's left, and took her hand. She looked scared, and Vaelin could see her pulse pounding in her neck.
"It's going to be okay, Adra," she said. 
Adranaya swallowed and nodded. Beads of sweat had already formed on her body. Vaelin squeezed her hand, then gently started easing the Siphon into Adranaya's chest. Her eyes were wide, the whites showing clearly. She started breathing hard, and Vaelin stopped.
"Adra, you need to calm down," Vaelin said.
"I can't. I can't do this." She sounded suddenly very young, and Vaelin's heart ached for her. But they had no choice.
"You have to," said Gadarien, taking hold of her other hand.
Adranaya closed her eyes and began taking deep breaths. Vaelin and Gadarien shared a look, then both closed their eyes and breathed with her. They stayed in that position until Adranaya gave her assent to continue.
Vaelin slowly plunged the Siphon into Adranaya's chest once more. This time, Adranaya didn't stiffen up, she only closed her eyes and turned her head away. When Vaelin began sucking up Adranaya's heart's blood, she moaned and drew her feet up and down through the sand, kicking her heels, but kept her upper body mostly still.
Vaelin withdrew the Siphon, and Adranaya shuddered. Her eyes rolled back in her head, and Vaelin's heart jumped. 
"Adra," she said. She put her hand on the girl's shoulder and shook her lightly. "Adra!"
Adranaya was still as a corpse, not breathing. Vaelin began to panic. She looked at Gadarien, who shook his head. What could they do?
But then, suddenly, Adranaya came to with a snort of breath, blinking in the candlelight.
"Your turn," she said weakly, looking Vaelin in the eye.
Vaelin let her breath out slowly. "Yeah," she said. She glanced and met Gadarien's weak grin. She turned and knelt, facing away from Adranaya.
Adranaya's hands lightly traced the bubbled scars on Vaelin's back, before sliding down her spine to the center of her sumnial meridian. She felt Adranaya's fingers rest there, light as birds.
"Are you ready?"
"Yes," said Vaelin.
"No, I don't think you are," said Adranaya. But then she placed the aculus anyway.
Instantly, Vaelin felt like she had been plunged into deep, deep water. She felt a tremendous cold, and there was a crushing pressure across every inch of her skin. She tried to scream, wanted to scream, but her voice caught in her throat, and she could only make a choking sound.
White light burst forth from Adranaya's chest and streamed into Vaelin's back, but this time, it didn't stop --- it continued from Vaelin to Gadarien, then from Gadarien to Adranaya, and around and around, faster and faster, blinding them with its radiance. All three of them cried out, in equal measures of fear, pain, and wonder.
The pulse of light went around the circle many times before it began to fade, growing more diffuse with each pass. Then, as suddenly as it had begun, it flickered out, leaving only a circular image seared across their retinas.
Vaelin felt like she had died and been reborn in someone else's body. Was this her flesh? It felt so strange, suddenly, like a suit made of muscle and bone and skin. And yet she felt powerful and alive, like an animal. Her senses were sharp, almost overwhelmingly so. It felt similar to drawing power from the silanus at the Madrium, but amplified greatly. She saw the patterns in the water, repeating themselves endlessly, and realized that everything in the world was just a pattern made solid. 
She looked at Gadarien, and his eyes were black, his pupils dilated wide. The shadow sense she had shared with Gadarien before now extended to Adranaya as well. She could feel both of their emotions, sense their balance as they all stood. She had felt close to them both before, but this was another level of intimacy entirely. She was inside them, and they were within her. She was master and slave, brother and sister, fire and fuel.
Adranaya reached down and scooped up some sand, rubbing it between her fingertips. Vaelin could almost feel the texture in her own hand.
"Wow," Vaelin said. And then she started laughing, and couldn't stop, and soon the other two were laughing along with her, hysterically, their laughter reflected back to them by the walls and the water.

# Chapter 13 #

The mission departed early the next morning, with little fanfare aside from a double row of torch-bearing, bearded men, all singing a complex harmony. They held the torches high overhead, creating a tunnel of light and smoke. The sound of their voices was piercing and sad, somehow evoking a sense of deep loss, although Vaelin couldn't catch most of the words. 
The coro filed through the makeshift tunnel and onto the shadowy trail that lead through the jungle to Rilao. Everything, including their skin and clothes, was soon coated with a thin layer of dew. The sky was a lovely shade of pearly blue, and it shimmered in the heat just above each torch. She wondered when the next time might be that she would experience a moment as peaceful as this. Never, perhaps.
 Their eyes had returned to normal, but every step felt strange --- pleasurable, sometimes intensely so, but odd. Sometimes it felt like wires being dragged lightly across her scalp, making her shiver. At other times her muscles fluttered in various parts of her body. The sensations seemed to come and go in waves, and there were moments where she had to stop moving and allow the wave to pass. She could tell that the others were feeling the same sensations at the same time. She and Gadarien grinned at each other whenever a particularly strong wave came over them.
It was several days of monotonous slogging through swamp and jungle to get to Rilao. On the way, they passed a number of Cantarian checkpoints, well-disguised in the foliage. Even with her heightened senses, Vaelin would never have noticed most of them if Captain Siaba hadn't known where they were.
On the afternoon of the third day, they passed a column of Cantarian troops, or what was left of it. The men --- all men, no women --- were dirty and haggard, many of them limping along with numerous hastily-bandaged wounds. They stank of death and smoke. Siaba stopped their commander, a mere sergeant, to question him about the conditions. All of the officers had been killed.
"It was a massacre," the man said, his voice hollow. He had a long cut down the side of his face, disappearing into his beard. It appeared to be infected. Vaelin wondered if the man knew he probably didn't have long to live. "They surprised us completely --- we never had a chance."
She had trouble following the rest of their conversation, which was in rapid, musical Cantarian, and contained a lot of technical words she hadn't learned yet. But the gist of it was clear: Rilao's defenses had been utterly crushed, and her people decimated. The sergeant sounded like even he was having trouble believing the extent of the carnage. Siaba's face was grim as, with a hand on the shoulder, he let the man get back to his ragged column.
It was late morning the next day when they came upon the first of the trees. It was a huge, ancient stonewood tree, with thick branches supported by columns that had descended to the ground as the tree grew, creating what looked like an entire copse out of a single specimen. The sun was at Vaelin's back as she stepped out of the jungle and saw what was hanging from it.
At each archway-like juncture of branches, a man or boy hung by his hamstrings, which had been cut out of his legs at the back of the knee and wrapped around large nails. Their hands were all bound behind their backs. Some of them had small puncture wounds in the center of their throats. The smell of blood and shit filled the air, along with the beginnings of rot. With her heightened senses, the scent was unbearable. Bile rose to the back of Vaelin's throat, and she felt a similar reaction stirring within Adranaya and Gadarien.
Vaelin saw movement off to her left. Against all of her instincts, which told her to get as far away as she could, she walked nearer. One of the victims, an adolescent boy, was still alive. His throat had not been cut, and he was making whimpering sounds as he moved. He had managed to reach his hamstrings with his bound hands, and was attempting to pull himself up, his hands slipping. His lips were white; he had lost so much blood that, even if he were to escape the tree, he would surely die.
Captain Siaba strode past her as she gaped. With a quick slash of his knife, he opened the boy's throat, and then sliced through the hamstrings. The body thumped to the ground. This time, Vaelin actually did throw up.
"Cut them all down," Siaba ordered, his voice thick.

The walls of Rilao looked as though some fiery creature had raked them with titanic claws. There were large gaps in the row of giant trees, and in front of the gaps were furrows of scorched earth, like vast wounds from a burning sword. Vaelin remembered the beauty of Rilao's intertwined walls; they were almost unrecognizable now. The parts that weren't totally destroyed were marked with ash, contrasting with the bright red flowers which were, improbably, still blooming. There were numerous bodies crumpled against the base of the trees. Smoke rose from a few piles of cinders. The only sound coming from the city was a periodic high ululation, which Vaelin assumed was some kind of funereal prayersong. Other than that, it was eerily quiet.
They stopped on a low rise overlooking the city, where the edge of the jungle petered out, and hid among the foliage. Below them, a flat area covered in thick vegetation stretched the rest of the way to the walls, kept clear of large trees by regular maintenance from the city. Here and there were stands of tall reeds and grasses, and some kind of plant with giant leaves and a texture like felt. In a few places, standing water glinted through the foliage. A smell wafted toward them on the slight breeze, sweet and sickly, like the roasting meat Vaelin had often come across on the roadside in Thelenza. Now, as then, the smell made her queasy. The whole scene gave her a sense of deep unease.
Siaba beckoned two of his men to his side. The three of them stood in a circle, clasping each other around the shoulders, and began a high-pitched song in eerie harmony. Somehow, the combined sound seemed to emanate from multiple places at once. Even standing right next to them, Vaelin found it impossible to pin down the sound's origin. They chanted a simple melody, with a few staccato pauses, then stopped abruptly. 
Almost immediately, a similar sound rose from the jungle around them. It was, again, impossible to determine the exact direction of the sound, but Siaba and his men listened intently. The noise cut off, and Siaba nodded toward an area of thick growth not far away.
"We're going over there." He and his men set off walking without any further explanation. Vaelin shrugged and followed, Gadarien and Adranaya walking just in front of her.
She parted some thick greenery and found herself in a small clearing, invisible from the outside. Leaves formed a sort of roof over the round space, with a small patch of blue sky visible directly overhead. Shafts of sunlight glowed against the wings of tiny insects that hovered in the warm air. The other group of shavaliae was already there.
There were seven of them, all apparently wounded, although none of their wounds seemed mortal. They looked curiously at Vaelin and Adranaya. Their leader was a man with burn marks on his right arm, all the way up the side of his face. He was startlingly young, but had a deep voice. He was clearly exhausted, and spoke slowly enough that Vaelin found she was able to piece together what he was saying.
"They attacked just before dawn," he said. "From the one direction we weren't really watching. That approach was supposed to be impossible. At least, that was what I was always told. They must have crossed the Falpassoa in strength and killed the scouts before they could get here and warn us. Which means they had to know where the scouts were and how they were hidden."
Siaba nodded, looking tired. "They had informants. How many men are left in the city?"
The burned man shook his head. "No way to know for sure. We were all scattered. They've been hunting us through the jungle. They've learned our tricks, and they're better armed and better fed. I left Rilao with two dozen men, and this is all that's left."
"Did you get a good look at their positions? How many of them are there, total, do you think?"
"I saw a few ---" 
The man's words suddenly cut off, his face registering surprise and confusion. He looked down. Vaelin followed his gaze. There was a javelin protruding from his chest.
Siaba cursed and whirled around, drawing his weapon. More javelins hurtled through the foliage. Vaelin just managed to side-step one of them, more by luck than by skill, and it passed within inches of her head. She heard it go by, making a faint whirring sound.
Then the glade was full of Ventacan soldiers, and everywhere was a whirling, grunting mass of fighting men and women. The Ventacans were regular troops, not teluri, but they outnumbered the Cantarians, and they had surprise on their side. Several of the Cantarians went down in the first few seconds.
The coro gathered close together, back to back. A group of Ventacans attacked them, but they repulsed the attacks easily, flowing as a single unit. The troops were no match for their Madrium-trained reflexes. But, Vaelin realized as she easily ducked a sword stroke, there was more to it than that. She felt fast --- almost too fast, as though she weren't even conscious of her decisions to move. She realized with a start that she was perceiving everything through six eyes, processing with three minds, sharing every moment of the experience with the coro. 
During a pause in the fighting, Vaelin reached out with her will to gather back the aestus she had used up. There wasn't much of a meridian nearby, but still, the power came fast, much faster than it ever had before. Her reserve was full again in a fraction of the normal time. She realized with a thrill that they must be channeling something like nine times the aestus that any one of them could have normally commanded, so they they were that much faster, that much more perceptive. 
Vaelin dodged a powerful overhand blow and tripped the attacker directly into Gadarien's knife, then cut down the next man herself with her flectarus, spraying the leaves nearby with a fine mist of blood. Adranaya sent another soldier staggering Vaelin's way, and her backstroke slashed upward through his groin. No movement was wasted; their every step was a model of efficiency and grace. They were three fingers of an invisible fist.
They picked off the Ventacans, one by one. Finally, only one soldier was left, and Gadarien engaged with him. The Ventacan swung, exhaustedly, and Gadarien easily sidestepped the blow, filling the space between them like a snake. Vaelin felt his rage coursing through her mind as he jerked the Ventacan's wrist forward and slung the man over his shoulder, slamming him into the ground. Gadarien stepped over the soldier's arm and snapped it like a dry noodle, and a sharp piece of bone popped out of the broken forearm. The man screamed, but only for a moment, before Gadarien shoved the broken bone up through his jaw and into his brain. 
Vaelin stood and stared, shocked by Gadarien's savagery. She had known he carried rage inside of him, but hadn't seen it exposed this way before, naked and raw. Moreover, she felt his emotions pulsing in her own mind. She had been angry in her life, very angry, but this level of raw hatred felt alien, like a piece of broken glass. It felt terrible.
The battle was over. Siaba, Vaelin, Gadarien, and Adranaya were all alive and unharmed aside from minor wounds. Three other Cantarians still breathed, although one was mortally wounded in his abdomen. The young commander lay face down in a spreading pool of blood.
"They must have been watching, waiting for us to make a rendezvous before they attacked," said Gadarien. His voice was perfectly calm, although Vaelin could still clearly feel rage radiating from him.
Siaba nodded, exhausted, and wiped some blood off his face with both hands. "What are you going to do?" he asked.
"We can't stay here," said Vaelin.
"We should make for the trailhead, immediately," said Gadarien.
Siaba nodded again. "If you follow the line of trees along that ridge, you'll come to a small pond. Head straight west from there and the trailhead to the mountains will be half a day's walk. I would accompany you there, but," he waved to the carnage around them, "things have changed."
"We understand," said Vaelin. She reached her hand out to him, a gesture that Cantarian men made with each other, but which was never done with women. Siaba stared at her hand for a moment, then grinned fiercely and clasped it.
"I saw how you three fought. Thank the Singers you're on our side," he said, and Vaelin wondered suddenly whether that was true, her sense of unease growing stronger. Which side were they really on? Was she fighting for the Cantarians? Or was she on another side entirely, one of her own making?

They marched through the crowded jungle lowlands, swatting at the flies which swarmed around them, attracted to the scent of blood. Vaelin felt sticky and unclean, and when they came to a roaring stream, she insisted that they stop to bathe and clean their clothes. The flies bothered them less after that, although marching in wet clothes wasn't ideal. Vaelin was more troubled by the thought of the men and women she had just killed with her own hands. Did they have families? Lovers? Parents who would weep when they heard the news? None of this had occurred to her during the battle itself, but now she couldn't get the thought out of her mind.
"Gada," she said, softly. "How many people have you killed?"
He marched on, as though he hadn't heard her. Then he spoke, equally softly. "Seventeen."
"Does it get easier?"
He paused again for a long time before speaking, then looked her straight in the eyes. "Yes."
They reached the trailhead just as the sun was starting to set. There were no patrols, no one anywhere in sight. They gathered wood for a fire and set about preparing dinner, each aware, in the back of their minds, of what the other two were doing. They couldn't read each others' thoughts, exactly; it was more like having two extra sets of limbs. The feeling was very strange, and Vaelin still had not gotten used to it. It was like having a wad of cloth stuffed into her clothing, constantly reminding her of its presence. Or like something stuck in her teeth. It didn't hurt, but it wasn't entirely comfortable, either.
Gadarien and Adranaya busied themselves with the fire while Vaelin set up the map. She created a frame with their three walking staves, and draped a blanket over it to create a makeshift dark room, just big enough for her to fit inside. Then she took out a lantern that she had prepared in Tenoava, with a pinprick hole in the covering, and spread out a sheet of paper on the ground, making it as flat as she could. She lit the lantern and clambered inside, pulling the blankets shut around her.
The map, as always, started out showing all of Telua, or at least all of it that had been known to the original maker, whoever that had been. Vaelin was fairly certain that her mother, no matter how skilled she was, had not created the map. It was an artifact of another age. The fact of its existence was impressive, but the real magic of the map was in how it responded to the will and thoughts of the user.
Vaelin concentrated, thinking about the flow of water across the landscape, picturing the Falpassoa in her mind. The light changed on the paper below, and all the rivers and streams of Telua appeared, emphasized. Light pulsed along them, showing the speed, depth, and direction of flow. She concentrated on the part of the map that she currently occupied, and the scene zoomed in, the syrillium flowing into shape. After several minutes of searching, she found the ford she was looking for. It was a few miles upstream, near what looked like a rock outcropping. 
She stopped thinking about water and, instead, started thinking about aestus, and the map changed to match. There was a route that allowed them to follow meridians all the way to the ford, which would be useful in case they ran into trouble. Satisfied, she doused the lantern and came back out.
Gadarien and Adranaya were sitting on the same side of the fire, talking in low tones. They stopped as soon as they saw her.
"Hey," Vaelin said. "I found our route."
"Great," Gadarien said. His joviality sounded a bit forced.
"What were you guys talking about?"
Adranaya looked away, and Gadarien paused for a moment before speaking. "Nothing. Just chatting."
Vaelin felt some strange emotion pulling at her, but she couldn't tell what it was. Something felt amiss. But she was very tired --- using the map always seemed to have that effect on her --- and didn't feel like pushing the issue. Not tonight, anyway.
"Okay. Well, I'm going to bed."
Gadarien smiled and nodded, and Vaelin wandered off to her bedroll, listening to the soft nighttime sounds of the forest behind her, and the murmuring of her friends conversing around the fire.

The ford was a bit deeper than Vaelin had hoped; it looked at least chest-deep at the midpoint, and the current was swift. They would have to swim part of the way. She was glad the Cantarians had given her some oilcloth to keep her things dry in the frequent rains. 
They came to the shore of the river and took off most of their clothes, bundling them up into packages that they would hold overhead.
"After you," Gadarien said, with a sweeping hand gesture. 
Vaelin grimaced and stepped into the water, which was quite cold. The mud near the bank squelched between her toes, becoming gravel as she moved further into the stream. The current tugged insistently at her lower legs. 
In a single step, the river suddenly got deeper and swifter, rising up to her torso. She let out a yelp and breathed in and out quickly, then turned and grinned sheepishly back at Adranaya, who had begun crossing behind her. That was when the branch hit her.
It was a big, heavy oak branch, which had remained submerged just below the water's surface until it was too late. It crashed into Vaelin's ribs, tearing at her skin and knocking the wind out of her at the same time. She immediately went down and got a lungful of river water, then flailed around, giving up any attempt to keep her pack out of the water and instead just worrying about holding onto it altogether.
She felt herself being shoved downstream by the current and started to panic, but then a strong hand was grabbing her wrist and hauling her upright. Moments later, they fetched up on the far shore. Vaelin shoved her waterlogged hair out of her face and looked up at Adranaya.
"Now we're even," Adranaya said.
"What?" Vaelin gasped.
"The cave. You saved me when I was stuck in the tunnel."
"Oh. Sure."
Vaelin gasped as the pain hit her. She looked down and saw blood streaming out of the gash along her ribs. It was shallow, but wide. And extremely painful.
Gadarien came splashing up. He hissed between his teeth when he saw the wound. "We're going to have to patch that up."
"Yeah, got nailed by that tree branch."  Blood was rolling down her leg and into the river water. Gadarien sat down next to her and examined the wound.
"I can Heal you," Adranaya said, suddenly. "I know how it's done. And with the coro, I can feel where to place the aculae. The power will make up for my lack of skill."
Vaelin looked at her doubtfully. "Are you sure? If it goes wrong, it could make me worse."
"I'm sure."
Vaelin chewed her lip, then nodded, and Gadarien moved aside. Adranaya knelt and took out her aculae. She pricked her tongue --- a technique she had learned from Vaelin --- and filled an aculus with her own blood. She felt along Vaelin's breastbone for a few moments, and then carefully placed the aculus though Vaelin's skin. The bleeding immediately waned, then stopped entirely, the throbbing pain partially subsiding along with it.
"Wow," said Vaelin.
Adranaya smiled thinly, then continued, placing a total of seven aculae in various spots around the wound. By the time she was done, the wound barely hurt at all.
"It will still take a day or so to fully heal. We still need to bandage it up."
She moved aside and let Gadarien do the bandaging. "That could have been a lot worse. The branch could have impaled you. You're going to have to be more careful," he admonished. "We're going into wild country."
"Careful?" Vaelin laughed. "We're marching to the Apogee, where we're going to try a spell that hasn't been cast for centuries, which could very well kill us all in a an instant. And you want me to be careful?"
"Well, even if it's suicide, we still want the mission to succeed, right?" 
Vaelin really didn't have an answer for that.

The forest gave way gradually into lowland plains, which were covered with tall, blueish grass all the way to the horizon. In places, the grass reached all the way up to Vaelin's waist, tickling her arms with its soft tufts. The trail was often difficult to discern, but the map kept them heading the right direction, even if they had to stop frequently to consult it. The sky overhead looked like an inverted ocean, waves of clouds rolling by in long, oppressive rows. 
They met no one on the plains. It was clear that the trail had not been traveled in quite some time. In a number of spots, Vaelin had to slice a path through the foliage with her flectarus. They frequently heard rustling in the grasses nearby, and saw the tops of the stems wave, but they never came across any animals in the grass. Just once, they saw a fox disappearing into the underbrush, its silvery tail blending in with the surroundings. 
The plains eventually transformed into stony hills, similar to the ones leading into the Maldaran pass. The lonely sound of hawks echoed off the impassive stone faces. Their tiny silhouettes were visible high up, black against the ever-grey sky. In the distance, a jagged range of mountains stood out starkly.
Several more days passed before they saw an odd stone structure on top of a barren hill. It was visible from several miles away, and it was along their path, so they headed toward it and hiked up the hill.
Two concentric rings of black stones, about twice Vaelin's height, stood at the top. Each of the stones was a perfect equilateral triangle, and they were arranged at precise intervals around the crest. Two of them were different from the rest, taller, with head-sized holes drilled through the center. They were not aligned with each other. Vaelin looked through the hole of the outer one but didn't see anything of note, just the mountain range off in the distance.
They camped inside the ring that night. It wasn't until the next morning, when the eastern sun lit up the mountains and its rays pierced both of the stone holes, that Vaelin realized the holes in the stone had become aligned. Somehow, the entire inner ring of the hill had rotated in the night without them noticing. There was no seam in the earth to indicate that the stones had moved, but they had. She looked through the two holes and saw that they were pointed at a single tall peak, far in the distance. It could only be the Apogee. She consulted the map excitedly and confirmed it --- their destination was within sight.
The rest of their journey to the mountains seemed to pass more quickly now that their goal was in view and getting bigger every day. Vaelin felt a building anxiety, but it was hard to tell it apart from exhilaration. Her body was abuzz with energy, from her fingertips to the center of her belly. The wound on her ribs had healed completely, with no scar.
When it was time to sleep at night, however, things were different. The thought of giving up often crossed her mind. She knew how dangerous it would be. Everything she had read in her research had made that clear --- the amount of aestus they were going to channel could easily be the death of them. If she wanted to, she could just walk away and leave the war behind her. But then she thought about her mother, and the manner of her death. And Mahishat, and Aabsaan, and the rough cruelty of her entire life. The arbitrary destruction of the Sky Fingers. All the suffering, all the waste --- and every bit of it the fault of the powerful in Thelenza and their terrible wall, tearing the wind apart and sending shards of it spinning toward the poor.
And, even more than all of that, Adranaya. When she looked at Adranaya by the firelight, she saw a girl replaced, a happy girl swapped out for a sad shell of a woman. And Vaelin's rage returned to her like an avalanche, and the Apogee couldn't arrive soon enough.
When they reached the foothills of the mountains, Gadarien spotted a thin line of smoke rising from the south. It wasn't far out of their way and, in any case, the days had grown sharply colder, and the thought of real shelter, even if only for a night, was too tempting to pass up.
They crested a hill, and the source of the smoke was revealed. It was not actually smoke, but steam rising from a volcanic hot spring. Close up, they could smell the sulfur in the air. Next to the spring was a low stone cottage, with a thatched roof and an empty livestock pen beside it. Beside the livestock pen was a rudimentary wagon, but no horse or oxen to pull it. There was no sign of the occupants of the cottage.
They descended the hill. "Hello?" Vaelin called. No one responded. 
Gadarien tried the door and it opened easily. But then he stepped back hurriedly, gagging and waving his hands in front of his face. A moment later, the stench rolled out over Vaelin, and it was like being slapped in the face with a rancid animal carcass. It was a greasy, sickeningly sweet smell, and it immediately permeated her clothes and hair. It was the stench of rot.
They backed off and let the place air out for a bit. None of them were eager to go inside. They went around the back of the cottage and investigated the hot springs instead. There were several pools, of slightly varying temperature, all of them giving off a sulfurous smell that came as a relief after the olfactory blast from the cabin. The water in one of the pools was the perfect temperature for a hot bath, so they all stripped off their clothes and got in.
The hot water percolated through Vaelin's tired muscles, and she sighed in relief. "I don't know what's in that cabin, and I don't want to know. But right now, this feels like heaven," she said. Gadarien grunted in response, dunking his head beneath the water.
Even Adranaya smiled.
They stayed in the water until their hands were wrinkled, leaning back and soaking, saying little, pretending the cabin didn't exist. Vaelin stared at the darkening sky, and at the silhouette of the mountains looming above her. The moon had not yet risen. The mountains were so black that they appeared more as a yawning gap than a solid presence, as though the rest of the sky was a piece of speckled paper and someone had torn a strip off at the bottom, exposing the void beneath. 
She felt an emptiness inside her, as black and deep as the darkness above. But within that darkness was a flicker of light, a speck of hope, floating like the candle at the center of the Foucanta. She reached for the light, and realized what it was. It was the presence of her friends. No matter how dark the world around her got, she was not alone. She felt a swell of warmth deep in her core and she clung to the thought: she was not alone. She was not alone. She looked around and saw the others looking at her. They all felt it. It was a rare moment of peace, and no one would ever be able to take it away.
Eventually, Adranaya spoke up. "We can't postpone this any longer." She rose from the pool and dried herself off. Vaelin and Gadarien followed, reluctantly.
They stood in front of the open doorway for a while, gathering their courage.
"Are you ready?" Gadarien asked. Vaelin nodded, pulled her sleeve over her face, and led the way inside, lantern held high.
The cabin was roughly made, but it did have a wooden floor and walls, the cracks between packed with mortar to stave off the wind. A large rack of antlers hanging on one wall was the only adornment. Several strings of painted wooden prayer beads hung from the antlers, motionless. In the corner, a stone fireplace rose up through the roof, its hearth blackened from use. A rack of cut firewood stood next to it. On the wall by the door hung heavy, mud-stained fur clothing.
And all across the walls, floor, and ceiling, gore was splattered. A piece of skin had somehow ended up hanging from one of the wall-mounted antlers, next to the prayer beads. In the middle of the floor, piled up together like discarded towels, were the bodies, or what was left of them. They were really just sacks of bones, pale and bloodless. Vaelin could see ragged holes here and there where the gatherers had sucked the soft parts of the bodies out, leaving only skin and firmer tissues behind. The bodies were lightly dressed --- the gatherers must have burst into the house completely unexpectedly. The stench inside had dissipated somewhat, but, this close up, it was still cloying and thick in the air. Vaelin retched and had to step back outside. 
The cold wind scoured her face as she blinked back tears. It was difficult to tell the age or gender of the bodies now, but it was clear that several of them were children. A whole family. Vaelin didn't even feel rage, just a deep sadness. This was how the world worked. This family had done nothing wrong, bothered no one, and yet they had been wiped away like a speck of mud off someone's boot. There was no sense to it.
They buried the bodies in the empty livestock pen, using tools that they found in a small shed outside. Afterward, they stood around the grave, and Gadarien sang a brief Cantarian dirge. There was no way to know what faith, if any, these people had practiced, as there were no writings in the cabin, but it was a safe bet that they weren't Cantarian.
"The Grandchildren don't usually do things like this," said Adranaya. 
"What do you mean? What else could it have been?" said Gadarien.
She shook her head. "It was Grandchildren, no doubt about that. What I'm saying is that, as far as I know, the Grandchildren always stay up in mountains. That's why these people weren't expecting them --- normally, they're not a problem at this elevation. Something must have stirred them up, driven them down here."
"Or called them," Gadarien said. Vaelin looked up at the mountains, searching for movement, but saw nothing.

Siaba awoke gasping, as he had every morning since the march back to Tenoava began. He waited for the fluttering in his diaphragm to subside, bile stinging the back of his throat. Even in the pre-dawn gloom, his eyes felt raw and scorched. His whole body craved real sleep, but all he could manage lately was a light doze.
The army sprawled across the fields adjacent to the Sagradhao, rows and rows of cheap hemp tents and simple bedrolls beneath the open sky. Siaba squinted at the scene as he stirred the ashes of his camp fire, searching for enough residual warmth to heat up his tcha. Dew still covered every surface, including the faces and beards of the sleeping men nearby. To the east, the horizon was already fading into a pearly salmon color. Pretty, if you were into that kind of thing. Siaba had been, once.
His stomach was, as usual these days, not performing well, so he skipped breakfast and headed straight to the depot. He had heard from one of his men that a new shipment of arms had come in from somewhere. He wanted to have a look at these mysterious weapons himself, maybe secure some of the better pieces for the men he knew would be most effective with them. Not that he expected it to make much of a difference, ultimately. But some part of him still had to try, if only so that he could tell himself that he had.
Siaba was didn't have the heart to pass his insomnia on to any of the sleeping men. Soon enough, though, he found a balding sergeant with a sizable belly who was awake --- most likely still awake from the night before, given his glazed expression and the stench of drink wafting off him.
"Morning, sergeant," he said.
The sergeant grunted in response, not bothering to salute. Siaba had no energy to pick a fight, so he let it slide. Discipline was wasted on the doomed. "I've heard there are some new weapons here."
"Yeah? Where did you hear that?"
"I have my sources. I'd like to inspect them."
The sergeant grunted again and held out his hand, palm up. Siaba stared at it.
"Six hoppers, and I'll show you," the sergeant said.
Siaba was appalled at the man's brazenness, but hardly surprised. Siaba's money, what little of it he had, would be of little use to him in the near future in any case. He fished the coins out of his purse and counted them out into the sergeant's sweaty palm.
The shipment was a row of stacked wooden crates with no identifying marks whatsoever, which was odd in itself. The sergeant cracked open the top of a crate. Inside were rows of gleaming swords, single-edged and two-handed, in the western style. Steel, not just iron. 
He picked up a sword and held it to the light. Lightweight, clean-edged, and sharp. He pinged the blade with his fingernail and listened to it ring. The sergeant stared at him with a mixture of boredom and open hostility.
Vharian steel, beyond a doubt, far beyond what the Cantarian army should have been able to afford. Other boxes revealed similarly Vharian-looking weaponry and armor. Siaba had seen enough of such weapons to recognize them from any distance. Scars tend to leave an impression.
He left the grumbling sergeant to his "work" and wandered back to his own tent. The sun had risen, and it was already getting hot. He scratched at his uncomfortably long neck hair, for which he had Gavasie to thank.
Where had those Vharian come from? Had Gavasie made some kind of secret deal with Vhar? If so, what did the Vharians expect in return? The one thing everyone agreed upon about Vharians was that they drove a hard bargain, and in deals like this, the desperate party inevitably came out with the burnt end of the sausage, to borrow a Ventacan phrase.
A throat-bearded messenger was awaiting him at his tent. "Captain Siaba. The Ouvintero requires your presence." 
Siaba nodded glumly and followed the beard to Gavasie's tent, which was, if anything, less opulent than most. The only nod to the fact that it was the commander's tent was a tall bell pole above it and the presence of two burly guards with even larger beards than the messenger. Their torsos were completely obscured. It looked like some large animals were sleeping on their chests, perhaps making a nest. Siaba allowed himself a small chuckle, and was almost gratified to see the scowls deepen on the guards' clean-shaven faces.
"Ah, Captain, please come in," said Gavasie. Siaba stooped and entered. The space was dimly lit, and Gavasie sat cross-legged in the center, a small writing desk on the floor in front of him. The tent smelled musty, like an old cup of tcha. Siaba wasn't sure if he should sit or continue to stoop near the entrance.
"Please, sit," said Gavasie, after allowing a few awkward moments to pass. Siaba knelt instead, his bad him popping as he lowered himself. "So, Captain. How are your men situated? What is the morale like? My generals give me reports on such things, but I wanted an unvarnished opinion, and I know I can trust you to give me that."
"The morale is high," said Siaba. Too high, he thought. The men were lining up to die under Gavasie's banner, and none of them truly understood what they were facing. But Siaba knew better than to say this. "They are eager for a fight; they don't like being cooped up here in camp."
"Of course. Young men never enjoy stillness. However, we were forced to wait for a shipment from abroad. I'm told you had a look at it already. What did you think?"
Siaba cursed inwardly. The fat sergeant had sold him out. He would have to have a few words with the man after this meeting was over. But there was no sense in being dishonest now. "They looked distinctly Vharian to me, Your Melodiance."
Gavasie smiled. "Yes, indeed. We have discovered some new friends over the mountains. They've agreed to help us in our dispute with the Nasura, as long as they don't have to be directly involved. They have a treaty with the Nasura, you understand. These things are delicate --- they can't act openly. But that doesn't mean they can't sell some weapons to their new friends in Cantaria, eh?"
Siaba frowned. "Sell? How are we going to pay for them, sir?"
"They have been very generous in their terms, allowing for future payment in exchange for our current sacrifice. A good trade, is it not? If we succeed, we can worry then about paying back the loan, and if we fail, well, we won't be around to care about it." Gavasie sounded like either option would be fine with him.
Siaba wanted to say that the last time Cantaria had trusted Vhar, the Vharians had fled at their hour of need, leaving Cantaria to fight alone. And, ultimately, to be crushed by Ivaelia, alone. To this day, Cantaria remained under the heel of the Nasura, all thanks to the fickleness of Vhar. The idea of trusting them again after such a colossal betrayal seemed like the height of foolishness. But Siaba held his tongue. Giving history lessons to the Ouvintero was definitely beyond his pay grade.
"Your Melodiance, I have some concerns about our plan," Siaba began instead. "The men are not adequately trained. Most of them have only their faith to guide them in battle. Faith is important, but it doesn't stand up to a well-thrown javelin."
Gavasie broke into a broad grin, then laughed and slapped his knee. "The words of a soldier, rough and ready! Yes! That is why I called you in here. So, our men are not adequately prepared? What further preparation would you have us undertake, Captain?"
"Well, intermediate combat training would be a start. They know the bare basics, but that's not enough. During the day, they should be training, not singing prayer. I asked one of my men what he would do if arrows began to rain down around him. What shield posture. What formation. What command to wait for."
"And?" said the Ouvintero.
Siaba sighed. "He told me the Singers would provide."
"Ah, but here's the thing, Captain. He is right. The Singers will provide." Gavasie's eyes burned now with religious zeal. "They will provide, even unto death, as it says in scripture. We who serve them need merely be open to their will, and the reality behind this shallow dream will be unveiled. As it was sung, so shall it ring out." When Siaba had no response for this, the Ouvintero continued. "In any event, we don't have time to prepare any further. The battle is upon us, and we have to advance, or meet our doom here, along with all that we love. Wouldn't you rather take your chances in the field than wait here, like a dog in a burning house?"
Captain Siaba looked down at his hands. Strong hands, if a bit too slender. Callused, scarred, one finger bent crooked from a hammer strike, another missing a nail from some incident he no longer even remembered. They had held many weapons, these hands. They had slashed and cut their way through training and battle, and had never failed him. But now they felt as dead and useless as unfired clay, hanging from Siaba's arms. 
The Ouvintero was right. They had no time.
"You have to understand, Captain," Gavasie said, his voice once again low and confidential. "We have no other choice. The Fineia is about to begin. We, who are its holy chorus, must sing."

The last few miles across the foothills were the hardest so far, more due to the difficulty of following meridians than to the hills themselves. After seeing what had happened to the denizens of the cabin, none of them wanted to take any chances by being caught far away from a power source. The trail had petered out long before, so they were relying entirely on the map. Vaelin began to worry about making it in time, but when she voiced her concern, Gadarien just shrugged.
"What else can we do? We don't have wings."
They hurried along, pushing themselves over hill after hill, legs and feet aching. Finally, they reached the base of the mountains, where the last of the hills gave way to a single steep slope. They came around the last bend, and the valley they were traversing ended abruptly in a wall of dirty white ice. Behind the wall, the ice continued to rise up the valley, winding around out of view. To the left, the top partially obscured by clouds, was the Apogee.
The Apogee looked like a mountain sheered in half, the front face of it descending at almost a right angle to the valley floor. Two beards of ice hung down the face on either side of the peak, waterfalls frozen in mid-air. The glacier valley curved around and behind the peak, and it was straight up this slope that they would have to ascend, across the treacherous field of crevasses.
It was nearly dark when they arrived at the foot of the glacier, so they made camp there. Firewood was becoming scarce, and there would of course be none at all on the glacier itself, but they were hoping to get up the wall --- which was steep, but climbable, especially while tapping into a meridian --- and far enough across the glacier that they could reach the rocky scree just below the peak in one day. Despite their grueling pace, they had spent longer in the foothills than they had planned for, and now the moment when the Cantarian army would bait the Ventacans into attacking was only a day away. They had little choice but to press on and hope that they made it in time.
Dawn came, and they began their ascent. The ice was slippery in some places, firm in others, with chunks of sharp black rock sticking out at random. They thought they might have to hack into the wall with their daggers as improvised ice axes, which Vaelin was not looking forward to, but it turned out that they didn't need them. Halfway up the climb, Vaelin paused to look back down the valley, and her breath caught at the sight. The whole of Telua, it seemed, was spread out before her. Lakes and rivers shone golden and intricate, like the lines of syrillium in the walls of the Madrium. In the distance, she could see the Falpassoa worming across the landscape like a snail's track. She could just make out a thin line of smoke on the north side of river, and realized with some surprise that it was Rilao, still smoldering. She thought of Taoso, of his family, perhaps all dead now, and tears came unbidden to her eyes.
She was snapped out of her reverie by a strange sound coming from the cliffs on her left, a sort of high whistling or fluting call. She looked, but, with all the echoes, it was hard to tell the exact direction. Another call came from the opposite side of the valley, and she saw motion in one of the black cave entrances that dotted the cliff face.
"We've got to move," shouted Gadarien.
"I know."
They scrambled the rest of the way up the slope. Vaelin had one terrifying moment where she slipped on ice and just managed to catch herself by grabbing an outcrop of rock. If she hadn't been near a meridian, she would have fallen to her death. Her heart was pounding in her ears as she pulled herself up the final stretch. Gadarien was looking at the cliff face, shading his eyes.
"Well, that was exciting," she said. Adranaya came over the top as well, and the three of them surveyed the cliffs together, but saw no further motion.
"Do you think it was gatherers?" Vaelin asked.
"Probably. I'm not sure what we can do about it, though," said Gadarien.
"They hate daylight. If we can make it past this section and up the hill while it's still light outside, maybe they won't attack us," said Adranaya.
Vaelin frowned. "And what happens when the sun goes down?"
Adranaya turned her stare on Vaelin. "We complete our mission."
"Right," she replied doubtfully. "Well, I don't suppose we have a choice. We definitely can't stay here."
"Let's go," Gadarien said, and they set off at a brisk pace along the ice. There were deep crevasses in every direction, but the map had shown them a way that avoided the worst of them. Still, their pace was hampered, each step having the potential to plummet them into a deep ravine. Some of the crevasses were hidden by a layer of snow, so they had to test their steps carefully, feeling out the ground in front of them with their staves. And the whole time, they kept catching glimpses of movement in the shadows --- never anything direct, but flickering light and dark shapes on the edges of their heightened vision. It could have been birds or some other small creatures. But it wasn't, and they knew it.
They hiked up the icy slope for the best part of the day. The wind on the glacier was fierce, and threatened their balance as much as the slippery footing did. The air moving through the rocks and trees created weird howling noises that came and went like waves. Or was it the wind? It was impossible to tell. The ice stretching on before them flattened perception, making the whole world seem stretched out and distorted. Vaelin had to keep glancing at the slopes on either side, just to keep her balance and remember where the horizon really was.
What had appeared to be a gravelly scree on the opposite side of the glacier resolved, as they got closer, into a jumble of boulders. It had been hard to tell the size of the rocks from far away, but up close, most of them were head-sized, with a few huge bulks of rock in between. Vaelin was relieved that it wasn't a fine gravel. It looked like the boulders would be a bit of a difficult climb, but at least they wouldn't be sliding down the slope constantly. She was tired of having an unreliable surface beneath her feet. They were all looking forward to being off the ice, especially with the sky beginning to darken.
They almost made it before the attack came.

# Chapter 14 #

From above, the Cantarian army looked huge, big enough to overwhelm any foe. The campfires were spread out across the valley, flickering through the trees. They weren't highly organized, like the Ventacan army, but there were many of them, and the voices of the men had a haunting beauty as their pre-battle prayersong rose into the air. They sounded young and strong and confident. It would have been enough to fool someone who didn't know the truth.
Captain Siaba turned from his vantage point on the ridge and looked behind him where, on the other side, the Ventacan army lay spread out. It stretched across the plain in orderly rows, with a proper defensive perimeter. It was substantially smaller than the Cantarian army, but he knew that wouldn't matter. 
There would be little sleep for him tonight. Tomorrow, at dawn, the Cantarian army would march forth onto the plain, like a hand thrust into a jaguar's mouth. The Ventacan army would destroy them. He could feel it in his bones. And there wasn't a damn thing he could do about it.
He headed back down the ridge, gliding quietly past the sentries without bothering to upbraid them for not seeing him. It didn't really matter, not anymore. He picked a campfire at random and sat down amongst the men, gratefully taking a cup of jasafruit liquor. The taste was pungent and overly sweet, but he drained his cup anyway.
"Are you ready for the battle, Captain?" said one of the men. He was a scrawny lad, no more than sixteen, with a wispy attempt at a beard and large, luminous eyes. He was clearly nervous, but trying to cover it up with false bravado, pitching his voice deeper than it really was. As a well-known hero, Siaba was used to this kind of interaction, but the worship he saw in the eyes of these boys still made him uncomfortable.
"As ready as I'm going to be. Although right now, I wish there were some women with us, like the Ventacans have," Siaba said, garnering a chuckle from the men. He waited for the chatter to die down and said, "Son, what do you think is going to happen tomorrow?"
The boy looked surprised. "We'll march out onto the battlefield. They'll throw some javelins at us, and we'll throw them back, then we'll charge each other. And the Singers will grant us a victory worth singing about. What else could happen?"
Siaba stared at the boy for a few moments, then smiled. "Of course." Then, feeling that some type of advise was expected, he added, "Keep your shield high, even when it looks like the arrows or javelins are far away. The ones coming straight for you will look like little black lines in the sky. They get there faster than you think they will." He patted the young man on his thin shoulder, handed back the cup, and walked off into the sleepless night.

The Grandchildren swarmed up out of the crevasses like ants, scuttling across the ice on knife-like claws. The glacier went from dirty white to boiling black in a few moments. The three humans didn't even have time to shout --- they were sprinting immediately, heading for the high ground of the boulders, leaping over smaller crevasses with no time to test out their footing first. Vaelin could feel the sharp tang of fear within the vague emotional currents between the three of them. 
They reached the first of the boulders and began climbing. The waves of kriancha were gaining on them rapidly. No one knew the limits of kriancha endurance or strength, but they were sure to outlast three tired people.
One of the kriancha gained a boulder nearby and leapt at them. Vaelin cut it down with her flectarus, then batted aside a second, which Adranaya dispatched with her knives. Oily blue-black blood dripped onto the rocks.
"War chord!" Gadarien shouted. "It's our only chance!" He grunted as he kicked a creature in the head, cracking its thin skull.
"But we're not trained in that!" Vaelin managed to shout back.
"I am. We just have to concentrate. The coro will bind us," Gadarien said. Vaelin glanced at him, then at Adranaya.
"Start singing," she said, and leapt down to the next boulder.Whirling and kicking, she sliced the monsters' limbs from their bodies, giving Gadarien time to feel out the environment and devise the chord. He stood with his eyes closed, trying to ignore the battle and tap into the aestus. Adranaya defended him, her knives a blur of motion. Then Gadarien opened his eyes and began singing, a single low note.
"Adra, you have to close your eyes and find the next note," Vaelin gasped between attacks. "I'll protect you!"
Adranaya killed a Gatherer, the last of the nearest group, and looked doubtfully at Vaelin.
"Trust me," Vaelin said. Adranaya stared for another second, then closed her eyes. Vaelin could hear the note in her head, the one Adranaya needed to sing. Adranaya stood for a heartbeat, hands outstretched, then began singing the eerie harmony.
Another wave of gatherers was scrabbling up the boulders. Vaelin leapt down, cutting down two of them with a single stroke. Her veins were glowing visibly even in the daylight, and the whites of her eyes were radiant. The rest of the gatherers paused in fear, chittering and squealing. Without looking, Vaelin flipped back up onto the boulder behind her, and the gatherers took a step forward.
Vaelin glanced back and saw that Gadarien and Adranaya were staring at her, still singing. They were holding hands, each with a free arm outstretched. A Gatherer leapt at her, and her flectarus got stuck in its ribcage as she slew it. There was no time to shake it loose. She let go of her weapon and jumped up, closing her eyes in mid-air, trusting her feet and enhanced senses to guide her.
She grasped the two outstretched hands and landed hard on the boulder, flexing her knees. She was already feeling the note in her head, emanating from Gadarien's thoughts. She heard the gatherers moving, swarming toward her in their hundreds. She sang the note, and Gadarien stomped his foot down hard.
The boulder under them shook violently. Gadarien stopped singing.
"The trees!" he cried.
 They let go of each other and leapt from rock to moving rock. A Gatherer jumped up to slash at Vaelin, who was lowest on the slope, and a boulder the size of the creature's chest smashed into its head, splattering black gore down the hill. Vaelin dodged a similar stone an instant later, not even aware of the instinct to duck until after it had happened.
They reached the trees and turned to fight. The noise of the landslide was astonishing, a low reverberation that she felt through the ground, punctuated by thousands of sharp cracks and pops. Only a few gatherers made it out, and Gadarien and Adranaya easily dispatched them. Vaelin felt almost helpless without her flectarus, which was now crushed beneath tons of rock, but the Grandchildren had thin, eggshell-like skulls, which succumbed to her kicks and her knives easily enough.
The landslide gradually died down until there were only a few loose stones still bouncing down the slope. Then, finally, silence.
Vaelin slumped down heavily against the trunk of a tree, gasping for breath. Gadarien and Adranaya stood with their arms behind their heads, gulping down air. There was not much daylight left, and they had a long way to go. And at the top of the mountain, the Apogee awaited, as patient as death itself.

No matter how wretched the odds, it was still glorious to watch an army move out onto the field of battle. The Cantarian forces looked like ghosts in the early morning fog, streaming between the trees with their Vharian weapons held uncertainly in their hands. They formed up along the tree line as well as their commanders could manage, in loosely-grouped mobs of wild-bearded young men. A few junior Auratao were scattered amongst them, shouting encouragement or just lending a boost in morale through their presence. As always, the initial view of the army assembled seemed invincible. What could be more bigger, more powerful, than this many men? Surely, with all this strength, they could not fail.
That kind of thought tended to evaporate as soon as one looked across the field at the Ventacan army, which was everything the Cantarian army was not: organized, disciplined, and calm. There were only about half as many of them as the Cantarian force, but Siaba knew this was deceptive. The Ventacan front stretched out to either side of the field, ranks deep, their armor shining even in the pre-dawn gloom. It was hard to make out individual features from this distance, but Siaba was certain that he saw a large contingent of teluri in their white robes, near the back of the formation. That alone spelled certain doom, even if most of the Cantarians didn't realize it yet.
The Cantarian troops milled about singing old battle songs, shouting boasts and banging their weapons together. Siaba always marveled at just how willing young men were to fight and die. It was said that old men started wars and young men fought them, but this discounted the eagerness of those young men to line up and die together, like a pack of dogs, snarling and snapping. As scared as they were, as young as they were, they had pumped themselves up until they were desperate for a fight. They had seen too little of life to realize how much they were giving up.
Orders filtered down through the ranks and the officers formed their men up into a semblance of columns. Beleaguered sergeants browbeat the stragglers into their correct places.
The sun rose, and the Cantarians marched.
The Ventacans didn't move, at first. They waited until the Cantarians were halfway across the field before unleashing a barrage of missiles, arrows first, then javelins as the Cantarians got closer. The young men died by the hundreds, but the rest kept marching on, resisting the urge to run either forward or back to the safety of the trees, and Siaba felt a swell of pride. No one could say they were cowards. That much, at least, they would keep.
Their discipline held together until the front ranks of Ventacan troops started marching forward. The Cantarians, unable to hold back their bloodlust any longer, and angered by the arrows and javelins, surged forward at a run, screaming, weapons raised. The Ventacans met them with steel discipline, shields locked together, and the first wave of Cantarians broke against them. 
Siaba's men, some of the few who exhibited discipline, waited for the order to charge. "Steady," he called out. The men were frustrated, eager to join their brothers, but his calm leadership held them back. A few of the younger men looked frustrated, perhaps thought that they were being cowardly, but the older men had served with Siaba before, and their faith in him was enough to keep the unit together.
The other Cantarians fought with fury, hurling themselves into the thresher. Many died fruitlessly, but some managed to power through the Ventacan lines and get behind them, and then the real fighting started. Each Ventacan was more disciplined, better trained, and better armed, but they were outnumbered two to one, and the Cantarians, encouraged by a few visible successes, swarmed forward, bunching up in the middle of the field. They drove forward into the Ventacan line, which buckled and started to spread outward in both directions. Siaba saw this and shouted to the commanders to keep them spread out, keep them separated, but it was far too late, and they weren't listening in any case.
A solid line of Ventacan shields opened, revealing what was behind them: several rows of teluri, their pure white robes fluttering like the sails of a hundred ships at harbor. As one, they raised their flectari, a field of white flowers all blooming at once. The front row of teluri curled their flectari inward slightly and turned to face the sun, and suddenly there was a blinding white light in the midst of the Ventacan lines. A pile of brush and sticks, which Siaba had not noticed until this moment, burst into flames as the beams all focused on a single point at its base. The Cantarian commanders began calling for archers.
"Javelins! Javelins to the front!" Siaba shouted. "Not arrows!" But no one was listening to him.
The blinding light ceased, but now there was a crackling blaze in the middle of the Ventacan army.  The teluri had begun to move in strange dance, like the legs of a caterpillar. Air rushed into the pile, and the blaze quickly became a towering inferno. 
Siaba glanced up and noticed a single figure, all in black, standing atop a ridge overlooking the Ventacan army. The Umbrata. The figure raised its arms, and the teluri spread out to form a circle around the blaze. Her arms swept out, and the flectari rose, shimmering in the heat. Then she began moving her hands, sweeping them around and around in a circular pattern, and the motions of the teluri followed, as though a thousand strands of thread connected the Umbrata's fingers with the teluri below. 
Their flectari moved back and forth in long waves, like blades of tall grass in an unseen wind. The blaze began to billow, then became gradually taller and narrower, the flames spinning around a central axis. What had been an orange flame grew brighter and hotter, a white glow that faded to a haze of pure, invisible heat at its base. And then, suddenly, the blaze shot upward, blasting into the sky as all of the fuel within the pile combusted at once. The twisting flame towered over the city walls. An Infernal Vortex walked the battlefield.
The Cantarians sent a flight of arrows toward the teluri. The figure atop the ridge simply flicked her hand, like swatting away a gnat, and the arrows were consumed in a gust of fiery wind.
"The Umbrata. We have to get to the top of that ridge!" Siaba shouted to his men. He scanned the periphery of the battlefield. To the left, there was clearing in the trees, perhaps an old landslide, that looked like it might lead out of the valley and to the top. Siaba gestured, and he and his men shouldered their weapons and began to run toward the clearing. 
But when they rounded the trees, they saw that the clearing was not empty. The Ventacans had left a rearguard. The rearguard saw Siaba's men and dropped into formation, shields interlocked. They would have to fight their way through. Even if they succeeded, there was no way they could get to the Umbrata in time. Siaba stopped running and stared at the battlefield in dismay. 
"Captain," one of his men said. "What do we do now?" Siaba just shook his head.  At the other end of the clearing, the Ventacans were taunting them. One of them raised her armored skirt, exposing her genitals. Siaba's men averted their eyes, and the Ventacans laughed even harder.
In the valley below, the teluri on the near side of the Vortex moved gracefully out of the way, still waving their flectari like synchronized butterfly wings. The Vortex began to move out toward the bunched-up mass of Cantarians, who had not noticed that, in the course of retreating, the Ventacan soldiers had surrounded them and now formed a tight perimeter around the field, shields once again interlocked. There was nowhere to run.
The Vortex moved forward, and the Cantarians, trapped within a circle of steel, began to burn.

It took them most of the night to navigate the steep slope to the top of the mountain. They were exhausted, but they had no time left to rest. At first, their path took them through pine forest, where the ground was slippery with old needles, and drifts of crusty brownish snow lay mounded against the trunks. Then the trees thinned, and then they gave out entirely, leaving only ice and gravel for their tired feet to trudge. The wind reached its bony fingers through even the smallest gaps in their clothing, chilling them despite their exertion. 
There were no clouds, and once the moon went down, the starlight was still brilliant enough for them to see where they were going. They stopped only once to rest and eat. They were exhausted not only from the climb, but also from constantly looking over their shoulders for another Gatherer attack. Vaelin supposed they had scared the creatures off with their display of power. If so, that bespoke a troubling level of understanding on the part of the Grandchildren.
The sky was growing lighter when they came over a rise and beheld the Apogee. The top of the tall peak they had seen from below jutted up over a wide frozen lake, like the centerpiece of a crown. On either side of the peak, the lake dropped off directly over the cliff, forming the beards of ice that had been visible from the foothills. The rest of the lake was bordered by steep crater walls.
However, it was the lake itself that drew the eye. The entire thing was glowing, bright aqua in the center, fading to a deep blue around the edges. aestus poured slowly out of a central point in the lake and crept across the ice in long tendrils, toward the peak and over the two icefalls. A strange creaking sound pervaded the whole crater, echoing off the walls.
They descended the rise and walked out onto the ice. The lake was frozen solid, but there were lighter-colored bubbles trapped below the surface at varying depths, which refracted the glow like pearls. Vaelin felt a moment of awe that came near to panic when she realized how much water was below them, and what would happen if the ice cracked and swallowed them up. Then they reached the center of the lake and found the source of the glow. 
Below the surface, a ring of skeletal remains hung suspended, glowing brightly, empty eye sockets staring up through the nearly clear ice. Below that, another ring hung, and another, and another, descending down as far as they could see. It looked like a cyclone of bones frozen in mid-flight.
"Onda," Vaelin whispered.
They surveyed the geometry of the silanus, each making internal calculations. "What do you reckon?" Vaelin said.
"I think we should stand on the rim of the circle. That seems to be where the flow is strongest," Gadarien said. Adranaya nodded.
They set their packs down on the ice and sat on top of them, waiting for the sky to get a little lighter before beginning the ceremony. Timing would be crucial --- they had to strike just after dawn, since they wouldn't be able to contain the flow of aestus for long. They began meditating. 
Vaelin breathed deeply. It felt wonderful just to close her eyes for a few moments. The air was cold, but, at this time of morning, the wind had died down a bit, and it was quiet and still on the ice. She could feel the power just below her, a subtle pulsating throughout her entire body. She looked down at her hands and saw that her veins and fingernails were glowing, and when she glanced up, she saw the same glow in the whites of Gadarien and Adranaya's eyes. They sat for an hour as the sky lightened from a deep blue to a pearly grey, saying nothing, gathering their strength.
Finally, they were as prepared as they could be, and the sun appeared to be just below the horizon. It began to snow. Vaelin opened her eyes and brushed the snow off her legs. "It's time."
They stood and moved their packs out of the way, then backed away from each other until they were equidistant, standing directly above the circle of bones. The snow was starting to fall more heavily now, and it was becoming hard to see. Vaelin could make out Adranaya and Gadarien, but mainly because they were glowing. They each looked like a floating, disembodied head and hands.
Vaelin began chanting the sutra from the scroll of Maidara, and the others picked up the chant. She closed her eyes and concentrated on stilling her mind, feeling the flow of aestus and the connection to the others, and forgetting all else. Her pulse slowed and her limbs felt heavy. She had the sense of her head starting to float up and away, like she was receding from the world.
Their trance deepened. Soon there was only the chanting, filling Vaelin's mouth and ears. Her voice didn't sound like her own voice any more. It felt like someone else was singing and she was merely an observer, hovering somewhere just above her body.
The sun rose above the plain to the east, and Vaelin felt the light wash across her face. All three of them stopped chanting at once and opened their eyes. The glow of their sclera cut through the thickening snowfall.
"Now!" Vaelin cried, and they opened their minds to the aestus. 

Darano Sanavale, Umbrata of Ivaelia, Maestro of the Ventacan faith, swept his terrible weapon across the ranks of his enemy. Part of him still couldn't believe that the Cantarians had been foolish enough to engage him, but they did outnumber the Ventacans heavily. He had expected a trap, and kept a part of his army in reserve in a nearby valley, but no trap was apparent yet. Perhaps the Cantarians simply lacked wise leadership. He had won battles for that reason in the past --- sometimes your enemy really was as contemptible as you told your troops they were.
He twisted his body, willing the Infernal Vortex to sweep another path through the Cantarian ranks, leaving a blackened trail in its wake. A curtain of smoke hung behind it, and, distantly, he heard the screams rising on waves of heat. The base of the Vortex sucked up men like pieces of straw, sometimes spitting out their charred bodies high above the battlefield, to fall and shatter on the dismayed troops below. Some of his own soldiers inevitably got caught up in the attack and burned, but it couldn't be helped. Their sacrifice was a small price to pay for unity and order.
His first inkling that something was wrong was a slight pressure behind his eyes. He assumed that it was simply because he was trying to control the Vortex without enough aestus flowing through him --- a common enough mistake amongst less experienced teluri, but one he had not made in a long time. He opened his mind and prepared to draw more aestus from the powerful meridian that swept down from the mountains to the west. 
That was when the pain began.
It started in his pelvis, and, at the very beginning, it felt like arousal. But it quickly changed to an intense pressure, which then spread outward, up his torso and throughout his extremities. The pain was blinding, literally --- his vision turned completely white, fading out from the middle. He brought his hands to his head and tried to scream, but only a strangled sound came out.
It felt as though his blood were boiling. He fell to his knees, painfully, his legs like overstuffed sausages. He tried to scream again, and succeeded this time. His generals turned toward him in alarm, but he was beyond their aid. He screamed again, and then his eyeballs exploded in a splatter of red.
His corpse fell from the ridge and slid down the steep slope, landed crumpled in the dust. The Vortex collapsed gradually, dispersing first into several smaller whirlwinds, and then going out entirely. The teluri, who were all in a deep trance, fell unconscious. Their flectari closed up in a slow wave, from the center outward, like morning glories folding inward for the night. The Cantarians saw this and, with a mighty roar, charged.

The power surged through the coro, their bodies straining to contain it. Vaelin was sweating inside her furs, and the icy wind now came as a relief. The feeling was intense. She wasn't in pain, exactly, but the sensation was uncomfortable --- a feeling like she needed to relieve herself, but throughout her entire body, even her hands and feet. 
They were waiting for the moment when the Umbrata opened himself, which, according to the scroll of Maidara, they would be able to sense immediately. Then they would strike, and just hope that they could contain the amount of aestus that it would take to kill him.
The snow was coming down even harder now, and, in addition to the creaking sound from the ice, there was now a high whining tone, just at the edge of perception. Vaelin looked across the circle, through the swirling snow, and could just make out Gadarien, but couldn't quite see Adranaya.
"Do you hear that?" she shouted.
"What?" said Gadarien.
"That high sound. The buzzing."
She couldn't see for sure, but she thought Gadarien shook his head. "No."
She was about to reply when, suddenly, she felt something shift. There was a space in the flow of aestus that hadn't been there before, an opening, like a wall had been removed or a door slid aside.
"Now!" Vaelin cried. She opened herself as much as she could to the power, and it flowed into her body from her feet up. Her extremities tingled. A white glow appeared in the air between the three of them, lighting up the snow. It was moving, pulsing around the circle from Vaelin to Gadarien, from Gadarien to Adranaya, and back to Vaelin, like it had when they created the coro.
She felt the power swell and swell. Her body couldn't take it, she knew it couldn't, but she pressed on anyway, pushing herself to her limits. She could feel every vein and artery pulsing, racing with power. It was terrifying, yet exhilarating, like leaning out over a cliff. The glow from the column of bones below them had intensified, and was now sending up a shaft of white light high into the air, illuminating the snowflakes as they came down. She half-laughed, half-screamed, holding her arms straight out from her sides.
Something gave --- not one of the three of them, but at the end of the meridian. It felt like a grape popping between her teeth. 
She knew then that the Umbrata was dead.
And then something went wrong. Vaelin felt the energy within her begin to ramp up even more, although she had already opened herself as much as she was able. She felt the power pour into her, and it felt like being violated. She screamed. And Adranaya laughed.
"Adra!" Vaelin shouted.
Adranaya's voice was calm as it carried across the ice. "Did you really think I could forgive you? After what you did? I suffered more than anyone should ever have to. And now you will suffer."
Somehow, Adranaya was forcing the energy that should have been her share of the coro back out of herself and into the other two. Vaelin heard Gadarien groan and fall to his knees.
"Adra!" She screamed again. "You'll kill us!"
Adranaya laughed once more. "Then you'll be together, forever. Isn't that what you wanted, Vaelin?" Her words were layered with spite.
And Vaelin knew it was true. She hadn't wanted to share Gadarien, not really. Maybe part of her, deep down, had known that what she was doing would have consequences, and maybe that same part of her was what had failed to convince Maestra Haidana that she had taken the scroll. Maybe she deserved to die. But Gadarien didn't. 
She had to handle this. Alone.
Vaelin stopped resisting the power. Instead, she opened herself even more, taking in Gadarien's share as well. All she could see was white. Blinding white light radiated out of every pore in her skin, out of her eyes, her mouth, even her nose. She could feel it tearing through her, filling her. Her whole being was a scream. She took it in, soaking in the agony, until she could stand no more, and, distantly, she felt a part of the power burst back out of her, pulsing back up the coro toward Adranaya. Then she fell into darkness.

Vaelin awoke under a shroud. Was she dead? She moved her fingers experimentally. She didn't feel dead. If she were dead, she wouldn't be experiencing a slow-burning ache throughout every inch of her body. Her joints felt like they were clogged with sand.
She stood up, painfully, dislodging the pile of fresh snow that had accumulated on her furs. A wave of lightheadedness passed over her, and she swayed slightly as she caught her balance. The sky was noticeably darker, fading from a dull grey into a deep blue, but still light on the horizon. Almost a whole day must have passed. She expected to feel exhausted, at the very least, but she didn't. 
The soreness receded as she moved around, and she started to feel good. Better, in fact, than she remembered feeling since the coro was first created. All of her senses felt sharpened to glittering points, like a mouthful of kriancha teeth. She could sense the motion of each drop of meltwater rolling off of the rocks and hissing softly into the snowbanks. Her body had a lightness, a buoyancy, as though her chest were filled with wind and she could, at any moment, rise up above the rocky peak above her and just float there in the clear, cold air. For a long while, she simply stood, her arms slightly outstretched, staring at the sky and breathing in slowly. She looked at her hands and saw that her veins and fingernails were still glowing slightly in the dusk.
Finally, she looked around. The middle of the lake, where the circle lay glowing, had partially melted, and wisps of steam rose from it. Off to her left, several paces away from the circle, she saw what looked like part of a cloak sticking out of a snow bank. Her sense of well-being was so complete that, at first, she didn't even consider the possibility of anything being amiss. The episode with Adranaya seemed distant and somehow false. If she felt this good, surely the others must have passed through unscathed. Everything was right in the world. They had won.
 It was only when she made her way through the drifts and looked down at Adranaya's face, mottled blue and white against the snow, that she realized what she had done.
She sank to her knees. "Adra," she said, softly. She had no tears, not yet. The buoyant feeling still filled her, but now it felt wrong and perverse. She put her hand beneath Adranaya's head and tried to lift it, but the corpse was already stiff. She left the body in the snow and staggered up to look for Gadarien. It only took her a few minutes to find him.
He was awake, and had either walked or crawled off the surface of the lake and onto some rocks. He sat there, shivering, his furs wrapped haphazardly around him, his lips blue and his eyes unfocused.
"Gada," Vaelin said. He didn't respond, didn't even seem to see her. She waved her hand in front of his face. His eyes didn't move. She snapped her fingers under his nose, even slapped him lightly, but got no response. He just sat there, staring at the ground a few paces away.
If they stayed here for long, they would both freeze, or the Grandchildren would come for them. He had to be roused, and quickly. She thought for a few moments. Then, gingerly, she reached down Gadarien's furs and felt for the aculus. Perhaps if she took it out, the shock would rouse him, or release him from whatever stupor he had entered. She concentrated, willing the cilia to straighten and release their grip on his flesh, then very carefully pulled the aculus out. She felt something recede from within her mind, and the sudden sense of loss made her sob involuntarily. Gadarien didn't react at all.
There was a clicking sound from the rocks behind them. She stood up slowly.
At least twenty gatherers were creeping cautiously over the rocks and ice toward her, needle teeth bared, black and orange eyes glittering. Behind them, dozens more stood still on the embankment, waiting to swoop down once they knew it was safe. 
For the first time in months, Vaelin knew she was entirely helpless. She didn't even have her flectarus, not that it would have done any good against so many. She knew she should feel terror and despair, but the only thing inside her now was a hollow lack of feeling, as though her insides had been scraped out like a gourd.
She raised her arms wide, still holding the aculus. "Come for me, then."
Just before the first Gatherer reached her, she had a sudden resurgence of willpower. She couldn't go out without a fight, not after all that she'd come through. At least this one Gatherer would know her wrath.
She opened her mind and filled the empty space inside her with power once more. Her whole body flared with light, and she saw shock on the gatherer's face as it tried to stop short, slipped on some ice, and fell into her, knocking her back into the snow. Still acting on some sort of instinct, she reached around its cold body to its bony spine and slammed the aculus home. 
There was a burst of light, and a terrible screeching came from all of the gatherers at once. The creature on top of Vaelin was locked in some kind of rigor, its limbs frozen at a strange angle, jaws clenched tight. She sat up and pushed the thing off of her. Up the slope, all of the gatherers were similarly frozen.
She wiped her nose with her sleeve. Then she reached out with her will, and when she stood, so did they.

# Chapter 15 #

The spies were still proud as they entered the Hall of Winds, although several of them were unable to walk upright or lift their heads. All nine of them were grimacing from the metal woven through their flesh. But the look in their eyes was unmistakable: defiance. This was good. For Demeia to demonstrate the true nature of the Cantarians ---  incorrigible terrorists, bent on destroying Ventaca no matter what they had to endure --- then they needed to be seen as proud. Haughty, even. Their suffering would ultimately be pitiful, of course, but she didn't want them to inspire sympathy.
She had considered stationing a ring of bowmen around the perimeter of the chamber, but had decided against it. With their lips sutured shut by iron rings, there was little the Cantarians could do. In fact, she rather thought that the lack of security would speak more eloquently of the power dynamic in the room, making it clear that these particular snakes had been defanged. No matter how intense their commitment, they were no longer a threat.
It was their very reliance on faith that had been their downfall. She couldn't fathom why else they were so incompetent in the execution of their plot. Surely, men of reason would have thought it all through a bit more thoroughly. The city guard had caught them scuttling through a seldom-used tunnel --- they hadn't even gotten within sight of the bridge that was their target. They must have assumed that their faith would guide them. It had, instead, guided them straight to the Yewiatum, in chains.
She surveyed the crowd. Irrespective of the terrorists themselves, there had been rumors of Cantarian agitators planning a riot, so she had deployed a small contingent of the Teluric Guard throughout the throng, in plain clothes. Any attempt at a riot would be quashed immediately, further demonstrating her control. She almost welcomed such an attempt.
Her eyes swept up to the viewing stands, and she nodded to several of the higher-level ministers and other officials gathered near the front. It was good that they were here, although she noted a few absences that would need to be dealt with. Some people were squeamish. Not an adequate excuse.
The bell tolled, signaling the time for the ceremony to begin. Demeia climbed the scaffold and raised her arms. The crowd quieted.
"Citizens of Thelenza," she intoned. "Today we witness justice. These men were caught entering the city three days ago. Their intent, we have learned, was to destroy the Iotaran Bridge at midday, the height of trade, killing all who gathered on it, and sowing discord and fear among us. Disrupting our commerce. Spoiling our hour of glory.
"This very morning, far away to the north, our army has gathered. My brother, the Umbrata, leads them. The cream of our glorious teluri stand by his side. They prepare, even now, to crush the shavalia insurgency once and for all, and shine the light of reason and order into the dark heart of Cantaria. Their cities shall be destroyed, that they might be rebuilt with Ventacan logic. Their primitive faith shall no longer mire us all in ignorance and superstition." She signaled to the guards below, and they began hooking up the ropes and pulleys and leading the oxen into place.
"You are privileged to be here. You will bear witness to history. These rebels will be torn asunder, even as our army tears asunder their rebellion. Theirs is a culture of irrationality, fear, and oppression. We cannot permit such a thing to subvert our progress toward enlightenment and freedom."
There was a stirring among the shavalie. One of them, apparently their leader, shuffled forward painfully. He was a stout, older man, with a thick grey beard and fierce eyebrows, and two missing fingers on his right hand.
The man reached up his bound hands up to his face, hooks dangling from the flesh of his upper arms. He stuck a finger in one ear, then the other, flicking something at the ground in front of him. A tremendously insulting gesture among the Cantarians, Demeia had heard. Perfect.
She laughed and clapped her hands together thrice. Her men pulled the ropes taut, jerking the shavaliae forward. Two of them fell to their knees, crying out, or trying to through their wired-shut lips. They were forced to stand again as the hooks pulled them away from each other, limbs straining against limbs. Demeia clapped her hands once more and the oxen began to move. The Cantarians began to scream through their pierced lips.
Actually, Demeia realized a moment later, they weren't screaming. They were humming. Only a few of them were participating, but it was obvious what they were doing. They were making a pathetic attempt at a war chord. Despite himself, Demeia felt a brief wave of nausea, but laughed it off, looking around at the crowd, making sure they saw that she was not fazed. The oxen would only pull harder, attempting to get away from the eerie sound.
Soon all the shavalie had joined in, but the sound was muted, since their mouths were unable to open fully. Demeia felt a pulsing in her head, like the beginning of a bad headache. She signaled the ox handlers to whip them harder. This had gone on long enough.
Then the sound got louder. One particular note rang out. Demeia stared in shock --- the leader of the group had somehow managed to rip his mouth open despite the iron. His lips hung in bloody shreds, a line of red dribbling into the white of his beard, but his mouth was open wide, the note ringing out loud and clear.
Then, amazingly, one by one, the other shavaliae tore their own mouths open, their voices clear and strong despite the pain they were enduring. Demeia's head began to hurt in earnest, even as far away as she was. She felt her skull was swelling up. The feeling was impossible, intolerable. The ox handlers, closer to the source of the sound, were on their knees, screaming, hands clutched over their ears. 
The chord kept swelling in her head, crowding out other thoughts. Her vision swam and her knees began to shake. Her legs felt like wet straw. She put her hands to her ears and began staggering down the scaffolding. 
Through her blurred vision, she saw the crowd covering their ears as well, crying out in pain. A few people in the front had fallen and were spasming on the ground. Something white was coming out of their mouths. Others, closer to the public exits, were panicking, trampling each other as they tried to get out. Confusingly, she glimpsed a few people grabbing others who were trying to escape and attacking them, blades flashing. Why were they fighting each other? It made no sense. Nothing made any sense. 
She had to get away. Nothing else mattered. What was she even doing here? She couldn't remember, but it didn't matter.
She jumped the rest of the way to the ground, spraining her right ankle as she landed. She ignored the flare of pain and ran toward the rear tunnel entrance, which was barred by a stout oak door and blessedly devoid of other people, since it was on the back side of the room. The chord swelled even more, louder than it could possibly have been, louder than any sound could ever be. It pushed out everything else in her head, everything in the whole world.  Her vision faded into a patchwork of light and color, nonsensical. She could barely stagger forward. How could anything be so loud? She couldn't remember where she was, or even who she was, but she knew she had to get to that door. 
As he reached the tunnel, she glanced over his shoulder in terror, and saw the last of the shavaliae staring at her. It was the old man. All of the Cantarians had red tears streaming down their faces, mouths open in some kind of rapture. Their veins were glowing below their dark skin, the whites of their eyes shining like half moons. Demeia slammed the door shut just as the last of the shavalie finally ripped his lips open and began to sing. The door dampened the sound, but it knocked her out anyway, and she fell to the floor, limp as an old rag, blood leaking from her sinuses.
She awoke several hours later. Her whole body felt like it had been burned. Blood crusted her nostrils, and cracked painfully as she moved her mouth. She could hear nothing but a high ringing sound.
She managed to push open the door and crawl out into the light. Her vision was still a bit blurry, but she could just make out the jumble of Cantarians in the center of the chamber, all motionless on the ground. Behind them, the viewing stands were piled with corpses. She couldn't make out much detail, but she could see splashes of dark red covering their faces and upper bodies. Nearby, she recognized the face of a minor administrator, an older woman, plump and overpaid. Her face was slack, a dagger half-hanging out of the ruin of her neck. 
Demeia turned from the slaughter and crawled over to the chamber's edge and looked down. Below, at the end of her long balcony, a Vorsarix was slumped over, her hands held above her head, tugging down on the pole. She looked to the right and left, saw the long, curving row of other bodies at the ends of their own balconies. Something was strange. The view made no sense.
With disbelief, it dawned on her that she could see all the way across the chamber. The steam was gone. Which meant the Stormwall was gone. Her last thought, before the shock overwhelmed her and she dropped back into unconsciousness, was to realize that the Cantarians had never meant to destroy the bridge. The Vorsari had been their target all along. 

The Stormwall did not leave quietly. The sudden removal of the Vorsari unleashed the pent-up force of the storm on Thelenza and the surround countryside. It scythed across the landscape, taking hundreds of lives with it. Buildings collapsed. Tunnels flooded. Far away, in many directions at once, storms raged out of season, then disappeared just as suddenly. A cyclone appeared in the desert and ripped through three Baranaathi towns, barely missing Aabsaan.
And then, for the first time in generations, the sun shone on the streets of Thelenza.

The first execution Captain Siaba witnessed was of a group of children. It was true that they were old enough to carry weapons --- probably thirteen or fourteen springs --- but they were, in his eyes, children still. Siaba didn't have any of his own, but he was very fond of his sister's brood, and had watched them grow up. One of them, a gangly boy who fancied himself a future javelin champion, was the same age as the children now cowering before the shavaliae. The men were herding the four boys and one girl against a wall.
Siaba shouted and ran toward the scene, but he was too late and too far away, and the shavaliae wouldn't have listened to him in any case. The wall turned from dry grey to wet black.
Siaba stopped, dismayed, and stood with his hands on his knees, panting. One of the shavaliae saw him and laughed, then said something to the others, who also laughed. They sauntered away.
The scene repeated itself many times, with different victims, as Siaba wandered through the broken city. Thelenza was, he had always heard, a city of austere beauty, but it was hard to see it as such now. In the days since the slaughter of the Ventacan army, Siaba had seen much horror, but the death and torture of Ventacan soldiers paled in comparison to the cruelty he witnessed within the city walls.
He counted thirteen rapes --- just the ones he saw directly, not ones that he heard or suspected --- and lost count of the wanton murders and beatings. Many of those killed and assaulted were clearly no threat to anyone. One old man died waving some kind of musical instrument in the air, trying to convince the savage foreigners that this was his trade. What threat did he pose?
 Siaba tried repeatedly to order the men to desist, but they were filled with holy zeal, and had other orders from higher up, so they didn't listen to him. He felt like a ghost, damned to wander the city and watch the devastation, but unable to do anything to stop it.
After a few days, the thirst for vengeance was somewhat slaked, and the standing order to rape and pillage was lifted. The new order, which filtered down through the ranks from Gavasie himself, was to impose strict Cantarian law on the city. In some ways, this was worse. At least in war, people knew what the rules were --- if you didn't want to die, you hid from the fighting, as best you could. But the residents of Thelenza had no concept of Cantarian canon, and they suffered for it.
Siaba came upon one such scene underneath a partially-burned bridge. There was a small pile of corpses heaped against a pylon, all Ventacan men. Off to the side, a Cantarian soldier sat with a hand pressed to his side, grimacing in pain, his shirt caked with dark blood.
A group of women were cowering below the leveled weapons of a number of Cantarian soldiers. In front of them, two more Cantarians held a wailing young boy between them while, standing behind him, a soldier was beating him savagely across the backs of his legs.
"What the hell is going on here?" Siaba cried.
One of the men guarding the group of women turned and scowled at him. "Justice," the man said.
"It's justice to beat a defenseless child?"
"He's not defenseless. He stabbed Bolsio in the back!"
"What had Bolsio done? And who are these dead men?" Siaba demanded.
"They tried to stop us from administering the Holy Law," said another of the men. "These women were wandering around in public with their necks bared. Like harlots. So we administered justice to them. Their men objected." This drew a short burst of laughter from the other Cantarians, which petered out when Siaba glared at them.
"And the boy?"
"After the men were dealt with, we continued administering the Law. Then the boy stabbed Bolsio from behind. We weren't going to administer justice to him, since he's below the age of halfia, but he earned it."
Siaba shook his head. "You will desist. Immediately. And you will return to your posts. Or I shall see you sliced for disobedience. Is that clear?"
"And who the Silence are you?"
"My name is Siaba."
The men looked at each other. They had heard of him. At least his reputation still meant something. They grumbled, but they let go of the boy, who dropped to the ground, sobbing. "Cover yourselves, or next time it will be worse for you," the first Cantarian said to the women.
Siaba went to the boy and tried to help him to stand, but as soon as he saw Siaba's beard, he screamed and scrambled away into the arms of his mother, who was also crying. The rest of the women glared at him as he backed away. The look on their faces was one of pure hatred, and he knew that, no matter what happened next, these people would be enemies of Cantaria for as long as they lived.

The word "surreal" did not begin to encompass the sensation. Controlling a brachiarus of kriancha felt wholly different from connecting with other teluri --- an alien feeling, like pins and needles throughout her whole body. It was deeply unpleasant and yet somehow satisfying, like scratching a painful bug bite. She kept hearing strange fluttering sounds that moved in waves across her hearing, but when she looked for the source, there was nothing there. The kriancha themselves made no sound apart from the scrabbling of their claws on the stones. Whenever she stopped to rest, they stared plaintively at her, like pets waiting for a treat. 
Gadarien, too, was silent, his mouth slightly agape, eyes still vague and unfocused. He seemed to have no problem walking, and would go wherever directed, but any attempt at conversation fell totally flat. He simply wasn't there.
Adranaya's body had stiffened and then relaxed again before starting to swell. It had also changed colors, the side facing upward turning waxy and pale, and the lower parts turning a rusty brown as the blood settled. Its extremities had become blueish, almost like the kriancha who carried it. Vaelin had only Adranaya's bedroll to create a shroud. As the kriancha carried the body, the bedroll kept slipping off, so she was forced to watch every step of the gruesome process. But the body was not Adranaya --- not the broken girl left behind by her Healing, and certainly not the incandescent personality from before that. It was just a body, now. Or so Vaelin told herself, again and again.
Vaelin thought that her rage would have left her, now that the battle was over, but that hadn't happened. Her rage was still present, but now it had no object. It was pervasive, like smoke, permeating her thoughts. Was she angry at herself? At Adranaya? At the world? She didn't know, and didn't want to figure it out. That was a door she had no desire to open. For now, her rage was all that was keeping her moving.
They moved slowly, taking a different, more gentle path down than the coro had used to come up. There was no way Vaelin was going to try to get Adranaya and Gadarien down the glacier. What had taken a single grueling day to ascend thus became a multi-day journey down through the trees, which periodically dumped wet snow onto Vaelin's head.
On the third day, Vaelin felt a stirring among her gatherers --- at some point, she had begun to think of them as "hers" --- and heard a low keening sound on the wind. The creatures sat on their haunches, sniffing and looking around, tasting the air with their long tongues. She felt uneasy for some reason she couldn't name. 
The attack was sudden as thunder, a mass of other gatherers boiling out of the trees and rocks from all sides. It was a larger group than Vaelin's pack, and several of her gatherers were taken by surprise and eviscerated. The shock of fear penetrated her layers of dead emotions. It was jarring to be thrust back to the brink of survival, after coming through all that she had. She felt a wave of irritation. Couldn't she just get a break?
Her gatherers defended themselves instinctively, but they soon began losing ground. The snarling, snapping mass rolled around Vaelin like waves on a stormy sea, and, rapidly, the enemy gatherers drew closer and closer to her and her cargo.  One of her gatherers looked back at her with a desperate, almost human expression, and she realized suddenly that they were losing because of her. She was in control. If her gatherers were going to attack, she would have to make them do so. It was her fight.
She concentrated, willing herself to see the battlefield as a whole, to recognize the patterns in what was happening. It was impossible to tell the two groups of gatherers apart from each other by sight, but the gatherers themselves had no problem doing so using some other sense. Vaelin closed her eyes, and began to feel the battle in her mind, in a way that her eyes just couldn't see. The patterns swirled and coalesced, and suddenly she knew what to do. 
The enemy gatherers were winning because they were able to isolate her individual fighters using their superior numbers, separating them from the group attacking them from multiple sides at once. To win, her side simply needed to regroup, to stand together rather than fighting as individuals. She willed it, and it was so. And soon enough, the battle was over.
Of her original pack of thirty-seven gatherers, fourteen were left. A few of the enemy tribe had survived to slink off into the trees, but Vaelin knew they wouldn't be back to trouble her again any time soon.
She let her gatherers rest for a while, and even attempted to treat some of their wounds, although without supplies, there wasn't much she could do. She needed some rest herself, though; the mental focus required to control all those creatures at once had left her exhausted and shaking. The battle had been too close. She needed to avoid another, or she would be finished.

As it turned out, she needn't have worried. The rest of the way down the mountain was clear, leaving her alone with her thoughts once again. Her grief crouched at the back of her mind, waiting for an opening, but she gave it none. She knew that to feel it now would disable her, and she couldn't afford to stop yet. So she pushed the thoughts away, sweeping them aside as she had once swept the dust from Mahishat's floor.
Soon she saw the steam, and followed it to the hut, which stood as she remembered, its grim cargo encased within. The rough wagon was still parked next to the building. She glanced at Gadarien, who stood dumbly by her side, but he made no sign of recognition or understanding.
Vaelin made camp next to the pool. Whatever else they were, the kriancha were quite useful for mundane tasks like gathering firewood. They were clearly intelligent, in an inhuman way, and were able to perform simple tasks almost autonomously once she focused on an intent. It was as though they had been designed for the purpose.
After she had gotten the fire going and eaten --- a handful of boiled beans and the last of her hard cheese --- she sat for a while, watching the steam rise from the hot spring in a pale column. She closed her eyes and filled her nose with the sharp, sulfurous scent of it. Had it only been a few days ago that they had arrived at this place? That had been their one last moment of peace. Or so Vaelin had believed at the time. Knowing what she did now, she realized that her uneasiness around Adranaya had had its roots in truth. She had been right to be uneasy. Adranaya's forgiveness had been a lie all along, and beneath her calm exterior had boiled a toxic soup of rage and vengeance, waiting to burst forth. Vaelin had thought of herself as the angry one, but she had been wrong.
All that time, Adranaya had been waiting. All that time, she had known Vaelin for what she was: a betrayer. And even though she had died, Adranaya had gotten her vengeance. Vaelin was broken, now, as Adranaya had been. The weight of this grief, which descended upon her all at once, would never leave her. She would always bear it, and bear it painfully, like a pair of water buckets on a long pole.
The gatherers were quite efficient at digging a grave, their claws sending clods of dirt flying in all directions. Lowering Adranaya's body into the hole gracefully was a bit more difficult, but she was determined not to drop it. Their claws slipping and skittering on the edges, the creatures slowly dipped the body down until it disappeared into shadow.
Vaelin stood for a while at the grave's edge, staring at the corpse in its makeshift shroud, smelling the rot. Her tears refused to come, but she could feel them bunched up in her throat like a fist. A cold gust of wind blew the scent away for a moment and she shivered. Then, turning away, she willed the gatherers to begin filling the dirt back in. She would never forget the wet sound it made as it landed on the cloth.
The sun had set behind the mountain now and it was getting colder again. Vaelin left Gadarien by fire and sat at the edge of the pool, her legs folded beneath her. She reached under her tunic and ran her hand along her scars. They rose from her body like hieroglyphics, like a hidden message from some ancient time, telling her what she really was, what she would always remain.
She stood and removed her clothes, then slowly immersed herself in the pool. And that, finally, was when the tears came. They ran down her neck and mixed with the water of the pool and stayed there, not washing anything away, just hovering around her like ghosts.

# Chapter 16 #

The gatherers didn't seem to care about anything other than feeding, from what she could tell. Each night on their journey, she had released them from the traces and allowed them to hunt for deer or other prey. Their bond with her didn't break. Once, she had made the mistake of watching them suck out the insides of a gazelle they had run down. She didn't eat that night.
The wagon she had taken from the cabin in the foothills had been very useful, and spared her the mental exhaustion of coordinating the gatherers while they carried Gadarien down the steep terrain. Once she had the wagon, she simply sat up front and let the gatherers run. They seemed to know where she wanted to go, without any overt instruction from her. She had been worried that they would die when they got down into the warmer climate, but it appeared that their cold, mountainous habitat was more a matter of preference than necessity.
She didn't know what defined a group of gatherers, or why it was that controlling one member gave her control of the entire group. Her best guess was that it had to do with shared bloodlines. She thought of the group she controlled as a clan, although such a concept would obviously have been alien to the gatherers. It wasn't clear whether they had any concept of individuality or family, or any thoughts at all as a human would conceive of them. But watching them hunt, it was clear once again that they had a crude intelligence beyond that of mere animals, and were able to communicate with each other in some way that didn't require language. Or, at least, not any language Vaelin understood.
She had avoided towns and settlements, and didn't come across any people until they were within a few days of Thelenza. The weather was strangely rainy --- ordinarily, the lands to the northwest of Thelenza enjoyed plenty of sunshine for growing crops, a beneficial side effect of the Stormwall. But she had passed a number of flooded fields, and had been forced to lose a whole day of travel due to a washed-out bridge. 
Her gear wasn't suited for long periods in the rain, and, since she couldn't stop for shelter, she just had to slouch in her seat and endure the cold, dripping misery. It matched her mood just fine. In the wagon behind her, Gadarien was also shivering, but he still made no sound. There was nothing she could do for him while they rode, so she let him shiver, but in the evenings they would lay pressed together on their bedrolls, and she would sometimes allow herself to imagine that he was merely asleep. But the illusion never lasted long.
When, at last, she encountered civilization again, she tried to avoid people, which proved easy enough to do; the townsfolk were mostly huddled indoors, trying to ride out the unexpected storms. Those she did come across gave her a wide berth, radiating fear and disgust. So far, no one had possessed the temerity to approach her. Perhaps this had something to do with the fact that her veins were still glowing through her dark skin. Or that she was riding a wagon pulled by living nightmares.
As she got closer and closer to the city, it became clear that something was very wrong. It took her an embarrassing length of time to figure it out, which she chalked up to mental exhaustion. She kept looking to the horizon, expecting to see the gray mass of the Stormwall lingering there, but it failed to appear. She began to wonder whether she was actually going the right way, but the signposts all pointed in the direction she was traveling. The ground was, confusingly, littered with downed trees and debris, and many of the buildings she passed looked like they had been badly damaged by wind. It wasn't until she crested a low foothill and actually saw Thelenza off in the distance that she understood: the Stormwall was gone.
The ground near the city was wet and stank of decaying plant matter, a smell that was almost worse than Adranaya's body had been, given that it was inescapable. Her cart  kept getting stuck in the black mud, and Vaelin had to use the gatherers to dig herself out. When she reached the actual swath of land the Stormwall itself had occupied, the going got easier, as most of the soil there had long ago washed away, leaving only bare bedrock. 
Seeing the sun shining down on the roofs of the city was strange enough, but it was the quiet that she found most unsettling. The usual noise and bustle of commerce, underpinned by the rumble of the Stormwall, had been replaced with near-silence. The only sound was that of faint choral singing. Here and there throughout the city, lines of smoke drifted up into an eerily calm blue sky.
The gates of the city were wide open and unguarded when she arrived, so she just rolled right through. The wagon made a low grinding sound as it slid down the street. The roughness of the wooden wheels was more of a liability here in the city than it had been on the grasslands, but the gatherers didn't seem to mind. A gang of street urchins stood agog as she drove past them, not sure whether to believe what they were seeing. There were numerous bodies in the gutters, covered in flies. The stench was terrible, but the urchins seemed inured to it.
By the time she got to the Madrium, a small crowd, mostly children, was following her. She dismounted and waved to them cheerfully, then made the gatherers snarl and scrape their claws across the pavement, in case anyone got any ideas about bothering the stuporous man in the back of the wagon. The crowd shrank back, their curiosity no match for their fear.
There were three guards with spears standing watch in front of the building. One of them leveled his weapon at her, his eyes wide with fright.
"Who the Silence are you? And what are you doing with those horrible... things?" he said in Cantarian.
"I'm a friend of Habsa Gavasie's. And I need to get inside this building, so please move," she replied calmly, in the same language. Now that she was here, and had a purpose to her actions once more, she felt calm and collected. Compared to what she had been through, facing down a few poorly-trained Cantarian guards didn't seem like much of a problem. Especially since she didn't care at all about their lives.
The other two guards also leveled their spears and began circling around to her flanks. She sighed, and unleashed the Grandchildren upon them. The crowd ran away, screaming. She felt nothing at all for the deaths of the guards, and wondered at this, but she had no interest in introspection anymore. Their deaths were grains in the desert, as Belosveka might have said. At this point, the numbness suited her.
When the killing was done, she went inside. The interior of the Madrium was fairly unspoiled, at least relative to the rest of the city. There were bloodstains on the walls of the entryway, and more smeared along the tiled courtyards, but no bodies and no signs of burning. The Cantarian leadership had apparently decided to keep the Madrium for themselves, although they didn't appear to be occupying it at the moment. The air had a stale, unused quality, far different from the constant commotion that had always been here before. The whole setting had a feeling of dreamlike unreality.
She made her way to the armory and found what she was looking for. An hour later, she walked out of the Madrium with a sparkling new flectarus --- a bit rough around the edges, since she was in a rush, but serviceable. Her speed at manipulating syrillium had multiplied many times over since the last time she had tried to make anything. And she had been fast to begin with.
She hopped back onto the wagon and headed up the hill. With a final hiss from her gatherers, she left the remaining crowd of children behind her. She rode with only the scraping of the Grandchildrens' claws on the stone and Gadarien's silence to keep her company, as she had done all the way down from the mountains. Her thoughts were empty, focusing only on the immediate sights and sounds around her. The city felt abandoned. She had to negotiate around a large overturned fruit cart, the spilled melons cracked open and spoiling in the sun, clouds of tiny gnats swirling and fluttering above. A mangy cat hissed at her from atop a wall.
The streets were abandoned until she reached the top of the hill. There was a large mass of people in the square that separated the Umbratorium from the Yewiatum. Some kind of proceeding was going on, and the crowd was a mix of Cantarians and Ventacans. The Ventacans were absolutely wretched, as wretched as the Cantarians had ever been in their crowded tunnels. A long queue of Ventacans snaked around to a clearing in the center of the square, where a few chairs were set up around a makeshift platform. At the back of the platform, seated in the center chair, was Habsa Gavasie, stroking his long beard. He was flanked by several other bearded Cantarians, all wearing white kaftans with intricate circular patterns stitched in bright colors around the waistlines and collars. An old Ventacan man prostrated himself before them, grimacing in pain.
The crowd drew back as Vaelin and her wagon entered the courtyard, with shouts and curses. Vaelin jumped off the wagon and began walking nonchalantly through the throng, which parted for her like she were pushing a plague cart. She found herself actually enjoying the crowd's discomfiture.
"Ouvintero," she said, bowing.
Gavasie smiled. "Vaelin. How pleasant to see you. I already know your mission was a success. I have to say, I was a bit surprised."
"You're not the only one."
He laughed. "Well. Now that you are here, what can I do for you? We owe you many favors, I should think."
The Ventacans were glaring at her with open hatred. She glanced at the old man groveling before the Ouvintero, and, with a start, recognized her old instructor, Maestro Lovad. His face was contorted with rage. He didn't understand what was being said, but it was clear enough that she had collaborated with the Cantarians, a treason of the worst order. She ignored him; his hatred seemed insignificant, like an old bug bite. She wondered briefly what had become of Mastra Haidana, then realized that she didn't care that much. Her petty feud with Haidana just didn't seem important anymore. "I only need one thing. Demeia Sanavale. Is she still alive?"
"Yes. We found her cowering in the Yewiyatum, with a few guards, who we dispatched. She actually tried to take her own life, but we stopped her. She is there now, being interrogated. Why?"
"I need to see her."
"You're not planning to kill her, are you? She still has some value to us."
Vaelin looked around at the crowd, weighing her options. The Ventacans were staring at her with a mixture of open hatred and confusion, while the Cantarians looked merely curious. Gavasie would know if she told him an outright lie, so she decided to go with a lie of omission. "Gadarien is badly injured. Demeia is the only one who might be able to heal him."
Gavasie stared at her, stroking his beard. "I see. In that case, you may go to her." He signaled to a few of his men and instructed them to accompany her. "Be careful," he warned. "The creature is still dangerous."
Vaelin smiled grimly. "So am I." She followed the Cantarians toward the Yewiyatum.

Demeia was not herself. That much was clear at first glance, as Vaelin stepped into the chamber where she was being kept. She was chained hand and foot to an iron-framed bed, although it didn't appear that she'd be able to get far even if she were free. The bed was probably one that had been used for interrogations. The chains were mounted to ratcheting wheels that allowed them to be tightened, although currently Demeia had a fair bit of slack. She was emaciated and one eye was swollen shut, and a crust of dried blood formed and almost comical mustache across her lip. But she was awake, and smiled when he saw Vaelin. Vaelin felt a wash of nervousness, then exhilaration once she realized that she had no reason to be nervous. She was the one with the power here. 
"I knew you'd be back." Demeia's voice was a harsh croak, nothing like the mellifluous tone she had been known for. "And look at you. What kind of magnificent monster have you become? We taught you well."
"What I've become has nothing to do with you. You are nothing to me, nothing but a sick and broken animal. Whatever I've accomplished, it's been in spite of you, not because of you."
Demeia gave a hacking laugh, coughing into her manacled hands. "Believe what you like. We both know you'd be nothing without the training you received here. But no matter. Why are you here? Have you come for vengeance?"
Vaelin shook her head. "I'm here because I need you. Gadarien is... injured. If you heal him, I'll see to it that you're treated as befits your station."
She stared. "And how will you do that? You have that kind of influence with the Cantarians? Why?"
"Because I helped them destroy you."
Demeia stared for a moment longer, then laughed again, incredulous. "And now you want me to help you? To heal your companion? That hardly seems likely."
"You know what does seem likely? Me killing you if you don't help me."
The older woman frowned. "Ah, yes, threats. A much more effective motivation than empty promises. But still, I think not. The Cantarians are going to kill me in any case, after they're done having their fun. Why should I be afraid of you? It would be a mercy if you murdered me."
Vaelin smiled pleasantly. "Well. That depends on how I kill you, doesn't it?" She walked over to the head of the bed and began tightening the chains holding Demeia down.
Demeia chuckled. "What do you think you're doing? Leave torture to the experts. You won't break me."
Vaelin didn't answer, but moved to Demeia's feet and tightened those chains as well, so that she was completely stretched out on the frame. Vaelin reached into her bag and pulled out something white and gleaming.
"Here's what's going to happen. I'm going to show you something, and then you're going to heal Gadarien. If you don't, I'm going to keep doing this to you. For hours. Even days, if that's what it takes. If you try to harm him further, or fail to heal him in any way, I'll kill you."
"What is that?" Demeia said. Her voice sounded a bit less confident.
"It's called the Siphon," Vaelin replied. "Here's how it works." She leaned over and jammed the Siphon straight into Demeia's heart. She gasped and jerked in his chains, but made no sound. Then she smiled.
"Is that it?" she gasped. "You don't understand pain at all."
"Oh, you're right. I don't. But here's the thing." Vaelin bent close to Demeia's face and whispered, "I haven't started yet." And then she leaned across to the siphon, placed her mouth on it, and began to suck.
Demeia's screams were audible all the way out in the square where Gavasie was sitting. It only took a minute for her to cave in. She would heal Gadarien, she screamed, anything, anything at all. Vaelin withdrew the Siphon, spitting Demeia's own heart's blood in her face. Then she turned on her heel and left.
She returned a few minutes later with Gadarien over her shoulders like a sack of grain. She was straining a little with the effort, but the aestus inside her gave her perfect balance, allowing her to carry the load as efficiently as possible. She set him down gently on the ground inside the Yewiyatus. Then she released the slack on Demeia's chains.
"Where are your aculae?" Vaelin said.
"They're in that chest, by the door," Demeia said, wearily.
Vaelin opened the chest and found an ornate wooden box, inside of which were rows of gleaming aculae. She stared at them for a long moment. These were the tools that had been used on Adranaya, and so many others. And now they were Gadarien's only hope.
"I'll need some privacy in order to concentrate," Demeia said.
"You're out of your mind if you think I'm leaving you alone with him," Vaelin said.
Demeia grimaced. "Fine. But be silent, at least."
Vaelin nodded and handed her the box. The Cantarian guards helped her drag a table into the room, upon which they placed Gadarien. Vaelin released all of Demensius's chains but from one around his ankle. He could barely stand on his own, but was able to manage by leaning on the table.
"Remember," Vaelin said, holding up the Siphon. Demensius just nodded, his eyes closed, already sliding into a trance. Despite her loathing of the man, Vaelin had to respect his skill. He opened his eyes after only a few seconds, and they were fully dilated. Even with her new powers, the trance state would have taken her far longer to achieve. She decided to watch him carefully and learn what she could, setting her hatred aside.
Demensius began by removing Gadarien's tunic. He was so weak that he couldn't even manage that task without Vaelin's help. Gadarien's chest rose and fell, but his face showed no sign of awareness. His mouth was half open, his head lolling to the side. Vaelin gently wiped away the drool as Demensius began feeling along Gadarien's meridians, muttering to himself quietly.
He pulled an aculus from the box and filled it with his own blood, his movements smooth and efficient. Without hesitation, he began placing aculae along Gadarien's forehead and face. Vaelin looked on with interest; the placements were totally unfamiliar to her, including some meridians that she had not even known were there. She had to bite back the urge to interrupt with questions.
The whole procedure took several hours, including intervals where Demensius, frowning, would place a finger or two on a specific spot and simply wait, feeling for some unknown cue, before adding or removing aculae. Throughout, Gadarien was entirely still.
Finally, Demensius stood and wiped his brow.  He had removed all the aculae but the very first one he had placed, which was directly between Gadarien's eyes. "It's done," he said.
Vaelin looked at Gadarien doubtfully. He still appeared to be comatose. "Doesn't look done to me," she said.
Demensius smiled and, with a small flourish, removed the aculus. Gadarien's eyes opened suddenly. He bolted upright, chest heaving. Vaelin jumped back with a shout.
Gadarien sat on the edge of the table, staring upward at nothing, mouth agape. His eyes looked unfocused.
"Gada. Gada!" Vaelin shouted, stepping in front of him.
He looked down at her and blinked slowly. "We released her," he said in Cantarian.
"What? Gada, it's me, Vae." 
He didn't respond, but began looking around the room. "They spread out like ants. Like ants, eating everything. Making more. More ants!" He started laughing.
Vaelin turned to Demensius. "What have you done to him?"
"The procedure is never perfect. His body is healed, but his mind --- well, only the Luminae can heal that. In time, he might come back to his senses, or he might not. I did all that was possible. There is nothing more I can do."
Vaelin felt her face growing hot. The rage built within her like the heart of an Infernal Vortex, spinning and churning, as she began pulling in aestus, her veins glowing brighter and brighter. The reserve of power filled her to the brim.
She spun and backhanded Demensius across the face. He fell heavily onto the iron bed.
"I told you what would happen if you didn't heal him. Well, you didn't heal him. That's not him, it's someone else." She pulled the Siphon out and waved the Cantarian guards over.
"No. No, wait. I have information. Valuable information!" Demensius shouted.
"Not to me."
"Your mother!" Demensius cried, his voice desperate. "I know what happened to her!"
Vaelin froze, stunned. "What?"
"I know who she is. Nasharra Thanasavaarian. I've known since your Challenge. That's why I was watching you so closely."
Vaelin waved the Cantarians back and put the Siphon away. "Tell me."
"She was a student at the Madrium. A foreign princess, from Kulnarana, sent here to study teluro. That was a common practice at the time. She was very powerful --- I knew her quite well."
Vaelin snorted. "She never would have been friends with a man like you. You bastards had her killed. I saw the cloaks."
Demensius looked baffled. "I didn't say we were friends. Anyway, why would we kill her? We were helping her hide in Baranaath, grooming her as an ally against Vhar. It's all in the annals, in the Umbrata's personal library. Go look for yourself, you'll see I speak the truth!"
She stared at him, then shook her head slowly. "No. You're a liar, and a twisted, broken soul. I gave you Gadarien for healing, and you gave me back a madman. I told you what would happen if you failed." She stepped toward him, and he cowered back against his bed.
"No. No, I healed him!"
Shoving his weak arms aside, she jammed the Siphon into neck. "Heal this," she said, sending a surge of aestus down her arm and directly into Demensius's spine. He grinned horribly as his head swelled with blood.

The whites of her eyes were still glowing as she walked out the back door of the Yewiyatum. The street was deserted. Empty, like her. Tendrils of acrid smoke wove through the shattered remains of buildings, rising into the unnaturally blue sky. Across the street, a broken facade spilled out on the pavement, some of it smoking, some of it slick with an anonymous dark fluid. 
She had left Gadarien in the care of his countrymen, knowing there was nothing she could do for him. She had tried repeatedly to get through, but his madness was complete. He merely babbled incoherently about the Stain, his eyes an iced-over pond. She would come back for him, but for now, she had work to do.
After she had killed Demensius, it occurred to her that he might have actually been telling the truth, or at least a partial truth. She almost regretted killing him, but now that he had told her where to look, she would be able to find out the truth for herself. She didn't have room in her head for dwelling on mistakes. If she started down that path, she might not return. She had to look forward now. She had to maintain her sense of purpose, or drown in regret.
Before heading to the Umbratorium, she circled back around the Yewiatum, away from the crowd, toward where she had sent the gatherers to await her in the shadows. The creatures would be a liability from now on, drawing attention to her when she didn't want it. She needed to get rid of them.
A small group of curious citizens was still gathered around them, far enough away to avoid contact, but close enough to gawk. Vaelin strode through the crowd and over to the lead Gatherer, the one with her aculus in its back. She closed her eyes and put her hand on its head. Part of her almost felt sad for what she was about to do, but it had to be done.
The lead Gatherer stalked over to the Gatherer next to it, then casually reached out and opened its throat with a long claw. The onlookers gasped, but the dying Gatherer didn't make a sound. It simply fell to the earth and lay there, bleeding out. She sent the lead Gatherer around to all its compatriots and made it do the same, cutting them down one by one like stalks of grass. Then it was alone, and the creature looked back at her for a few heartbeats before finally obeying her unspoken order and slitting its own mottled throat.
She paused to pick a fragment of Demensius's skull out of her hair, and studied it for a moment in the morning light. The glow was nearly imperceptible in the glare of the new day, but the bone was still warm to the touch. She flicked it into the gutter and continued picking her way through the ruins, toward the Umbratorium and whatever questions waited there.

Despite the opulence of the rest of the room --- the lush carpets, the ancient tapestries in hues of brown and red, the long crystalline lightstones embedded in the ceiling --- what drew the eye first was the samovar. It wasn't large, but it was breathtaking, solid silver with intricate traceries of gold and syrillium, and inlays of some pearlescent blue stone around the rim and base. It caught the light and scattered it back in a thousand directions. The samovar sat on a low table of dark wood in the center of the chamber and, on a bed of sumptuous cushions beside it, reclined the Tsarosha of Vhar.
Her age was difficult to discern from her face, which was mostly unlined, and still quite beautiful, her slanted black eyes glittering like chips of obsidian. Her hair was long and straight, black shot through with silver. She had a slight smile on her full, red lips.
As a senior counselor, Belosveka was allowed to walk into the room upright rather than crawling or, as was required of prisoners or lower-caste supplicants, slithering on his belly. But he still prostrated himself before her once he reached the dais, a task that was becoming increasingly uncomfortable to him, in more ways than one. The Tsarosha let him remain in the position for a touch longer than protocol required, sipping her tcha calmly.
"Belo," she said eventually. "It is so good to see you again."
Belosveka rose to a kneeling position. "Your Glory," he replied. She indicated for him to sit beside her.
"So. It seems you have been busy. You must tell me of your adventures. Ah, but where are my manners? Let us practice tcha." She dumped her tcha into a nearby urn and put her cup down.
Belosveka nodded. He took one of the delicate porcelain cups from the table and rinsed it out with tcha, being sure to spill a little on his fingers. The tcha was scalding, but he made no sound. Then he poured the golden liquid into the urn, and poured a second cup, spilling none this time. He bowed his head to the Tsarosha, folded one arm over the other, and took a tiny sip from the cup before bowing a second time and proffering it to her. She took the cup gracefully, bowed, and took a sip herself. Then they repeated the process in reverse.
"Good," she said. "Now. Where were we?"
"You had inquired about my activities over the past months, Your Glory."
"Indeed. Garivosko says that you deceived him. He believed he had found his quarry, but in fact you hid her from him, replacing her with another girl who had a similar appearance. Is this true?"
"Yes, Your Glory."
"Why?"
"After talking to the girl, I decided that she could be of use to us."
"In what way?"
"As a weapon."
The Tsarosha leaned back, frowning. "That's how it turned out, yes. The child is an Apexus. But how could you know that in advance? You had orders to find the girl and destroy her. Orders from me. I would know why you disobeyed them."
He dared not tell her the truth --- that the girl's attitude, her cleverness, her refreshing lack of respect for age or authority, reminded him so much of Nasharra that his chest ached. So much that he could not bring himself to harm her.
"It was an act of poetry, Your Glory," he said instead. "The progeny of your old foe would become a weapon to destroy your new one. What better vengeance than to wield Nasharra's own daughter as a tool?"
"Hmm. You always did have a certain flair for the dramatic, didn't you? So tell me, how did you orchestrate this? It must have required some forethought."
Belosveka paused to gather his thoughts, sipping his tcha. He had to tread carefully. If the Tsarosha suspected his true motives, Jiannasha was as good as dead. "The first step was to get her out of Baranaath, and make her believe that the Nasura was responsible for destroying her life. Of course, you made this easy by sending the assassins after Nasharra years ago. Once she added everything up, Vaelin was ready to believe that the Nasura had killed her mother. Our attack on Aabsaan merely cemented that belief and forced her into action."
The Tsarosha said nothing. Her gaze was inscrutable. Belosveka interpreted her silence as encouragement to continue. He forced himself to remain calm, to keep his voice even and well-paced.
"Getting her into the Madrium was a bit risky, but I felt confident that her natural talent would win out. As you are aware, I have several agents in the Nasura, one of whom was ideally placed in the Madrium to nudge matters along."
"Ah, yes. What was her name? Haidara?"
"Maestra Haidana, Your Glory. With her help, and that of a captain of the Teluric Guard who was in deep financial trouble, it was possible to guide Vaelin's actions. She has a tendency to liberate items from the possession of others, and a deep passion for books, so I merely recognized the opportunity and allowed it to happen. It took some time, but eventually she did as I expected. The Nasura had its own motivations for taking the Peliano girl --- a convenient pretext for war, and the convenient debasement of a political rival.
"I was also able to arrange for Vaelin to be paired off frequently with one who I knew to be a Cantarian double agent. To be clear, I wasn't sure what would come of these actions, but I like to set up a number of possible fields of play, and act upon them as opportunity presents itself."
"I see. So you didn't plan in advance for her to join the Cantarians?"
"No, Your Glory, or at least I wasn't counting on it. However, once I saw where things were headed with her little group, her coro, I was able to use Haidana to frame her friend and force her to join forces with the shavaliae."
The Tsarosha leaned back on her pillows and allowed a subtle smile to appear on her lips. "And the rest? Their escape from Thelenza, and the use of the Apogee?"
Here was the big lie. Belosveka breathed deeply. "A success beyond my greenest dreams, Your Glory. Although our arrangement to provide arms to the Cantarians was of great help in moving things forward." 
The Tsarosha's smile deepened slightly. She looked at Belosveka in silence. The moment stretched out, but Belosveka let no sign of tension show. He was the humble servant, seeking only the best interests of his mistress. She had to believe that.
Finally she spoke. "You have done well. However, as events unfolded, you exposed us to a great deal of risk. Had the plan failed, the Nasura would have gained power --- not a direct defeat for us, but a loss to our proxy, which would have weakened our position considerably. You should have consulted with me earlier. For this reason, I have decided not to release your daughter just yet. She will remain our honored guest until both your loyalty and your foresight are proven to me without a doubt. It may be some time."
Belosveka felt a twitch begin near his right eye. He willed it away, forced himself to feel nothing, not yet. There would be time later for grief, time for rage. For now, he clung to a single thought.
"Yes, Your Glory," he heard himself say. As if watching from afar, he felt his body bow low.
The thought sustained him. It was a single image --- an image of Vaelin, flectarus blossoming before her, its edges slick with blood. The girl had been an instrument of the Tsarosha's vengeance, but one day she would learn the truth. He would see to it. And when that day came, nothing would stop her from becoming the instrument of her own vengeance. She was out there, somewhere.
And one day, she would come calling.

# Epilogue #

Epilogue

Far away, beside a lake of blue ice, there was a sound like distant thunder. Beneath the rumbling was a high-pitched hiss, accompanied by a stream of cracks and pops. It was a confusing jumble of sound, loud enough to make the unstable slabs of snow begin to tumble off adjacent hilltops, picking up momentum and mass until they crashed into the valleys below. Trees were uprooted. Animals and gatherers died.
Below the surface of the lake, a column of bones was shining like a second sun, sending a tall shaft of light high above the mountain. The whole surface of the lake vibrated with fury. Cracks began to spider out from the center, spreading across the ice all the way to the snowbanks at its edge. Steam erupted in violent sheets and plumes from the cracks, and the ice began to break apart, chunks of it propelled high into the air. They spun there, catching the light and then falling back down to shatter.
Below the crumbling, melting slush, the bones began to move, grinding around the central axis like a frozen whirlpool. Some of them broke apart from the pressure, spilling out even more light as they did.
Deep below the ice, below the lowest bones, a dark shape began to move.